On an electoral map, some states are colored red. Their votes are for the Republican party. Other states are colored blue. Their votes are for the Democratic party. Those votes help to pick the president of the United States. 
Someone wondered what the map would look like if only women voted. If that happened, the map would be almost all blue.
Take a look at the map above. It is a “suffrage map” of America in the early 1900s. Suffrage means the right to vote in elections. For a long time in the United States, only men could vote.
Women wanted to vote, too. They had to fight for this right. Suffrage maps played an important part in this fight back then.
“The Awakening” map is shown above. It is an important example of a suffrage map. It was published in the year 1915. It shows women all looking up at Lady Liberty. Her clothes have the words “VOTES FOR WOMEN” on them. By 1915, only some states allowed women to vote.
Another suffrage map showed only nine states where women could vote. On this map, you can see the sad look on the women’s faces.
Women began using cartography to help them. Cartography is the art of drawing maps. Before then, only men had those jobs. They drew maps that would help their own interests.
This map with the sad faces appeared during the fight to allow women in New York to vote. This finally happened in 1917. The maps helped to spread the idea of women's voting rights.
The maps were painted on buildings where everyone could see them. They even showed up on drinking glasses and baseball game programs. There were maps on parade floats. Maps were soon everywhere spreading the news.
One problem was that the maps only showed white women. Black women did not get to vote until 1920. It was then that the 19th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution granted American women the right to vote.
There is a poem under one map. It is by Alice Duer Miller. It shares many of the feelings women still have today.
Miller wrote that all women were now united by the right to vote. Maybe that is why if only women's votes counted, today's electoral map would be mostly blue. 
What is an earthquake?
An earthquake is what happens when two blocks of the earth called tectonic plates suddenly slip past one another. The surface where they slip is called the fault or fault plane. The location below the earth’s surface where the earthquake starts is called the hypocenter, and the location directly above it on the surface of the earth is called the epicenter.
Sometimes an earthquake has foreshocks. These are smaller earthquakes that happen in the same place as the larger earthquake that follows. Scientists can’t tell that an earthquake is a foreshock until the larger earthquake happens. The largest, main earthquake is called the mainshock. Mainshocks always have aftershocks that follow. These are smaller earthquakes that occur afterward in the same place as the mainshock. Depending on the size of the mainshock, aftershocks can continue for weeks, months and even years after the mainshock. 
What causes earthquakes and where do they happen? The earth has four major layers: the inner core, outer core, mantle and crust. The crust and the top of the mantle make up a thin skin on the surface of our planet. But this skin is not all in one piece – it is made up of many tectonic plates like a puzzle covering the surface of the earth. Not only that, but these puzzle pieces keep slowly moving around, sliding past one another and bumping into each other. The edges of the tectonic plates are called the plate boundaries. The plate boundaries are made up of many faults, and most of the earthquakes around the world occur along these faults. Since the edges of the plates are rough, they get stuck while the rest of the plate keeps moving. Finally, when the plate has moved far enough, the edges unstick on one of the faults and there is an earthquake.
Why does the earth shake when there is an earthquake?
While the edges of faults are stuck together, and the rest of the block is moving, the energy that would normally cause the blocks to slide past one another is stored. When the force of the moving blocks finally overcomes the friction of the jagged edges of the fault and it unsticks, all that stored up energy is released. The energy is released in the form of seismic waves that radiate from the earthquake source in all directions. The seismic waves shake the earth as they move through it, and when the waves reach the earth’s surface, they shake the ground and anything on it.
The different types of energy waves shake the ground in different ways and also travel through the earth at different velocities. The fastest wave, and therefore the first to arrive at a given location, is called the P wave. The P wave alternately compresses and expands material in the same direction it is traveling. The S wave is slower than the P wave and arrives next, shaking the ground up and down and back and forth perpendicular to the direction it is following. The surface waves follow the P and S waves. 
How are earthquakes recorded?
Earthquakes are recorded by instruments called seismographs. The recording they make is called a seismogram. The seismograph has a base that sets firmly in the ground, and a heavy weight that hangs free. When an earthquake causes the ground to shake, the base of the seismograph shakes too, but the hanging weight does not. Instead the spring or string that it is hanging from absorbs all the movement. The difference in position between the shaking part of the seismograph and the motionless part is what is recorded.
How do scientists measure the size of earthquakes?
The size of an earthquake depends on the size of the fault and the amount of slip on the fault. However, that’s not something scientists can easily measure since faults are located deep beneath the earth’s surface. So how exactly do they measure an earthquake? They use the seismogram recordings to determine how large the earthquake was. Seismographs record a zigzag trace that shows the varying amplitude of ground oscillations beneath the instrument. Sensitive seismographs, which greatly magnify these ground motions, can detect strong earthquakes from sources anywhere in the world. The time, locations and magnitude of an earthquake can be determined from the data recorded by seismograph stations.
The size of the earthquake is called its magnitude. There is one magnitude for each earthquake. Scientists also talk about the intensity of shaking from an earthquake, and this varies depending on where you are during the earthquake.
How can scientists tell where the earthquake happened? 
Seismograms come in handy for locating earthquakes too, and being able to see the P wave and the S wave is important. P waves are faster than S waves, and this fact is what allows us to tell where an earthquake was. To understand how this works, let’s compare P and S waves to lightning and thunder. Light travels faster than sound, so during a thunderstorm you will first see the lightning and then you will hear the thunder. If you are close to the lightning, the thunder will boom right after the lightning, but if you are far away from the lightning, you can count several seconds before you hear the thunder. The further you are from the storm, the longer it will take between the lightning and the thunder.
P waves are like the lightning, and S waves are like the thunder. The P waves travel faster and shake the ground where you are first. Then the S waves follow and shake the ground also. If you are close to the earthquake, the P and S waves will come one right after the other, but if you are far away, there will be more time between the two. By looking at the amount of time between the P and S waves on a seismogram recorded on a seismograph, scientists can tell how far away the earthquake was from that location. However, they can’t tell in what direction from the seismograph the earthquake was, only how far away it was. If they draw a circle on a map around the station where the radius of the circle is the determined distance to the earthquake, they know the earthquake lies somewhere on the circle. But where?
Scientists then use a method called triangulation to determine exactly where the earthquake was. It is called triangulation because a triangle has three sides, and it takes three seismographs to locate an earthquake. If you draw a circle on a map around three different seismographs where the radius of each is the distance from that station to the earthquake, the intersection of those three circles is the epicenter.
Can scientists predict earthquakes?
On any particular fault, scientists know there will be another earthquake sometime in the future, but it is difficult to tell exactly when it will happen. Earthquake early warning (EEW) systems use earthquake science and the technology of monitoring systems to alert devices and people when shaking waves generated by an earthquake are expected to arrive at their location. The seconds to minutes of advance warning can allow people and systems to take actions to protect life and property from destructive shaking. EEW systems are currently operating in several countries, and others are building them. Since 2006 the USGS has been working to develop EEW for the United States, with the help of several cooperating organizations. 
What is an earthquake?
The surface of the earth is divided into different pieces. These are called tectonic plates. When two plates suddenly slip past one another, an earthquake happens. This shakes the ground and everything on it.
What causes earthquakes and where do they happen? The earth has four main layers. They are the inner core, outer core, mantle and crust. The crust and the top of the mantle make up a thin skin on the surface of the planet. But this skin is not all in one piece. It is actually made up of many tectonic plates. They are like puzzle pieces. These pieces are always sliding around and bumping into each other. Sometimes their edges get stuck together. When this happens, the rest of the plate keeps moving. Eventually the edges come unstuck. That is when an earthquake happens.
Why does the earth shake when there is an earthquake?
Earthquakes send out waves in all directions. When they reach the earth's surface, they shake the ground.
There are different types of earthquake waves. The P wave squeezes and stretches the earth. The S wave shakes it up and down. 
How are earthquakes recorded?
Scientists use special tools to record and measure earthquakes. These tools are called seismographs. Recordings from seismographs tell scientists when and where an earthquake took place. The can also tell scientists the size of an earthquake.
How can scientists tell where the earthquake happened?
Scientists can tell where an earthquake took place by studying the P and S waves. This is because P waves are faster than S waves. In a way, the waves are like lightning and thunder. During a storm, you see lightning first. Then you hear thunder. This is because light travels faster than sound. If you are close to a storm, the thunder booms right after the lightning. But if you are far away, it takes longer. You can count several seconds before the thunder. The further away you are, the more time there is between the two.
P waves are like lightning. S waves are like thunder. The P waves shake the ground first. Then the S waves follow. Scientists can count the time between the two. It tells them how far away an earthquake was from a certain place.
Can scientists predict earthquakes?
Scientists know where earthquakes will probably happen. It is more difficult to know when one will occur. Scientists are working on tools to tell when earthquakes will happen. They also have systems to warn people a few minutes in advance. This gives people a chance to find safety before an earthquake hits.  In 1803, when the United States bought New Orleans, along with the rest of the land in the Louisiana Purchase, the city had only about 8,000 people living in it. Planned on a tight grid, the city stretched just 11 blocks along a curve of the Mississippi River and six blocks back from the levee, to Rampart Street.
A little more than three decades later, New Orleans had become a world port, and in 1836 edged out New York City as the busiest export center in the United States. The population had grown to more than 60,000 people—many of them Anglo-Americans who, to the alarm of the city’s Francophone natives, had flocked to the port to make their fortunes.
Today, New Orleans trades on the languid charm of its French and Spanish past to lure visitors to its historic center, but in the early 19th century, American newcomers to the city had no patience for Louisiana’s old guard, known as creoles, whom they saw as Catholic, corrupt and overly permissive to the city’s large population of slaves and free people of color.
But in New Orleans, the American upstarts lacked the political power to change the city’s ways as fast as they would like. Instead, in 1836, the city’s Anglo-Americans convinced the state legislature to split New Orleans into pieces—three semi-autonomous municipalities divided along ethnic lines. For more than 15 years, the city was divided, while the Americans consolidated their power and re-shaped the city to their own ends.
The idea of dividing New Orleans between the Francophone old guard and the Anglophone newcomers first came up in the 1820s, when rival military factions would challenge each other’s authority, edging toward but never quite exploding into violent conflict. In his book "Louisiana in the Age of Jackson," Joseph G. Tregle, Jr., the Louisiana historian who has studied this period most closely, tells how American-led sections of the militia would refuse to follow orders from foreign French officers who still held military positions. When Americans held command, the French would reciprocate.
At times, different factions of the militia would march through the streets, showing off their defiance and power, and it was during one such conflict that a local American editor, R.D. Richardson, started calling for the city to be split along ethnic lines. A rival French editor, who had fought for Napoleon, responded by offering five dollars to anyone who’d give Richardson a good whap over the head.
There were two main areas in which the entrenched French creoles made the incoming Americans crazy. The first was infrastructure: when the U.S. bought the Louisiana territory, New Orleans had no paved roads, no street signs, and no colleges. Much of the population was illiterate, and justice was dispensed according to the French legal code: Tregle calls the place “a colonial backwash of French and Spanish imperialism.”
The second was the permissive culture: Sunday in New Orleans means sitting at a café and going out dancing or perhaps to a horse race. In this city, black and white people mingled more freely than elsewhere in America, and even slaves had more leeway to move freely than in other cities.
All this shocked the Protestant, Puritan-minded American settlers, many of whom came from places in the South where the movement of black people was highly restricted and regulated. (Meanwhile, the native creole population was appalled by the crude Americans, who they called Kaintucks and vulgar Yankees.) The Anglo-American settlers tried to change everything from the city’s laws to the looser culture, but even as they gained power of New Orleans’ commercial life, they did not have enough political power to mold the city as they would have liked.
After the conflicts of the 1820s, the newcomers kept trying to split the city—if they couldn’t fix the whole place, at least they could control part of it. About a decade later, in 1836, Anglo-Americans finally got their way. New Orleans was divided into three municipalities, one Anglophone and two Francophone. The three sections of split New Orleans roughly correspond to the today’s Central Business District, French Quarter, and Marigny neighborhood. The Second Municipality, which the Americans controlled, began at Canal Street and went upriver, past the place where the Pontchartrain Expressway cuts through the city today. The First Municipality included all of the French Quarter, from Canal to Esplanade Avenue, and the Third Municipality stretched downriver from there, through the Marigny toward today’s Bywater neighborhood. Each municipality had its own police force, its own schools, its own infrastructure, and services. In the First Municipality, English was the language of commerce and government; in the other two, French dominated.
When this story is told quickly, it’s usually said that New Orleans was a place neatly divided between old and new, French and English, a more multiracial society and a white one, with Canal Street as the clear border. But according to the work of Tregle and later historians, the divide was not initially so stark as legend might have it.
When Americans started moving to New Orleans, they moved first to the French Quarter, on the upriver side, closer to Canal Street. Only once that section of town filled up did they continue building into Faubourg Ste. Marie, the newer suburb on the far side of Canal. It was always desirable to live in the French Quarter, where by the 1830s Chartres Street had become a major commercial thoroughfare, dotted with American shops selling books, jewelry, and other goods. On the other side of Canal Street, it was common for prominent Francophone creoles to make their home in Ste. Marie, too. To the extent that there was a clear dividing line between the old and new populations, it was at St. Louis Street, close to the center of the city.
But once the city was divided into three political entities, the distinctions between the Second Municipality and the other two started to grow. Trade in the Second Municipality thrived, and bustling warehouses and insurance companies started going up on Camp and Magazine streets.
The growing economy led to a housing boom, where Greek revival architecture mixed with the brick-faced warehouses of a northeastern port city; one traveler noted that the American part of the city “lacked that mellowness of age and charm of the bizarre which set old New Orleans apart.” Whatever it lacked in beauty, though, it made up for in wealth and city services: the Second Municipality soon had a modern school system, as well as new wharves, gas lights and paved streets.
On the other side of town, the area below Jackson Square was suffering, as poverty increased and the old French houses aged. The Third Municipality, sometimes called the “The Dirty Third,” was in particularly bad shape, since the waste of the rest of the city floated downriver to pollute its shores, air and water. By the time the city was reunited, in 1852, its wealth had concentrated upriver. Tregle found that by 1860 the area upriver of St. Louis Street had 76 percent of the city’s taxable property. More than any other American city at the time, New Orleans could claim to be a diverse place where people of color had more freedom than elsewhere in the South. But during the period where white newcomers divided New Orleans, the American values and laws that were shaping both the city and the new state of Louisiana were reducing those freedoms quickly. The American values imported to New Orleans included not just an emphasis on better infrastructure and education, but on more legally encoded racism that was strictly enforced.
“On the upper side of town … white inhabitants were often times more hostile to the very notion of free people of color,” writes Richard Campanella, a contemporary historian who studies New Orleans geography. The white Americans who were gaining power were uncomfortable with the rights that slaves and free people of color had in the city and sought to restrict their movements and freedoms. There was also a second major wave of white people coming to the city, who saw themselves as being in conflict with the black population. During the 1830s, immigrants from Ireland and Germany flocked to New Orleans and made it a majority white city for the first time: in 1835, white workers protested black employment in certain desirable jobs.
As much as the division allowed trade to thrive and infrastructure to improve in parts of New Orleans, it was mostly to the benefit of white, American-born people. When the city did merge back into one city, it was only because the Anglo-Americans had enough power to control not just commerce but city politics, too. With the influx of immigrants, they outnumbered the Francophone old guard. The immigrant-heavy suburb of Lafayette was incorporated into the city, becoming today’s Garden District. Only once the Anglo-Americans could shift the whole city to their own ways did they let it become whole again.
In 1803, the United States bought a large amount of land from France. The deal was called the Louisiana Purchase. The new territory included the city of New Orleans.
Today, it is the largest city in the state of Louisiana. Back then, only about 8,000 people lived there. The city was just 11 blocks long and six blocks wide. It sat along a curve of the Mississippi River. 
New Orleans grew quickly. By 1936 it was a world trading port. Many goods were sold and shipped from New Orleans to other countries. The population grew to more than 60,000 people by this time.
Many of the newcomers were English-speaking Americans. This was worrying to the city's French-speaking residents, who became known as Creoles.
New Orleans was founded by the French in 1718. It later came under Spanish rule. However, it was again under the control of the French when it was bought by the U.S. government.
The Americans and the Creoles did not get along very well in the early 1800s. They disagreed on two main issues. The first was the organization of the city itself. New Orleans had no paved roads, no street signs and no colleges. Many of its residents could not read. The courts followed old French laws instead of the U.S. Constitution. The Creoles were fine with the city as it was, but the Anglo-Americans wanted it to change.
The second issue had to do with the way of life in New Orleans. On Sundays, people might sit at a café or go out dancing. The strict, religious Americans were shocked by this. Also, black and white people freely mixed and mingled in New Orleans. Even slaves there had more freedom than they had in other U.S. cities. This, too, shocked the Americans. Many of them came from places in the South where black people were watched and controlled.
The Anglo-Americans could not change the city’s ways. So, in 1836, they tried something else. They convinced the Louisiana state government to split New Orleans into pieces. The city was broken into three municipalities, or districts. One of these districts was English-speaking and the other two were French-speaking. Each district had it own police, schools, and services.
 The First and Third Municipalities were mostly Creole. The Second was controlled by the Americans. The city was divided this way for more than 15 years. This allowed the Americans to make some of the changes they wanted in their own district.
Over time, the districts became very different from one another. In the Second, there was a lot of trading. Businesses boomed and more houses were built. Soon, there was even a modern school system. The Second district had gas lights and paved streets. 
Things were not going as well on the other side of town. The Third district, sometimes called the “The Dirty Third,” was in especially bad shape. Poverty increased there. Waste from the other districts floated downriver to the Third district. This waste polluted its air and water.
New Orleans became one city again in 1852. By then, the riches in different districts was very uneven. The Second Municipality was quite rich, and the Third was quite poor.  During the divide, the Americans also used their newfound power another way. They introduced rules and laws that restricted the freedoms of black men and women. This became easier to do after a second large group of white people arrived in the city in the 1830s.
Immigrants came from Ireland and Germany and for the first time, the majority of people living there were white. White workers did not want black men and women to take jobs from them. They protested this in 1835. The division of New Orleans into three parts helped the city's economy to grow. It improved the organization of the city in some areas. These changes were mostly enjoyed by white, American-born people, though. They did not benefit everyone. 
When New Orleans was a united city again, it was only because the English-speaking Americans had enough power to allow it. They could control trade and business and influence city politics and rules. They were able to shift the city to follow their own ways.  Most of Earth’s history (from the formation of the Earth 4.6 billion years ago to approximately 541 million years ago) is known as the Precambrian time. Rocks of this age are found in northern Yellowstone and in the hearts of the Teton, Beartooth, Wind River and Gros Ventre ranges. During the Precambrian and the subsequent Paleozoic and Mesozoic eras (541 million to 66 million years ago), the western United States was covered at times by oceans, sand dunes, tidal flats and vast plains. From the end of the Mesozoic through the early Cenozoic, mountain-building processes formed the Rocky Mountains.
During the Cenozoic era (approximately the last 66 million years of Earth’s history), widespread mountain-building, volcanism, faulting and glaciation sculpted the Yellowstone area. The Absaroka Range along the park’s north and east sides was formed by numerous volcanic eruptions about 50 million years ago. This period of volcanism is not related to the present Yellowstone volcano.
Approximately 30 million years ago, vast expanses of today’s West began stretching apart along an east–west axis. This stretching process increased about 17 million years ago and continues today, creating the modern basin and range topography (north–south mountain ranges with long north–south valleys) characterizing much of the West, including the Yellowstone area.
About 16.5 million years ago, an intense period of volcanism appeared near the intersection of present-day Nevada, Oregon and Idaho. Repeated volcanic eruptions can be traced across southern Idaho toward Yellowstone. This 500-mile trail of more than 100 calderas was created as the North American plate moved in a southwestern direction over a shallow body of magma. About 2.1 million years ago, the movement of the North American plate brought the Yellowstone area closer to the shallow magma body. This volcanism remains a driving force in Yellowstone today.
Magma (molten rock from Earth’s mantle) has been close to the surface in Yellowstone for more than 2 million years. Its heat melted rocks in the crust, creating a magma chamber of partially molten, partially solid rock. Heat from this shallow magma caused an area of the upper crust to expand and rise. The Yellowstone Plateau became a geomorphic landform shaped by episodes of volcanic activity. Stress also caused rocks overlying the magma to break, forming faults and causing earthquakes. Eventually, these faults reached the deep magma chamber. Magma oozed through these cracks, releasing pressure within the chamber and allowing trapped gases to expand rapidly. A massive volcanic eruption then occurred along vents, spewing volcanic ash and gas into the atmosphere and causing fast super-hot debris (pyroclastic) flows on the ground. As the underground magma chamber emptied, the ground above it sunk, creating the first of Yellowstone’s three calderas. 
The volume of material ejected during this first eruption is estimated to have been 6,000 times the size of the 1980 eruption of Mt. St. Helens in Washington, and ash has been found as far away as Missouri. Approximately 1.3 million years ago, a second, smaller volcanic eruption occurred within the western edge of the first caldera. Then 640,000 years ago, a third massive volcanic eruption created the Yellowstone Caldera, 30 by 45 miles in size. A much smaller eruption approximately 174,000 years ago forming what is now the West Thumb of Yellowstone Lake. In between and after these eruptions, lava flowed—with the last being approximately 70,000 years ago.
Over time, the pressure from magma has formed two resurgent domes inside the Yellowstone Caldera. Magma may be as little as 3 to 8 miles beneath Sour Creek Dome and 8 to 12 miles beneath Mallard Lake Dome; they both lift up and subside as magma or hydrothermal fluids upwell or subside beneath them. The entire caldera floor lifts up or subsides, too, but not as much as the domes. In the past century, the net result has been to tilt the caldera floor toward the south. As a result, Yellowstone Lake’s southern shores have subsided and trees stand in water.
A plume of molten rock that rises beneath Yellowstone creates one of the world’s largest active volcanoes, evident in the frequency of earthquakes in the area, the thousands of hydrothermal features, and the measurable ground deformation over time. The first major eruption of the Yellowstone volcano, which occurred 2.1 million years ago, is among the largest volcanic eruptions known, covering over 5,790 square miles (15,000 square km) with ash. After the most recent major eruption, 640,000 years ago, the ground collapsed into the magma reservoir, leaving a caldera 75 km (46 miles) long and 55 km (34 miles) wide. Since then, 80 smaller eruptions have occurred, most recently 70,000 years ago, partially filling the caldera. Although a cataclysmic eruption is unlikely in the foreseeable future, continuous monitoring of seismic activity, ground deformation, and changes in underground strain rates helps ensure public safety.
Ground deformation has been documented along the central axis of the caldera between Old Faithful and White Lake in Pelican Valley. The largest vertical movement was recorded at the White Lake GPS station, inside the caldera’s eastern rim, where the total uplift from 2004 to 2009 was about 25 cm (10 inches). The rate of rise slowed in 2008 and the caldera began to subside during the first half of 2010. The uplift is believed to be caused by the movement of deep hydrothermal fluids or molten rock at a depth of about 10 km (6 miles) beneath the surface. A caldera may undergo episodes of uplift and subsidence for thousands of years without erupting. Episodes of uplift and subsidence have been correlated with earthquake occurrence.
Will Yellowstone’s volcano erupt again? Over the next thousands to millions of years, probably. In the next few hundred years? Not likely.
The most likely activity would be lava flows, such as those that occurred after the last major eruption. A lava flow would ooze slowly over months and years, allowing plenty of time for park managers to evaluate the situation and protect people. No scientific evidence indicates such a lava flow will occur soon.
To monitor volcanic and seismic activity in the Yellowstone area, the U.S. Geological Survey, National Park Service and the University of Utah established the Yellowstone Volcano Observatory in 2001. The near real-time monitoring network consists of 26 seismic stations, 16 GPS receivers, and 11 stream gauging stations. Information is also collected on temperature, chemistry and gas concentrations at selected hydrothermal features and chloride concentrations in major rivers.  The Earth formed about 4.6 billion years ago. Earth looked very different back then. The western United States was once covered by oceans, sand dunes, muddy patches and plains. That lasted until around 66 million years ago. 
Earth's history can be seen at Yellowstone National Park. Yellowstone is a huge park in the states of Wyoming, Montana and Idaho. It was the first national park in the United States. The park sits on a plateau between the Rocky Mountains. A plateau is land that is raised, but flat. Yellowstone is also home to a huge active volcano.
The area had some volcanic rumbles about 16.5 million years ago. This created more than 100 volcanic craters. The craters are also called calderas. They form when molten rock erupts from below the Earth's surface.
A molten rock is rock that is so hot that it has melted. It is also called magma. When it erupts, the ground can cave in. This is how craters are formed. 
Magma had a big effect on Yellowstone 2 million years ago. It caused an area of the Earth's surface to get bigger and rise. This formed the Yellowstone Plateau. The heat also melted rocks in the Earth's crust. This created what is called a magma chamber. 
Rocks on top of the magma cracked. Eventually, these cracks reached the magma chamber. Magma oozed through. Trapped gases increased rapidly. That caused a massive volcanic eruption about 2 million years ago. It was among the largest volcanic eruptions ever. As the underground magma chamber emptied, the ground above it sank. This was the first of Yellowstone’s three craters. 
There have been two other big eruptions since then. Eighty smaller eruptions have also happened. The most recent one was 70,000 years ago. A big eruption will not happen anytime soon. Still, the volcano is constantly monitored to be sure people are safe. 
Changes in the ground have been studied in the crater. At one station, the ground rose 10 inches from 2004 to 2009. Then it slowed in 2008. It rose again in 2010. A crater might rise and fall for thousands of years without erupting. 
Will Yellowstone’s volcano erupt again? Maybe in a few million years. Not in the next few hundred years.
The most likely activity would be lava oozing slowly out of a volcano. Scientists do not believe this will happen soon.
Yellowstone Volcano Observatory opened in 2001. It monitors the volcano. It collects information on temperature and gases. It keeps people safe.
How Geography "Mapped" East Asia, Part Two: Korea and Japan 
What role did climate and geography play in enabling powerful states, and eventually agrarian civilizations, to appear in some areas while other locations remained better suited for foraging? Here we consider both the island nation of Japan and the Korean Peninsula.
The societies that emerged in Korea and Japan reflect their participation in an East Asian regional identity that revolved around China. We can talk about the existence of an “Eastern Hemispheric cultural zone” by the beginning of the Era of Agrarian Civilizations, just as we speak about the “East Asian region” as a semi-unified cultural and economic entity today. But Korean and Japanese civilizations never became carbon copies of China.
The Korean Peninsula extends from northeastern China and is otherwise surrounded by the Yellow Sea to the west, the Sea of Japan to the east, and the Korea Strait connecting the two seas. The Yellow Sea dividing China and the peninsula is only 120 miles (193 km) wide at its narrowest point, and if you were to sail from southern Korea to Kyushu in Japan on a clear day, land would never be out of sight. 
The peninsula is about 85,000 square miles — or about the same size as England or the state of Utah. Most of the land is extremely rugged, mountainous, and heavily forested. This presented the first human migrants to Korea with a host of environmental challenges, but also a range of possible settlement sites: a long, sinuous coastline with many microenvironments and marine resources, and many wooded interior environments such as river flats, and mountain valleys with access to forest foods, timber, fresh water, and caves.
Geologically, Korea consists mostly of a block of ancient granite that was laid down before the Cambrian era. On top of this are younger rocks — gneiss, more recent granites and limestone. The limestone has produced large caves that are mostly accessible through fissures and cracks rather than through flat floors and entrances. Although these might have seemed attractive to early human migrants, few of these caves were the right shape or size to become practical dwellings. The ancient granites contain important metals – gold, copper, tin, and iron – all of which were accessed by early Korean states. Korea has been a major gold producer for a very long time.
Although Japan is so close, Korea has almost none of the volatile volcanic activity of its eastern neighbor. The only volcano is Mount Baekdu in the far north, which at 9,000 feet is also the highest mountain in Korea. Today, the mountain contains an extinct crater filled with Heaven Lake; according to ancient legend, this was home to the gods. From Baekdu in the far north, all the way to the southern tip of the peninsula, 70 percent of Korea’s land consists of steep-sided mountains. It is their ruggedness rather than their height that has been so influential: the hills made it very difficult to cross from east to west, allowing cultures and kingdoms to develop in relative geographical isolation from each other. One of these, the Silla Kingdom, grew strong enough in its remote southeastern enclave behind the Sobaek Mountains that it eventually overcame the mountainous terrain to conquer the other kingdoms and establish the first unified Korean state.
As with China, rivers have also played a critical role in the emergence of Korean culture. All of Korea’s rivers twist and turn as they cut their way down from the mountains. Six are more than 400 kilometers (248 miles) long, and most of them run west or south. All the great capitals of Korean history have been located along the major rivers of the Taedong (where Pyongyang lies today); the Imjin-Han system (where Seoul is located); and the Kum farther south.
During the last ice age, sea levels were about 400 feet (122  meters) lower than they are today, which meant that much of the Yellow Sea was dry land, and Korea was connected to Japan. Paleolithic migrants were able to walk from China across the Yellow Sea Plain to Korea, and then on to Japan. As temperatures warmed about 11,000 years ago, sea levels rose, sealing off the inhabitants of Japan, and separating Korea from China, except along the northern border.
Early Korean people constructed a series of rituals, survival strategies, and ideas about the relationship of families to larger organizations that were products of the geographical context in which they emerged. These influenced their origin stories, such as the legend that Korean history dates to 2333 B.C., when King Tangun (a mythical figure born of the son of Heaven and a woman from a bear-totem tribe) established the first kingdom of Choson, or “Land of the Morning Calm.” The name reflected well the tranquil forest camps, seaside villages, and river terraces of the Choson state.
Japanese culture was perhaps even more powerfully influenced by the environment in which it formed. Modern Japan consists of four large islands — Hokkaido, Honshu, Shikoku, and Kyushu — and thousands of smaller ones, with a combined area of roughly 145,000 square miles, which means it is just a little larger than Italy, and a little smaller than California. The 1,500-mile-long (2,414-km-long) chain stretches from cool northern latitudes to warmer southern ones.
Because the islands are separated from the mainland by several hundred miles of water (120 miles at the closest point), this has fostered a sense of security that has allowed for the emergence of distinct Japanese culture. This isolation also helps to explain why attempts to invade Japan were largely unsuccessful. But Japan has never been completely isolated from the cultural influences coming from sophisticated neighboring states like Korea and China.
The geographical chain of islands to which Japan belongs is much more extensive than just the Japanese archipelago; it stretches along the northwest edge of the Pacific from the Aleutian Islands in the north all the way to the Philippines in the south. This chain is the product of, and still heavily influenced by, the tectonic forces that shape the surface of the Earth. Japan sits at the intersection of no fewer than four tectonic plates (part of the Pacific region’s “Ring of Fire”), so it has undergone regular violent shaping and upheaval. The devastating earthquake of 2011, which generated a massive tsunami, was just one of about 1,000 earthquakes that rattle Japan every year.
Another product of Japan’s tectonic location is that most of the country consists of geologically young mountains, driven up by these plate collisions. These mountains are steep and jagged, producing fast-moving streams and regular landslides. The tectonic plate boundaries have also spawned volcanoes, the highest and most famous of which is Mount Fuji at 12,388 feet (3,776 meters). These rugged and unstable mountain ranges are unsuitable for farming, limiting to settlement patterns, and difficult to climb or cross, so they have been serious barriers for internal transportation and communication from the beginning of Japanese history. This led to the emergence of regionally autonomous states in early Japan, and to an early reliance on water transport.
The sediment regularly washed from these young mountains joins with rich volcanic soil to create narrow but very fertile coastal plains. Although the plains make up only 13 percent of Japan’s area, their fertility marked them as where the first rice farmers settled, and where the first towns, cities, and states appeared. One of the most important of these plains is the Tsukushi Plain in northern Kyushu. Influenced by nearby civilizations in Korea and China, it became an early center of emerging Japanese culture.
Japan’s location between the great mainland continent of Asia and the wide Pacific also creates a distinctive and challenging weather environment. In the winter, cold winds blow out of Asia and dump large quantities of snow on the mountains of Japan. In the summer, warm moist air blows in from the south, bringing high temperatures and often torrential rains and typhoons. These weather systems have strongly influenced settlement patterns, and the formidable hurricane-like storms have had enormous historical consequences. Two attempted invasions of Japan by the Mongols were thwarted by powerful storms and strong winds that the Japanese considered divine, calling them "kamikaze."
Because of its long north-south stretch and varied terrain, Japan also contains a wide variety of plants and animals. The combination of plentiful fresh water and a long growing season created a paradise for plants, and for the herbivores that feed off them. When foraging humans first crossed the land bridges connecting the Japanese archipelago to the Asian mainland about 35,000 years ago, they found a rich variety of potential foodstuffs awaiting them — forest and sea food, along with plentiful boar, deer, and many smaller animals.
All these naturally occurring geological, geographic, and biological features — the flooding rivers, towering mountains, arid deserts, and rich alluvial plains of China; the narrow coasts, rugged mountains, and fast-flowing rivers of Korea; and the violent storms, earthquakes, volcanoes, and plains of the island nation of Japan — have been as fundamental in shaping East Asian civilization as any product of human ingenuity or will. 
How Geography "Mapped" East Asia, Part Two: Korea and Japan 
What role did climate and geography play in enabling powerful states, and eventually agrarian civilizations, to appear in some areas while other locations remained better suited for foraging? Here we consider both the island nation of Japan and the Korean Peninsula.
The societies that emerged in Korea and Japan were influenced by China's identity. Still, Korean and Japanese civilizations never became exact copies of China.
The Korean Peninsula juts out from northeastern China. To the west is the Yellow Sea. To the east is the Sea of Japan. The Korea Strait connects the two seas. The peninsula is about 85,000 square miles. It is about the same size as England or Utah. Most of the land is rugged. It is mountainous and heavily forested. 
This difficult geography challenged early migrants to Korea. Still, the area presented many places to settle. It had a long, curvy coastline. The ocean provided many resources, such as fish. Inland, there were forests. Mountain valleys offered forest foods, timber, fresh water, and caves.
Geologically, Korea consists mostly of a block of ancient granite. That rock layer was laid down before the Cambrian era of the Earth's development. On top of this are younger rocks. The limestone has produced large caves. The ancient granite contains important metals. These include gold, copper, tin and iron. Korea has long been a major gold producer.
Korea has almost none of the volcanic activity of its eastern neighbor, Japan. The only volcano is Mount Baekdu in the far north. It is 9,000 feet (2,743 meters) tall, the highest mountain in Korea. Today the mountain holds a crater — Heaven Lake. Ancient legend says the gods lived there.
Seventy percent of Korea is steep mountains. It is difficult to cross from east to west. Cultures and kingdoms developed independently. 
The Silla Kingdom was one of these cultures. This kingdom grew strong despite its isolation. Eventually, it crossed the mountains. It conquered other kingdoms. The Silla Kingdom first unified Korea.
Rivers played an important role in Korean culture. They did the same in China. The great capitals of Korean history have all been located on major rivers. 
During the last ice age, sea levels were about 400 feet (122 meters) lower than they are today. Much of the Yellow Sea was dry land. Korea was still connected to Japan. Ancient migrants could walk from China to Korea. The Yellow Sea was a plain. From there, they could continue to Japan. Temperatures rose about 11,000 years ago. Sea levels got higher. This sealed off the people of Japan. Korea separated from China, except along the northern border.
Early Korean culture reflected its geography. One Korean origin story dates to 2333 B.C. In this story, mythical King Tangun established the first kingdom of Choson. It means the “Land of the Morning Calm.” The name reflected the peaceful forest camps, seaside villages, and river terraces of Choson.
Japanese culture was powerfully influenced by the environment where it formed. Modern Japan consists of four large islands: Hokkaido, Honshu, Shikoku, and Kyushu. It also has thousands of smaller ones. Their combined area is about 145,000 square miles. Japan is a little larger than Italy. It’s a little smaller than California. Altogether, it's a 1,500-mile-long (2,414-kilometers-long) chain of islands. It stretches from cool northern latitudes to warmer southern ones.
The Japanese islands are hundreds of miles from the Asian mainland. A distinct Japanese culture emerged. But Japan has never been completely isolated from the cultural ideas of neighbors like Korea and China.
Japan sits at the spot where at least four tectonic plates meet. It is part of the Pacific region’s “Ring of Fire.” It has experienced violent changes. The strong earthquake of 2011 created a huge tsunami wave. About 1,000 earthquakes shake Japan every year. 
Japan’s tectonic location means that most of the country consists of young mountains. When the tectonic plates collided, these mountains were driven upward. The mountains are steep and jagged. There are fast-moving rivers and frequent landslides.
The tectonic plate boundaries have also created volcanoes. The highest and most famous is Mount Fuji. Fuji is 12,388 feet (3,776 meters) high. These rugged and unstable mountain ranges are difficult to cross. They are not suitable for farming. They are not ideal for settlement. They have been serious blocks to transportation and communication throughout Japanese history. As in Korea, independent states formed in early Japan. The country relied on water transportation.
Rocks and soil washed down from Japan's mountains. This sediment joined with rich volcanic soil to create fertile coastal plains. The plains make up only 13 percent of Japan’s area. However, they are crucial to Japanese civilization. The plains are where the first rice farmers settled. They are where the first towns, cities and states appeared. One of the most important of these plains is the Tsukushi Plain in northern Kyushu. It was influenced by nearby civilizations in Korea and China. It became an early center of Japanese culture.
Japan is located between Asia and the wide Pacific Ocean. It experiences difficult weather patterns. In the winter, cold winds blow out of Asia. They dump snow on the mountains of Japan. In the summer, warm moist air blows in from the south. The warm air brings high temperatures, heavy rains and typhoons. These weather systems have influenced where people settle. The strong hurricane-like storms have had huge historical consequences.
Two attempted invasions of Japan by the Mongols were stopped by powerful storms and strong winds. The Japanese considered these storms to be divine. They called them “kamikaze.”
Japan stretches a long way from north to south. It has many different landscapes. It also contains a wide variety of plants and animals. It is lucky to have both plentiful fresh water and a long growing season. The combination created a paradise for plants, and for the animals that eat them.
Land bridges once connected Japan to the Asian mainland. About 35,000 years ago, humans first crossed these bridges into Japan. A rich variety of food choices awaited them. There were forests and sea food, along with boar, deer and smaller animals.
In China, there were flooding rivers, huge mountains, vast deserts, and rich plains. In Korea, people found narrow coasts, rugged mountains, and fast-flowing rivers. Japan has the violent storms, earthquakes, volcanoes, and plains. All these geographic factors have shaped East Asian civilization. These natural features have been just as important to culture as anything created by human hands or minds. 
How Geography "Mapped" East Asia, Part One: China 
What were the geologic and geographic advantages favoring certain locations that facilitated the establishment of villages and towns — some of which grew into cities — in various regions of East Asia? What role did climate play in enabling powerful states, and eventually agrarian civilizations, to appear in some areas while other locations remained better suited for foraging?
Let’s begin with a story about floods in China. China’s two great rivers — the Yangtze and the Yellow — have been susceptible to regular flooding for as long as we can measure in the historical and geological record; nothing, however, can compare to the catastrophic floods of August 19, 1931. In just one day, the Yangtze River rose an astonishing 53 feet above its normal level, unleashing some of the most destructive floodwaters ever seen. 
These floods were a product of a “perfect storm” of conditions — monsoons, heavy snowmelt, and tremendous and unexpected rains that pounded huge areas of southern China. As all this water poured into the Yangtze’s tributaries, the river rose until it burst its banks for hundreds of miles. The results were devastating — 40 million people affected, 24 million forced to relocate, and more than 140,000 people drowned. An area the size of Oklahoma was underwater, and the southern capital city of Nanjing was flooded for six weeks. 
Such is the power of nature. People throughout history have been forced to acknowledge it, but in China the realization has led to a widely quoted maxim: “Heaven nourishes and Heaven destroys.” Despite the best efforts of emperors to regulate episodes of environmental boom and bust, these natural and uncontrollable cycles have profoundly influenced the core foundations of Chinese and East Asian culture. 
The behavior of rivers has become a model for the constant flux of natural forces, the balance between nature as creator and nature as destroyer. This is an example of why historical processes rely so heavily on the environmental context in which they take place. Indeed, understanding geography and climate is necessary background to the study of any civilization. In this essay, we look at the physical geography of China, to see how it has influenced the cultural and political history of East Asia.
China and the United States share several geographical similarities. They are about the same size, reside in the middle latitudes of the northern hemisphere, and have lengthy coastlines and diverse topographies. China is located in the eastern part of Asia, along the west coast of the Pacific Ocean, a region that is also home to the Korean Peninsula and the island nation of Japan. 
With a total land area of more than 3 million square miles, China is the third-largest country in the world after Russia and Canada. China also has extensive seas and numerous islands, and a coastline that extends for more than 11,000 miles. In a country the size of China, it is hardly surprising to find a great variety of topography, climate, and vegetation. The fertile alluvial plains have been built up by China’s great river systems. This is the region that has been densely settled and farmed for thousands of years, and where all the great dynasties and their capitals were located.
Along the edges of the Mongolian Plateau in the north lie extensive grasslands, the home of the pastoral nomadic peoples who interacted (and competed and clashed) with China’s sedentary populations virtually from the beginning of history. The vast “grass oceans” hosted Saka and Yuezhi, Xiongnu and Hun, Jurchen and Mongol — militarized archer warriors whom segments of the Great Wall were built to keep out. 
The southern regions of China consist of hill country and low mountain ranges. The south receives extensive rainfall, which is ideal for rice cultivation. The success of rice farmers through the ages — from around 8000 B.C., when the grain was first harvested and domesticated — explains why China has been consistently able to support a very large population.
China is also a mountainous country. The highest of these mountain ranges, including the Himalaya, the Karakoram, and the Tien Shan, are all located in the west, where they have long acted as a formidable barrier to communication. To make these topographical barriers even more challenging, the mountain ranges are interspersed with harsh deserts like the Taklimakan and Gobi. 
There is little arable land for agriculture in the west, so the smallish populations there have been confined to oasis settlements or have lived as pastoral nomads. This led to Chinese civilization emerging in the more arable east, north, and south. Isolated by its own “wild west,” China was cut off from the rest of Eurasia and from competing agrarian civilizations. 
Even today, these formidable topographical barriers, and the vast distances necessary to cross western China, affect China’s relations with its western neighbors. Yet, these barriers have their advantages, too. Chinese governments from the earliest dynasties have been forced to focus on internal cultural and ethnic integration rather than on external expansion.
Although the mountains and deserts of the west limited contact between early imperial dynasties and other Afro-Eurasian civilizations for thousands of years, they were eventually breached by traders moving along the Silk Roads, the first connection between China and the rest of Afro-Eurasia. It was the Silk Roads (land and maritime) that allowed many of the ideas and technological inventions of East Asian civilization — paper, printing, gunpowder — to reach the West, where their impact was profound.
China’s two river systems have also greatly influenced its history and culture. The Huang He in the north, called the Yellow River because of huge amounts of silt (yellow loess soil) that it carries from the plains into the ocean, rises in the mountains of Tibet and flows 2,920 miles to the Yellow Sea. During its journey, it crosses the high western plateau, flows through the arid northern deserts, and then spills out onto the broad alluvial plain. 
About midway along its course, the river takes a series of sharp turns — the so-called “great bend” — before resuming its path. This bend was long perceived as a frontier, the very edge of the civilized world beyond which lay the endless and dangerous steppes where one entered the realm of the “barbarians” — militarized pastoral nomads like the Xiongnu and the Mongols, China’s most formidable enemies.
The Yellow River is also known as “China’s Sorrow” because of the misery its devastating floods have caused. The earliest cities, states, and civilizations of East Asia all appeared along the Yellow River  – the Xia, Shang, Zhou, Qin, Han, and Tang dynasties were all centered there. So for millennia, some of the largest populations in the world lived within the Yellow River system and faced the potential of regular flood devastation. Emperors and court officials tried numerous schemes to control these floods, but with little success.
The other major river of China is the Yangtze, the third longest river in the world after the Nile and the Amazon. It flows from the Tibetan Plateau nearly 4,000 miles through southern China, until it empties into the sea beside Shanghai. The river’s basin area, about one-fifth the size of China, is home to so many people (almost 500 million) that if the Yangtze valley were a country it would be the third most populous in the world!
The Yangtze also has its great bend to the north, a bend that perhaps has been of even greater consequence to Chinese civilization than its Yellow River counterpart. In southwestern China, all the mountainous valleys are arranged in a north-south direction, products of the twisting of the landscape caused by the collision between the Indian and Asian tectonic plates. The great rivers that flow through these Himalayan valleys, like the south-running Brahmaputra and Mekong, all flow from the Tibetan Plateau in the north toward the seas that lap Southeast Asia.
The Yangtze would have gone the same way, depriving millions of Chinese people of its life-giving water, were it not for a singular topographical feature called Cloud Mountain. This massive wall of limestone is placed right across the path of the onrushing Yangtze, forcing the river to abruptly interrupt its journey south and turn sharply back to the north. The Chinese attribute the fortuitous placement of Cloud Mountain to the work of legendary emperor Yu the Great, who labored mightily to keep the river in China. Geologists, more accurately, attribute it to a particular quirk in twisting of the plate tectonic collision zone. Either way, without Cloud Mountain, Chinese history would have played out very differently. 
How Geography "Mapped" East Asia, Part One: China 
How did geography and climate cause cities and villages to appear in parts of East Asia? Why did other areas remain better suited for a nomadic lifestyle?
We can begin to answer these questions with a story about floods in China.
China’s two greatest rivers are the Yangtze and the Yellow River. These rivers have flooded regularly for at least thousands of years. 
Still, the floods of 1931 were terrible. On August 19 of that year, the Yangtze rose 53 feet. The resulting flood was one of the most destructive ever seen. The floods were caused by monsoon rains and heavy snowmelt. The rains and snowmelt affected huge areas of southern China.
All this water poured into the Yangtze. The river rose over its banks for hundreds of miles. It was a disaster. Twenty-four million people fled their homes. More than 140,000 people drowned. An area the size of Oklahoma was underwater. The southern capital city of Nanjing was flooded for six weeks.
This is the power of nature. People have understood it throughout history. In China, there is a popular saying. “Heaven nourishes and Heaven destroys.” 
Emperors have tried to control the ups and downs of the environment. Still, environmental patterns have strongly influenced Chinese and East Asian culture. Rivers have become a model for the constant change of natural forces. Nature is both creator and destroyer.
Understanding geography and climate is important to understand a civilization. In this essay, we look at the geography of China. How has it influenced history and culture? 
China and the United States have similar geography. They are about the same size. Both are in the middle latitudes of the northern hemisphere. Both have long coastlines. Both have diverse landscapes.  
China is located in eastern Asia. It borders the Pacific Ocean. The region is also home to the Korean Peninsula and the island nation of Japan. China is the third-largest country in the world. Only Russia and Canada are bigger. China's land area is more than 3 million square miles. China also has extensive seas and many islands. It has 11,000 miles of coastline.
China is huge. It has a great variety of topography, climate, and vegetation. In the east are fertile plains created by China’s great rivers. This region has been settled and farmed for thousands of years. All the great dynasties were located in the area. 
In the north are wide-open grasslands. They were the home of the cattle-raising nomadic peoples. These nomads interacted and clashed with China’s settled populations. The vast “grass oceans” were home to militarized archer warriors such as the Mongols. Parts of the Great Wall were built to keep these groups out.
The southern regions of China are hill country and low mountain ranges. The south receives a lot of rain. It's the perfect place to grow rice. Rice farmers have been successful in the area for the last 10,000 years. The rice has helped China to support a very large population. 
China is also a mountainous country. The highest of these mountain ranges are the Himalaya, the Karakoram, and the Tien Shan. All are located in the west. They act as a barrier to communication and travel. But they aren't the only barrier. Between the mountain ranges are harsh deserts like the Taklimakan and Gobi. 
There is little land for agriculture in the west. The smallish populations there have lived in oasis settlements. Some live as nomads on the steppes. Chinese civilization emerged in the more fertile east, north, and south. 
China was isolated by its own “wild west.” It was cut off from the rest of Eurasia. Even today, these geographic barriers and the huge size of western China affect China’s relations with its western neighbors. These barriers have advantages, too. Chinese governments throughout history have been forced to focus internally. Instead of expanding, they've focused on improving what they have. 
The mountains and deserts of the west limited contact between early Chinese dynasties and other civilizations. For thousands of years, there was virtually no contact. Eventually, traders moving along the Silk Roads broke through the barriers. These were the first connections between China and the rest of Afro-Eurasia. The Silk Road allowed many ideas and inventions from East Asia to reach the West. Paper, printing, and gunpowder were invented in China. The Silk Road brought them to Europe. The effect there was enormous.
China’s two river systems have also greatly influenced its history and culture. The Huang He in the north is also known as the Yellow River. It carries huge amounts of yellow soil, called silt, from the plains into the ocean. The Yellow River rises in the mountains of Tibet. It flows 2,920 miles to the Yellow Sea. During its journey, it crosses the high western plateau. It flows through northern deserts. Finally, it spills out onto the broad alluvial plain. 
About midway along its course, the river takes a series of sharp turns before resuming its path. This is called the “great bend.” The bend was once thought of as a frontier. To early people, it was the very edge of the civilized world. Beyond it were barbarians on the grasslands. Warrior nomads like the Xiongnu and the Mongols lived there. They were China’s strongest enemies. 
The Yellow River is also known as “China’s Sorrow.” Its devastating floods have caused great misery. The earliest cities, states, and civilizations of East Asia all appeared along its banks. For thousands of years, some of the largest populations in the world lived near the Yellow River. They risked devastation from flooding. Emperors tried to control the floods. They had little success.
The other major river in China is the Yangtze. The Yangtze is the third longest river in the world. Only the Nile and Amazon are longer. The Yangtze flows from the Tibetan Plateau nearly 4,000 miles through southern China. It empties into the sea near Shanghai. The river’s basin area is about one-fifth the size of China. It is home to almost 500 million people. If the Yangtze valley were a country, it would be the third most populous in the world.
The Yangtze also has a great bend to the north. The Yangtze’s bend has perhaps been more important to Chinese civilization than the Yellow River’s. In southwestern China, the great rivers all flow through Himalayan valleys from north to south. They flow south to the seas of Southeast Asia.
The Yangtze could have gone the same way. Millions of Chinese wouldn’t have had its life-giving water. Yet, sitting right in the middle of the Yangtze is Cloud Mountain. This massive wall of limestone blocks the onrushing Yangtze. The river is forced to interrupt its journey south and turn sharply back to the north.
The Chinese give credit for the placement of Cloud Mountain to legendary emperor Yu the Great. They believe he was able to keep the river in China. Geologists believe it was caused by plates moving below the Earth's surface. Whatever its origin, Cloud Mountain had a huge effect on Chinese history.  Editor's Note: In the 19th century, European visitors to this abandoned medieval city refused to believe that indigenous Africans could have built such an extensive network of monuments. Such ignorance was disastrous for the remains of Great Zimbabwe. In the early 16th century, rumours of a mysterious fortress with gargantuan walls, abandoned in the African jungle, spread around Europe. Surrounded by goldmines and sitting on a 900-metre-high hill, the city was thought to represent the summit of a unique African civilisation which had traded with distant Asian countries, including China and Persia.
A Portuguese sea captain, Viçente Pegado, was one of the first foreigners to encounter the site, in 1531. He wrote: “Among the goldmines of the inland plains between the Limpopo and Zambezi rivers [is a] fortress built of stones of marvellous size, and there appears to be no mortar joining them … This edifice is almost surrounded by hills, upon which are others resembling it in the fashioning of stone and the absence of mortar, and one of them is a tower more than 12 fathoms high.”
Great Zimbabwe was constructed between the 11th and 14th centuries over 722 hectares in the southern part of modern Zimbabwe. The whole site is weaved with a centuries-old drainage system which still works, funnelling water outside the houses and enclosures down into the valleys.
At its peak, an estimated 18,000 people lived in the capital of the Kingdom of Zimbabwe. Only 200 to 300 members of the elite classes are thought to have actually stayed inside its massive stone buildings, watched over at night by guards standing on the walls, while the majority lived some distance away.
Today, the ruins of Great Zimbabwe are a shell of the abandoned city that Captain Pegado came across – due in no small part to the frenzied plundering of the site at the turn of the 20th century by European treasure-hunters, in search of artefacts that were eventually sent to museums throughout Europe, America and South Africa.
It was said that Great Zimbabwe was an African replica of the Queen of Sheba’s palace in Jerusalem. The idea was promoted by the German explorer Karl Mauch, who visited in 1871 and refused to believe that indigenous Africans could have built such an extensive network of monuments.
“I do not think that I am far wrong if I suppose that the ruin on the hill is a copy of Solomon’s Temple on Mount Moriah,” Mauch declared, “and the building in the plain a copy of the palace where the Queen of Sheba lived during her visit to Solomon.” He further stated that only a “civilised nation must once have lived there” – his racist implication unmistakeable.
Other European writers, also believing that Africans did not have the capacity to build anything of the significance of Great Zimbabwe, suggested it was built by Portuguese travellers, Arabs, Chinese or Persians. Another theory was that the site could have been the work of a southern African tribe of ancient Jewish heritage, the Lemba.
Adding to the mystery, the indigenous people living around the site were said to believe it was the work of demons, or aliens, on account of its impressive size and the perfection of its workmanship.
In 1905, however, the British archaeologist David Randall-MacIver concluded the ruins were medieval, and built by one or more of the local African Bantu peoples. His findings were confirmed by another British archaeologist, Gertrude Caton-Thompson, in 1929, and this remains the consensus today. In the language of the builders’ descendents, the Shona people who live in the region today, Zimbabwe means “big stone houses” or “venerated houses.”
The city’s buildings were made of impressive granite walls, embellished with turrets, towers, decorations and elegantly sculpted stairways. The most notable of the buildings, an enclosure 250 metres in circumference and 9.75 metres high, was crafted with 900,000 pieces of professionally sliced granite blocks, laid on each other without any binders. Its perimeter columns were decorated with soapstone sculptures of a silhouetted bird with human lips and five-fingered feet.
More than 4,000 gold and 500 copper mines were found around the site, and it was suggested that for three centuries, 40 percent of the world’s total mined gold came from the area, compounding to an estimated 600 tonnes of gold. Thousands of necklaces made of gold lamé have been discovered among the ruins.
Great Zimbabwe’s prosperity came from its position on the route between the gold producing regions of the area and ports on the Mozambique coast; over time it became the heart of an extensive commercial and trading network. The main trading items ranged from gold, ivory, copper and tin to cattle and cowrie shells. Imported items discovered in the ruins have included glassware from Syria, a minted coin from Kilwa, and assorted Persian and Chinese ceramics.
The period of prosperity at Great Zimbabwe continued until the mid-15th century, when the city’s trading activity started to decline and its people began to migrate elsewhere. The most common hypothesis to explain the abandonment of the site is a shortage of food, pastures and natural resources in Great Zimbabwe and its immediate surroundings. But the precise cause remains unclear.
Great Zimbabwe is a fusion of manmade and natural beauty - a complex of 12 groups of buildings spread over 80 stunning hectares of the Mutirikwi valley. In the words of the Zimbabwean archaeologist and art historian Peter Garlake, the site displays “an architecture that was unparalleled elsewhere in Africa or beyond.”
The ruins are divided into three main architectural zones: the Hill Complex, the Great Enclosure and the Valley Complex. The oldest, the Hill Complex, was occupied from the ninth to the 13th centuries. Believed to have been the spiritual and religious centre of the city, its ruins extend some 100 metres by 45 metres.
Notable features of the Hill Complex included a huge boulder in a shape similar to that of the Zimbabwe Bird, from where the king presided over every important ritual, such as the judgment of criminals, the appeasing of ancestors and sacrifices to rainmaker gods. The sacrifices happened over a raised platform below the king’s seat, where oxen were burned. If the smoke went straight up, the ancestors were appeased. If it was crooked, they were unhappy and another sacrifice must be made.
South of the Hill Complex lies the Great Enclosure, occupied from the 13th to the 15th centuries: a spectacular circular monument made of cut granite blocks. Its outer wall, five metres thick, extends some 250 metres and has a maximum height of 11 metres, making it the largest ancient structure in Africa south of the Sahara.
The most fascinating thing about the Great Enclosure walls is the absence of sharp angles; from the air they are said to resemble a “giant grey bracelet.” A narrow passage just inside the walls leads to a conical tower, the use of which has been the subject of much speculation – from symbolic grain bin to phallic symbol.
The last part of the ruins is the Valley Complex: a series of living ensembles made up of daga (earth and mud-brick) houses, scattered throughout the valley and occupied from the 14th to 16th centuries.
Here lived about 2,000 goldsmiths and equally numerous potters, weavers, blacksmiths and stonemasons – who would heat large granite rocks in a fire before tossing water on the red-hot rock. The shock of cold water cracked the granite along fracture planes into brick-shaped pieces that could be stacked without the need for mortar to secure them. Millions upon millions of these pieces were produced in the plains below and hauled up the hill, as the city constantly expanded.
The function of its massive, non-supportive walls have various interpretations: some believe they were martial and defensive, or that they were a symbolic show of authority, designed to preserve the privacy of royal families and set them apart from commoners.
Unfortunately, the ruins have been damaged over the last two centuries – not least due to the British journalist Richard Nicklin Hall, who in 1902 was appointed curator of Great Zimbabwe by the British South Africa Company for the purposes “not [of] scientific research, but the preservation of the building.”
Hall destroyed a significant part of the site, claiming he was removing the “filth and decadence of the Kaffir [ie African] occupation.” In his search for signs that the city had been created by white builders, layers of archeological deposits up to four metres deep were lost.
Reconstruction attempts by Zimbabwe nationalists since 1980 have caused further damage – as have some of the roughly 20,000 tourists who visit the site every year, climbing the walls for thrills and to find souvenirs.
Political and ideological battles have also been fought over the ruins. In 1890, the British mining magnate and coloniser Cecil Rhodes financed archeologist James Theodore Bent, who was sent to South Rhodesia by the British Association of Science with instructions to “prove” the Great Zimbabwe civilisation was not built by local Africans.
The government of Ian Smith, prime minister of Southern Rhodesia (modern Zimbabwe) until 1979, continued the colonial falsification of the city’s origins in official guide books, which showed images of Africans bowing down to the foreigners who had allegedly built Great Zimbabwe.
In 1980, Robert Mugabe became prime minister, and the country was renamed “Zimbabwe,” in honour of the Great Zimbabwe civilisation, and its famous soapstone bird carvings were depicted in the new Zimbabwean flag. 
Yet much is still to be known about the ancient capital city. With no primary written documents discovered there or elsewhere, Great Zimbabwe’s history is derived from archaeological evidence found on the site, plus the oral history of the local Shona-speaking people, particularly regarding spiritual beliefs and building traditions.
Designated a Unesco World Heritage Site in 1986, the preservation of Great Zimbabwe – led by the National Museums and Monuments of Zimbabwe organisation – is now challenged by uncontrolled growth of vegetation, which threatens the stability of its dry stone walls. The spread of lantana, an invasive flowering shrub introduced to Zimbabwe in the early 20th century, has put added strain on the preservation work.
“Great Zimbabwe’s significance – not only in Zimbabwe’s history, but Africa’s as a whole – is immense,” says Clinton Dale Mutambo, founder of the marketing company Esaja in Harare, Zimbabwe’s capital. “How a powerful African empire built a kingdom that covered vast swaths of southern Africa is a source of pride for Zimbabweans – and something that colonial governments tried for a long time to undermine by linking this wondrous kingdom to the Phoenicians.”  Editor's Note: In the 1800s, Europeans visited the city of Great Zimbabwe. It was an abandoned medieval city. They refused to believe that Africans could have built such a city and its huge castle. Europeans destroyed a big part of the city. Hundreds of years ago, a rumor spread around Europe. People said there was a castle in Africa. It was hidden in the jungle. Ancient Africans had made it.
The castle was part of a city called Great Zimbabwe. It was built long ago. It had giant stone buildings and huge walls. Today, only some of the buildings are left. Most of them are ruins.
Some people said the city was a copy of a castle in Jerusalem. Jerusalem is an old city in the Middle East. Some Europeans did not think Africans made the city themselves. Only white people could have made it, they said. Today, these ideas seem racist. But at the time, many people believed them. 
The city's buildings were made of huge rock walls. They had fancy towers and stairways. One building was made of many pieces of sliced rock. It was decorated with pictures of a bird.
Long ago, Great Zimbabwe was a big city. Over time, people started to leave. Some historians think the people ran out of food. Others are not sure. The city's past is a mystery.
The buildings in Great Zimbabwe are special. They are not like anything else in the world. 
The ruins are divided into three areas. There are the hills, the castle and the valley.
The castle is huge. Its outer wall is over 800 feet long. Some parts are over 30 feet tall. The wall is smooth and curved. From the sky, it looks like a bracelet.
The valley is filled with houses. These are made of earth and mud. Many workers used to live there.
Sadly, the ruins have been damaged. In 1902, the British destroyed a big part of the city. They said they were throwing away African "filth."
In 1890, the British sent a historian to the ruins. They wanted him to "prove" that white people made them. For many years, the Europeans lied about the city. They said that white people had built it. 
Much is still unknown about the old African city. But the people of Zimbabwe are very proud of it.  Editor's Note: Of all the lost cities in the world, ancient Pompeii is the most ‘found’. The volcanic eruption that destroyed the Roman city also froze it in time. But now, 2,000 years later, it is alive with people who threaten its existence all over again. Perched high in the gods of the great theatre, you get a good view of the waves of tourists. They enter from left and right, then flow on towards the forum, or the baths, or the lupanar (the brothel) where the explicit, 2,000-year-old wall decorations are such a draw that visitors get pushed in one entrance and out the other with barely enough time to focus the camera lens.
Watching this apparently endless performance, and overhearing excitable talk of Elton John and David Gilmour having played gigs in the giant amphitheatre just a few nights before, it seems reasonable to conclude that the vast ruin of ancient Roman Pompeii must, of all the lost cities in the world, represent the one most found.
How it was lost is legendary. The violent eruption of Mount Vesuvius over two days in the year AD79 has inspired numerous novels, paintings, poems and dramas on stage and screen, not least an especially firey episode of Doctor Who. Goethe got it right when he wrote, after visiting Pompeii in the spring of 1787: “There have been many disasters in this world, but few have given so much delight to posterity.”
The volcano’s eruption – an initial cause of wonder that turned quickly into terror and tragedy – is recorded in a single surviving eyewitness account by Pliny the Younger. (His uncle, the Roman naval commander and natural philosopher Pliny the Elder, did not live to tell the tale.)
The Plinys, shortly after lunch one sunny afternoon in Misenum (an imperial naval base west of Vesuvius on the Bay of Naples), were distracted from their studies by the sight of an immense cloud, rising in the shape of an “umbrella pine”: branches spreading from a tall, thick trunk. The cloud of pumice and ash blasted some 20 miles into the sky, then began to collapse, pouring down on surrounding fields and towns.
As roofs buckled and broke beneath the mounting debris, most people made a run for it. Some strapped pillows to their heads as protection from the showers of rock; many left it too late. Cascades of scorching ash and toxic gases, known as pyroclastic surges, which probably reached 300C, brought instant death to the residents of Pompeii and nearby Herculaneum, along with numerous smaller settlements in between.
The sixth and largest surge reached Misenum, about 15 miles away from the volcano, from where the 17-year-old Pliny and his mother were forced to flee with a “frantic mob”. Chased by a dense cloud “flooding over the earth like a torrent”, they witnessed the shoreline recede in advance of a tsunami before being shrouded in darkness; the deep gloom only intensified the shouts, shrieks and cries of desperate men, women and children.
Meanwhile, Pliny the Elder, driven by his curiosity as a naturalist and his duty as an admiral, sailed south to the stricken town of Stabiae. Here he got a closer look at “all the phenomena of that dreadful scene”, and eventually acknowledged the urgency of a rescue mission – only to be choked by fumes on the beach. When his body was discovered three days later it looked, according to his nephew, “more like that of a man asleep than one who had died”.
Pliny’s description of his uncle could be a metaphor for how Pompeii itself has been imagined, ever since 18th-century Europe became in thrall to the architectural and artistic antiquities that were being discovered in the formal excavations of the site, which began in 1748.
Encapsulating what the Cambridge classics professor and excavations expert Andrew Wallace-Hadrill calls a “paradox of the survival of the past”, Pompeii was preserved in the process of being destroyed. The cataclysmic nature of its sudden loss – as opposed to abandonment, or transformation over time, or devastation by enemy force – served not only to stop the remaining inhabitants literally in their tracks, but to conserve traces of their lives, and very bodies, as if frozen in time.
Between the rows of terracotta pots and assorted amphorae that are packed into the forum’s granary in the manner of an ancient lost property office, a figure crouches in palpable despair, its hands raised in a bid to cover its face. Although arranged much like the empty vessels on either side, this ghoulish form embodies human remains discovered by Amedeo Maiuri, Pompeii’s chief archaeologist from 1924 to 1961.
Following a technique pioneered by the director of excavations in the 1860s, Giuseppe Fiorelli, Maiuri’s team poured plaster into the void left by the body in the hardened volcanic ash. The resulting cast is commonly known as the “muleteer”, or mule man, after the skeleton of a mule or donkey found nearby. For Maiuri, he was “like a beggar on the church steps … A tragic figure from one of Dante’s circles of hell.”
Today, visitors show their sympathy for this pitiful, hunched Pompeian by throwing loose change into a fountain bowl that has been placed invitingly at his side.
The urge to share our humanity with the mule man signals the enduring immediacy and emotive power of the hundred or so plaster casts made since the 19th century: the lost city’s living dead. It doesn’t matter that we might be looking at a reproduction. As we peer through railings and dusty cabinets at the slightly twisted body of a tiny toddler or the contorted form of a dog, still struggling to break free from its collar and chain as it was subsumed by the lethal surge, history seems to play out in front of our eyes.
Thus Pompeii has the power to “turn people on to the Romans”, says the renowned classicist Mary Beard. Her bestselling book and television documentaries (her second on Pompeii, New Secrets Revealed, was screened earlier this year) demonstrate how scholarly research and scientific analysis such as CT scanning are busting stereotypes and enriching understanding of daily life in the town – which was less a city, as Beard points out, and more a Saffron Walden of the Roman world. It was a prosperous yet provincial colony of the empire, with a population of somewhere between 10,000 and 20,000, of which around 1,150 bodies have been found.
For the archaeologist Sophie Hay, it is not simply the state of preservation that makes Pompeii so special, but the new light she and fellow researchers are helping to shed on the everyday experiences of non-elite Romans – soldiers, street traders, slaves – and even those who came before the Romans. In Pompeii, the ordinary is extraordinary: old loaves of bread burned to a crust; disturbingly familiar-looking surgical tools.
Walking in the grooves made by Pompeians and their carts in the streets, we find the ancients speaking to each other loudly and clearly, from the mosaic doormat spelling out Cave canem (Beware of the dog) to the graffiti they scratched on the walls: “Antiochus hung out here with his girlfriend Cithera”; “I screwed the barmaid”; “Epaphra, you are bald!”
A proverb inscribed on a wall of the basilica – “A small problem gets larger if you ignore it” – looks prophetic with the volcano looming in the background. Seismic activity in the area (a common occurrence, according to Pliny) was a warning to the locals that Vesuvius might blow, but one they apparently did not heed. Pompeii was under large-scale reconstruction as a result of an earthquake in AD63 when it was ruined again 17 years later.
The volcano had erupted before and has done so since, most recently in 1944. “It was the most majestic and terrible sight I have ever seen, or ever expect to see,” recalled the travel writer Norman Lewis in his account of being a young intelligence officer stationed in Naples following its liberation from Nazi forces. (The allies dropped more than 150 bombs on Pompeii in 1943, causing considerable damage.)
And Vesuvius remains one of the world’s most dangerous volcanoes, with millions of people living on or near its slopes, and millions more visiting the archaeological sites every year, strangely drawn by the idea that – as the 18th-century diarist Hester Lynch Piozzi put it – “We, who today are spectators, may become spectacles to travellers of a succeeding century.”
The more urgent threat to Pompeii is, however, the wear and tear caused by tourists and the exposure to more everyday elements than the volcano. Structural collapses caused by heavy rains in recent years have prompted concern about Italy’s capability to conserve this Unesco World Heritage Site, which was listed in 1997 and since threatened with inscription on the List of World Heritage in Danger.
Action has accelerated since the EU warned last year that it would withdraw funding from the Great Pompeii Project, a programme of conservation, maintenance and restoration. The site’s superintendent, Massimo Osanna, is at pains to emphasise the enthusiasm that is now being invested alongside the euros, with architects, archaeologists and conservators hard at work on site. None the less, the city said to have been given a second life is staring a second death in the face.
In Beard’s view, it is better to hold back on digging for new answers: “One-third of the town is underground, and that is where it should stay, safe and sound, for the future,” she says. “Meanwhile we can look after the other two-thirds as best we can, delaying its collapse as far as is reasonable.”
Despite the “thrill of excavation”, Hay agrees: “Conservation of buildings has to take precedence over further excavation. The Pompeian scholar Paul Zanker calls for archaeologists to return to previously excavated parts of the city with new research questions in mind, and I think this is the best advice: to reassess what we can learn from what is already visible, rather than excavate untouched parts of the city and add to the issue of conservation.”
Besides, the excavations have thrown up more questions than they have probably answered. Looking down on the great theatre, extensively rebuilt and restored over the past century, it’s hard not to wonder if Pompeii has always survived more in our imaginations than in the ground: a city being re-lost in the process of being found.  Editor's Note: Of all the lost cities in the world, ancient Pompeii is the most "found." The volcanic eruption that destroyed the Roman city also froze it in time. But now, 2,000 years later, it is alive with people who threaten its existence all over again.  From the great stone amphitheater, or stage, one can see the center of the city of Pompeii. Visitors from all over the world walk toward the public baths. They pass by pools and 2,000-year-old wall drawings of warriors and people.
For many centuries, Pompeii was a lost city.
Mount Vesuvius is a famous volcano. Almost 2,000 years ago, the volcano buried Pompeii in lava and ash. The city disappeared. The story of Pompeii has been told in books, plays, movies and TV shows.
All the stories come mainly from one written report. A teenager named Pliny the Younger wrote it down. He had just finished lunch with his uncle, Admiral Pliny the Elder. It was a sunny afternoon. They were near the Bay of Naples, in Italy. About 15 miles away, a huge dark cloud started moving toward them. It looked like an umbrella. Showers of rocks and ash started raining down on them.
Roofs crashed in. The 17-year-old Pliny, his mother and everyone began to run. As they ran, they saw the beach disappear. A giant wave of water rushed in. Then the clouds of ash turned day into the blackest night.
Admiral Pliny the Elder sailed off to try and save the people of Pompeii. He died trying to help them. Many people died. 
All of the people of Pompeii who died were buried under the ash. The ash turned hard like stone for almost 1,700 years. In 1748, scientists began to dig down into Pompeii. They found that the people who died almost looked like they were still alive. They were frozen in time. One was sitting on a couch. Another was standing near his donkey, and a woman was raising her hands to the sky. 
The diggers found empty spaces in the hard dark ash. The spaces looked like people.  Some people were sitting. Others were standing. Teams of scientists poured plastic cement into the empty spaces. Each one looked like a statue of a person.
More than 100 cement statues of bodies were made. Many looked like the people were trying to escape. Around 1,150 bodies have been found so far. Between 10,000 and 20,000 people lived in Pompeii.
"You Are Bald!”
Mary Beard has written a book and done two television shows about Pompeii. She found out that the places around Mount Vesuvius were not like the big Roman cities. They were smaller, country towns. Not just people were found in Pompeii. There were animals, like mules and dogs. There was food, such as loaves of bread and bottles of wine.
There were doormats that warned, "beware of the dog." They also found graffiti on the walls. One read: “Epaphra, you are bald!”
On the wall of a church was written: “A small problem gets larger if you ignore it." It seemed to warn the people that something bad was going to happen. At the time, Pliny the Younger wrote about small earthquakes in the area. No one listened to him.
The volcano has erupted more than 30 times. The last time was in 1944. 
Vesuvius is still one of the world’s most dangerous volcanoes. Millions of people live near it. Pompeii has other problems, too. Weather, heavy rains and thousands of visitors are hurting the city. Some buildings and monuments might fall down. Many governments are trying to save the city. The United Nations says Pompeii is one of the most important places in the world.
Some people think that saving certain parts of Pompeii is ruining other parts.
Beard wants new digging to stop. “One-third of the town is underground,” she says. She wants it to stay underground. It is safe there. She wants people to work harder saving the other two-thirds that is now out in the open. It needs to be more protected from weather and more visitors.
Many people worry that the city of Pompeii could be lost again while it is still being found. 
Lost Cities: Babylon, how war almost erased our "greatest heritage site"
Editor's Note: This is the story of a once-mighty city in Iraq – a microcosm of human history. Besieged by wars and weather, "restored" by Saddam Hussein, what has become of mystical Babylon? Of all the world’s lost cities, none surely can compete for evocative splendour, age or mystery with Babylon. Here on the desert plains 60 miles south of Baghdad, where the sun turns horizons into flashing pools of mercury, is where so much human history began.
Land of the Fertile Crescent, bounded by the Tigris and Euphrates rivers, this is successively the realm of Sumer and Akkad, Assyria, Babylonia, Mesopotamia and Iraq. Adam and Eve’s Garden of Eden is said to have been nearby.
If Mesopotamia is the cradle of urban civilisation, Babylon is its firstborn child. First mentioned in the 23rd century B.C., it looms larger in the records from around 1792 B.C., the beginning of the reign of Hammurabi.
Babylon’s second most famous king is remembered for his uncompromising code of laws – many ending with the ominous phrase: “He shall be put to death” – which sit today in the Louvre on an eight-foot stela of carved black diorite. Hammurabi was the first to fashion Babylon into the capital of a kingdom encompassing southern Mesopotamia and part of Assyria in northern Iraq.
But the Babylon that elicits a thrill in anyone with a passing interest in history is the city of that Old Testament anti-hero: the Jew-slaying, temple-smashing, gold-loving despot Nebuchadnezzar II, who succeeded to the throne in 605 B.C.
Flush from a whirlwind of military conquest in Egypt and Syria, Nebuchadnezzar plunged into a monumental building programme which resulted in the largest, most glorious city of the ancient world. It was a dazzling urban vista of towering temples, shrines and palaces clad in blue-glazed tiles, resplendent in gold, silver and bronze; all encircled by city walls so massive that two chariots, each drawn by four horses, could pass each other with ease on the road that ran atop them, according to the Greek geographer Strabo.
Nebuchadnezzar’s imperial frenzy of construction also produced the city’s most celebrated monument, a construction so hubristic in ambition it became the most famous building in the world, a byword for mankind’s god-rivalling arrogance. Babylonians knew it as the 91-metre tower – or ziggurat – of Etemenanki on the top of the temple of Marduk, the “house of the frontier between heaven and earth”. The rest of the world, starting with Old Testament readers, knew it as the Tower of Babel. In the words of its royal inscription:
“As to Etemenanki, the ziggurat of Babylon, of which Nabopolossar, king of Babylon, my father, my begetter, had fixed the foundation – and had raised it 30 cubits but had not erected its top, I set my hand to build it. Great cedars which were on Mount Lebanon in its forest, with my clean hands, I cut down, and placed them for its roof.”
What we know about Babylon comes from a combination of classical scholars – Herodotus, the ancient Greek historian of the fifth century B.C., foremost among them – archaeological excavations and the evidence of cuneiform texts. Herodotus provides one of the earliest and most detailed descriptions of Babylon. In his one-volume masterpiece the "Histories," he devotes 10 pages to the city, a typically Herodotean blend of fact, probable fantasy and a dollop of sex to keep his audience interested.
“Babylon lies in a wide plain, a vast city in the form of a square with sides nearly 14 miles long and a circuit of some 56 miles, and in addition to its enormous size it surpasses in splendour any city of the known world,” he begins. “It is surrounded by a broad deep moat full of water, and within the moat there is a wall 50 royal cubits wide and 200 high.”
Herodotus also provides a graphic description of the temple of Marduk, the dominant feature of the city on what was then the east bank of the Euphrates.
“The temple is a square building, two furlongs in each way, with bronze gates, and was still in existence in my time; it has a solid central tower, one furlong square, with a second erected on top of it and then a third, and so on up to eight. All eight towers can be climbed by a spiral way running round the outside, and about half-way up there are seats and a shelter for those who make the ascent to rest on. On the summit of the topmost tower stands a great temple …”
There were a number of smaller temples in this eastern, older section of the city, together with quays for merchant ships, an indicator of Babylon’s rise to fabulous prosperity through conquest and trade. Within a neat grid of streets the central and most important artery was the Processional Way, a paved road running north through the Ishtar Gate, embellished with bulls and dragons in relief, to the Bit Akitu temple, the “House of the New Year’s Festival.” Two great palace complexes rambled across 40 acres of land to the west of the Ishtar Gate, one of Babylon’s eight fortified defences.
Nebuchadnezzar’s boastful inscriptions on baked bricks, which followed the tradition of Babylonian kings relating their architectural rather than military achievements, offer valuable clues about the city. In one, he talks about work on two gates along the Processional Way.
“I laid their foundations of mortar and bricks and with shining blue glaze tiles with pictures of bulls and awful dragons I adorned the interior; mighty cedars to roof them over I caused to be stretched out, the wings of the gates of cedar wood coated with bronze, the lintels and the door knobs of brass I fastened into the openings of the gates; massive bulls of bronze and dreadful, awe-inspiring serpents I set up at their thresholds, the two gates I ornamented with great splendour to the amazement of all men. In order that the onslaught of battle might not draw nigh to Imgur-Bel, the wall of Babylon.”
In 597 B.C., Nebuchadnezzar attacked and seized Jerusalem. The Book of Kings describes how he “carried away all Jerusalem, and all the princes, and all the mighty men of valour, even 10,000 captives, and all the craftsmen and smiths: none remained, save the poorest sort of the people of the land.” It takes little imagination to see his prisoners pressed into forced labour on his megalomaniac construction projects. When he was not having enormous gold images of idols set up for popular worship on pain of death by incineration, the Babylonian king was embellishing his capital with the most opulent buildings.
Mysteriously, Herodotus makes no mention of the Hanging Gardens, one of the ancient seven wonders of the world. Diodorus the Sicilian, the first-century B.C. Greek historian, said the world’s most famous water feature was born of one man’s love for a woman. “There was likewise a hanging garden … near the citadel, not built by Semiramis, but by a later prince called Cyrus, for the sake of a courtesan, who, being a Persian, they say, by birth and coveting meadows on mountain tops, desired the king by an artificial plantation to imitate the land in Persia.”
Other accounts suggest that these lush, gravity-defying, terraced gardens were a gift from Nebuchadnezzar to his wife Amyitis. Some archaeologists believe they never really existed on the epic scale suggested by legend.
Herodotus writes about all aspects of life in Babylon, covering everything from its general geography, the tradition of brick-baking, the construction of the outer wall and the street plan of the city to the main crops grown (wheat, barley, millet, sesame and dates), the various uses of the palm tree (food, wine and honey), religious, medical and sexual practices and the types of boats used to navigate the Euphrates. He describes how the formidable city walls were built of oven-baked mud bricks laid using hot bitumen for mortar, traces of which can be spotted today where the ancient walls meet the bricks laid in the kitsch, Saddam-era restoration of the 1980s.
One of his tallest stories centres on what he calls the “wholly shameful” practice by which every Babylonian woman, rich and poor alike, was forced to sit outside the temple of Ishtar until a man throws a silver coin into her lap for the right to have sex with her. Only after she has discharged this unpleasant duty is she set free. Herodotus ends the anecdote with a characteristically high-spirited punchline. “Tall, handsome women soon manage to get home again but the ugly ones stay a long time … some of them, indeed, as much as three or four years.”
The story of Babylon is the ebb and flow of slaughter and mercy, war and peace, a microcosm of human history. It is a tale of greed, hubris, empire and religious persecution; also of human civilisation, prodigious wealth, architectural glory and religious tolerance. It encapsulates humankind’s finest and most deplorable traits, and burst onto the world’s media during the Iraq war precisely because Babylon is the source of our history. The birth of human civilisation belongs to us all.
I visited the site in November 2004, just as Polish troops were preparing to hand it over to the Iraqi authorities. The late Donny George, then head of the Iraq Museum, had warned me in Baghdad about the terrible damage done to the site by the Polish military. He was aghast at reports of soldiers filling sandbags with earth containing archaeological fragments; of armoured vehicles crushing sixth-century B.C. bricks on the Processional Way; of looters gouging out pieces of dragons from the Ishtar Gate; of digging, levelling, compacting and gravelling in this ancient city. “It’s mankind’s greatest heritage site,” he said. “You don’t just start digging it up to make more room for your tanks.”
Dr John Curtis, keeper of the Department of the Ancient Near East at the British Museum, visited Babylon in late 2004. In his report, he said it was “regrettable” that a large military base should have been established on one of the world’s most important archaeological sites. “This is tantamount to establishing a military camp around the Great Pyramid in Egypt or around Stonehenge in Britain.”
Guided by a Polish civilian with a doctorate in the archaeology of death, I walked through the Ishtar Gate in the sandalled footsteps of both Cyrus the Great and Alexander, who took Babylon in 539 B.C. and 331 B.C. respectively – Alexander ordered the famous ziggurat to be levelled and died before it could be reconstructed. The gaudy gate is a replica of the original, carted off by German archaeologists in 1914, together with most of the lions in relief that once decorated the walls of the Processional Way and now stand in the Pergamon Museum in Berlin.
Sections of the Processional Way, having shed their glazed revetment, glowed in the sun like giant teeth decorated with Nebuchadnezzar’s “awful dragons” and bulls. A colony of pigeons landed among the high-walled ruins to rest in the sun and shit all over history.
It was easy to be despondent. While wars routinely shape history, dispose of old powers and bring new ones to the fore, in Babylon, war seemed not to have shaped history so much as to have erased it altogether.
Yet this wasn’t entirely true. The Saddam-era restoration, anathema to professional archaeologists, had at least given Iraqis something to look at amid the forlorn mounds, ruins and piles of rubble. As the Iraqi art historian Dr Lamia al Gailani put it: “Ruins in Iraq are ugly for most people. Ordinary Iraqis want something they can be impressed by like this.” And amid this Despot’s Disney, there were historical parallels between Nebuchadnezzar’s boasts in burnt brickwork and those of his 20th-century successor (“This was built by Saddam Hussein, son of Nebuchadnezzar, to glorify Iraq”).
The truth is that Babylon had long ago been brought to earth, besieged by wars, weather and time. The looting and levelling in 2003 were merely the latest attack on the shrinking fabric of the city, seat of a world-spanning empire which had given its name to denote greatness, untold wealth and ostentation, not to mention decadence and debauchery (the Oxford English Dictionary called it “the mystical city of the Apocalypse”).
Though its most ancient ruins are virtually extinct, through its cycle of destruction and reconstruction and in our collective memory of what it means to be human, Babylon will always endure. 
Lost Cities: Babylon, how war almost erased our "greatest heritage site"
Editor's Note: This is the story of a once-mighty city in Iraq called Babylon. It is one of the oldest cities in history. It has suffered through many wars and changes. What does mystical Babylon look like today?
 Babylon is one of the oldest and most beautiful cities in our history. The city was between the Tigris and Euphrates rivers. The place it was in used to be called Mesopotamia. Now it is known as Iraq.
Hammurabi was one of the most famous Babylonian kings. He was the first to make written laws. Anyone who broke these laws was usually killed. The laws were carved onto a stone eight feet tall for everyone to see. 
But the most famous Babylonian king is Nebuchadnezzar II. This king turned Babylon into a beautiful city. He did this to show off his power. He built a large tower, the famous Tower of Babel. It is mentioned in the Bible. Babylonians knew it as the ziggurat of Etemenanki. 
Much of the workforce was made up of war prisoners. Nebuchadnezzar had attacked and seized Jerusalem. Most of the Jewish people were forced to work on the king's buildings. 
Babylon was surrounded by huge walls. Palaces were painted in blue, and shimmered with gold and silver. The most important street was the Processional Way. This road ran north through the Ishtar Gate. The gate was covered with bulls and dragons made of stone.
Another famous part of the city was the Hanging Gardens. One story says that they were built by Prince Cyrus. He was in love with a woman who came to Babylon from Persia. She missed her home, so he built the gardens to remind her of it.
Now, there is war in Iraq. When the war started, many people became interested in the history of Babylon. I visited the remains of the city in 2004. At the time, the Polish army was all over the city. Soldiers had moved dirt containing parts of the old buildings. Tanks had crushed the bricks on the Processional Way. Looters had taken out pieces of the dragons on the Ishtar Gate. 
I followed a guide through the Ishtar Gate. The remains had been taken off to Germany in 1914. Bricks on the Processional Way were missing. The ziggurat had already been destroyed by Alexander the Great. This was the king who controlled much of that part of the world a long time ago.
Babylon has already gone through so much destruction. Even so, it will always stay in our imagination. It was the beginning of our common history. 
ditor's Note: Pliny the Younger was born in Italy in 62 A.D. He is best-known for letters he wrote describing the great eruption of Vesuvius in which his uncle Pliny the Elder perished. Pliny the Elder was a famous scholar and military leader, holding the position of prefect of the Roman navy that was stationed at Misenum (now Miseno), a port city in the Bay of Naples, Italy. And so, Pliny the Elder was in charge of the western Mediterranean. When he realized that Mount Vesuvius posed a great danger, he turned the warships he commanded into rescue boats. Pliny died while saving his fellow Roman citizens. Below are two letters Pliny the Younger wrote to Tacitus, a senator of the Roman Empire, after the volcano erupted and his uncle had died. He was at that time with the fleet under his command at Misenum. On the 24th of August, about one in the afternoon, my mother desired him to observe a cloud which appeared of a very unusual size and shape. He had just taken a turn in the sun and, after bathing himself in cold water and making a light luncheon, gone back to his books: he immediately arose and went out upon a rising ground from whence he might get a better sight of this very uncommon appearance. A cloud, from which mountain was uncertain, at this distance (but it was found afterwards to come from Mount Vesuvius), was ascending, the appearance of which I cannot give you a more exact description of than by likening it to that of a pine tree, for it shot up to a great height in the form of a very tall trunk, which spread itself out at the top into a sort of branches; occasioned, I imagine, either by a sudden gust of air that impelled it, the force of which decreased as it advanced upwards, or the cloud itself being pressed back again by its own weight, expanded in the manner I have mentioned; it appeared sometimes bright and sometimes dark and spotted, according as it was either more or less impregnated with earth and cinders. This phenomenon seemed to a man of such learning and research as my uncle extraordinary and worth further looking into.
He ordered a light vessel to be got ready, and gave me leave, if I liked, to accompany him. I said I had rather go on with my work; and it so happened, he had himself given me something to write out. As he was coming out of the house, he received a note from Rectina, the wife of Bassus, who was in the utmost alarm at the imminent danger which threatened her; for her villa lying at the foot of Mount Vesuvius, there was no way of escape but by sea; she earnestly entreated him therefore to come to her assistance. He accordingly changed his first intention, and what he had begun from a philosophical, he now carries out in a noble and generous spirit. He ordered the galleys to be put to sea, and went himself on board with an intention of assisting not only Rectina, but the several other towns which lay thickly strewn along that beautiful coast. Hastening then to the place from whence others fled with the utmost terror, he steered his course direct to the point of danger, and with so much calmness and presence of mind as to be able to make and dictate his observations upon the motion and all the phenomena of that dreadful scene. He was now so close to the mountain that the cinders, which grew thicker and hotter the nearer he approached, fell into the ships, together with pumice- stones, and black pieces of burning rock: they were in danger too not only of being aground by the sudden retreat of the sea, but also from the vast fragments which rolled down from the mountain, and obstructed all the shore. Here he stopped to consider whether he should turn back again; to which the pilot advising him, "Fortune," said he, "favours the brave; steer to where Pomponianus is."
Pomponianus was then at Stabiae, separated by a bay, which the sea, after several insensible windings, forms with the shore. He had already sent his baggage on board; for though he was not at that time in actual danger, yet being within sight of it, and indeed extremely near, if it should in the least increase, he was determined to put to sea as soon as the wind, which was blowing dead in-shore, should go down. It was favourable, however, for carrying my uncle to Pomponianus, whom he found in the greatest consternation: he embraced him tenderly, encouraging and urging him to keep up his spirits, and, the more effectually to soothe his fears by seeming unconcerned himself, ordered a bath to be got ready, and then, after having bathed, sat down to supper with great cheerfulness, or at least (what is just as heroic) with every appearance of it. Meanwhile broad flames shone out in several places from Mount Vesuvius, which the darkness of the night contributed to render still brighter and clearer. But my uncle, in order to soothe the apprehensions of his friend, assured him it was only the burning of the villages, which the country people had abandoned to the flames: after this he retired to rest, and it is most certain he was so little disquieted as to fall into a sound sleep: for his breathing, which, on account of his corpulence, was rather heavy and sonorous, was heard by the attendants outside.
The court which led to his apartment being now almost filled with stones and ashes, if he had continued there any time longer, it would have been impossible for him to have made his way out. So he was awoke and got up and went to Pomponianus and the rest of his company, who were feeling too anxious to think of going to bed. They consulted together whether it would be most prudent to trust to the houses, which now rocked from side to side with frequent and violent concussions as though shaken from their very foundations; or fly to the open fields, where the calcined stones and cinders, though light indeed, yet fell in large showers, and threatened destruction. In this choice of dangers they resolved for the fields: a resolution which, while the rest of the company were hurried into by their fears, my uncle embraced upon cool and deliberate consideration. They went out then, having pillows tied upon their heads with napkins; and this was their whole defence against the storm of stones that fell round them. It was now day everywhere else, but there a deeper darkness prevailed than in the thickest night; which however was in some degree alleviated by torches and other lights of various kinds. They thought proper to go farther down upon the shore to see if they might safely put out to sea, but found the waves still running extremely high, and boisterous.
There my uncle, laying himself down upon a sail cloth, which was spread for him, called twice for some cold water, which he drank, when immediately the flames, preceded by a strong whiff of sulphur, dispersed the rest of the party, and obliged him to rise. He raised himself up with the assistance of two of his servants, and instantly fell down dead; suffocated, as I conjecture, by some gross and noxious vapour, having always had a weak throat, which was often inflamed. As soon as it was light again, which was not till the third day after this melancholy accident, his body was found entire, and without any marks of violence upon it, in the dress in which he fell, and looking more like a man asleep than dead. 
There had been noticed for many days before a trembling of the earth, which did not alarm us much, as this is quite an ordinary occurrence in Campania; but it was so particularly violent that night that it not only shook but actually overturned, as it would seem, everything about us. My mother rushed into my chamber, where she found me rising, in order to awaken her. We sat down in the open court of the house, which occupied a small space between the buildings and the sea. As I was at that time but eighteen years of age, I know not whether I should call my behaviour, in this dangerous juncture, courage or folly; but I took up Livy, and amused myself with turning over that author, and even making extracts from him, as if I had been perfectly at my leisure. Just then, a friend of my uncle's, who had lately come to him from Spain, joined us, and observing me sitting by my mother with a book in my hand, reproved her for her calmness, and me at the same time for my careless security: nevertheless I went on with my author.
Though it was now morning, the light was still exceedingly faint and doubtful; the buildings all around us tottered, and though we stood upon open ground, yet as the place was narrow and confined, there was no remaining without imminent danger: we therefore resolved to quit the town. A panic-stricken crowd followed us, and (as to a mind distracted with terror every suggestion seems more prudent than its own) pressed on us in dense array to drive us forward as we came out. Being at a convenient distance from the houses, we stood still, in the midst of a most dangerous and dreadful scene. The chariots, which we had ordered to be drawn out, were so agitated backwards and forwards, though upon the most level ground, that we could not keep them steady, even by supporting them with large stones.
The sea seemed to roll back upon itself, and to be driven from its banks by the convulsive motion of the earth; it is certain at least the shore was considerably enlarged, and several sea animals were left upon it. On the other side, a black and dreadful cloud, broken with rapid, zigzag flashes, revealed behind it variously shaped masses of flame: these last were like sheet-lightning, but much larger. We had scarcely sat down when night came upon us, not such as we have when the sky is cloudy, or when there is no moon, but that of a room when it is shut up, and all the lights put out. You might hear the shrieks of women, the screams of children, and the shouts of men; some calling for their children, others for their parents, others for their husbands, and seeking to recognize each other by the voices that replied; one lamenting his own fate, another that of his family; some wishing to die, from the very fear of dying; some lifting their hands to the gods; but the greater part convinced that there were now no gods at all, and that the final endless night of which we have heard had come upon the world.
Among these there were some who augmented the real terrors by others imaginary or wilfully invented. I remember some who declared that one part of Misenum had fallen, that another was on fire; it was false, but they found people to believe them. It now grew rather lighter, which we imagined to be rather the forerunner of an approaching burst of flames (as in truth it was) than the return of day: however, the fire fell at a distance from us: then again we were immersed in thick darkness, and a heavy shower of ashes rained upon us, which we were obliged every now and then to stand up to shake off, otherwise we should have been crushed and buried in the heap. I might boast that, during all this scene of horror, not a sigh, or expression of fear, escaped me, had not my support been grounded in that miserable, though mighty, consolation, that all mankind were involved in the same calamity, and that I was perishing with the world itself. At last this dreadful darkness was dissipated by degrees, like a cloud or smoke; the real day returned, and even the sun shone out, though with a lurid light, as when an eclipse is coming on. Every object that presented itself to our eyes (which were extremely weakened) seemed changed, being covered deep with ashes as if with snow.
We returned to Misenum, where we refreshed ourselves as well as we could, and passed an anxious night between hope and fear; though, indeed, with a much larger share of the latter: for the earthquake still continued, while many frenzied persons ran up and down heightening their own and their friends' calamities by terrible predictions. However, my mother and I, notwithstanding the danger we had passed, and that which still threatened us, had no thoughts of leaving the place, till we could receive some news of my uncle.  
Editor's Note: Pliny the Younger was born in Italy almost 2,000 years ago. He wrote letters about the eruption of Mount Vesuvius. His uncle was named Pliny the Elder. His uncle was a leader of the Roman navy. His headquarters was at Misenum. It is now known as Miseno in the Bay of Naples. Pliny the Elder died trying to rescue people. Pliny the Younger wrote letters to Tacitus, a Roman lawmaker.
 My uncle was with the navy at Misenum. On August 24, in the afternoon, my mother asked him to look at a cloud. It was rising quickly in the sky. It looked like a pine tree with a very tall trunk. Sometimes, the cloud looked bright and sometimes dark. The cloud had earth and glowing cinders in it.
My uncle ordered a boat. He told me that I could go with him, but I wanted to work. He decided to save the towns on the shore and got on a warship.
As he got closer to the volcano, the cinders were thicker and hotter. They fell onto the ships. Pieces of burning rock also hit the ship. My uncle stopped to decide if he should turn back. He said brave people have good luck. He told the pilot to steer to Stabiae, where his friend lived.
When he got there, my uncle hugged Pomponianus and told him not to worry. He and Pomponianus decided it would be safer to escape to the fields. They tied pillows on their heads. It was daytime, but it was darker than the night. My uncle lay down on the beach. He asked for a drink. He raised himself up and fell down dead. The earth was shaking and tossed around all of our belongings. I was 18 years old at the time. I began reading a book as if nothing was wrong. It was unsafe to stay, so my mother and I decided to leave town.
There was a black cloud with zigzag flashes of light. Behind the cloud were flames. People were yelling and some were crying. It was so dark that no one could see each other. Some people prayed to the gods, but most thought the world was ending. Ash rained down on us. We stood up and shook the ash off. If we didn't, we would have been buried in it. At last, the sun began to shine. Ash covered everything and looked like snow. We returned to Misenum. My mother and I did not want to leave there until we heard what had happened to my uncle.
From "Selected Letters of Pliny the Younger." It was translated by William Melmoth (in Havard Classics series). A new era in human history began in 1492 as the four world zones became connected. For the first time, humans created truly global networks. 
Now plants, animals, and people could and did move in all directions across the Atlantic Ocean and the Pacific Ocean. Historians have called this new movement across the Atlantic the Columbian Exchange. To understand the consequences of the Columbian Exchange, I’m going to investigate the impact of the movement of plants, animals, and people across the Atlantic between 1492 and 1850. My goal is to see what effect the new global networks had on the different peoples and regions of the Earth.
What was exchanged between 1492 and 1850? 
I start my historical investigations by asking questions that will result in a simple description of what happened. What was exchanged on the new Atlantic networks? What things moved east or west across the Atlantic?
I began to answer these questions by gathering information from a number of history and science books. I created the map and chart below using information from two of these sources.
Both are by Alfred W. Crosby: The Columbian Exchange: Biological and Cultural Consequences of 1492 and Ecological Imperialism: The Biological Expansion of Europe, 900-1900. 
The map and chart show what items moved back and forth across the Atlantic in the Columbian Exchange.
I was surprised that horses, sheep, honeybees, earthworms, sugarcane, wheat, fruits, coffee plants, and diseases came over to the Americas with European travelers. All these things have been common in the Americas for some time, so I had assumed they were always here. It’s hard to imagine North America without horses, cattle, honeybees, earthworms, and coffee.
I was also surprised to learn that tomatoes, corn, potatoes, and turkeys traveled for the first time to Europe after 1492. According to the authorities I consulted, before the Columbian Exchange, foods like potatoes, tomatoes, chili peppers, and cocoa didn’t grow in Europe, Africa, or Asia. There is no evidence that Afro-Eurasian people knew about or used these foods. Today, I can’t imagine Italian food without tomatoes or food from India without chili peppers. Some of the exchange that went on was intentional. The Europeans planned to introduce new crops and animals into the Americas. For example, Spanish explorers brought olive trees on board their ships for the purpose of planting them in the New World. And the Europeans also introduced crops such as sugar, coffee, cotton, and ginger, hoping these would grow well in the Americas so they could sell them back in Europe. Those crops did grow quite well in Brazil, the Caribbean, and in North America. Tobacco, a crop that was native to South America, joined sugar, coffee, and various spices to become very important commodities that Europeans traded around the world. Historians J.R. McNeill and his father, William McNeill, argue in their book, The Human Web, that the movement of these “economic plants was often a very deliberate affair, organized by royal authorities seeking to maximize their revenues or advance the cause of science.”
However, some exchange was unintentional. Seeds traveled as “secret passengers” in other food sources. For example, historian Luis Martin claimed that in 1535, Inés Muñoz (sister-in-law of the explorer and conqueror Francisco Pizarro and one of the dozen or so European women who lived in Lima, Peru, at the time) got a barrel of rice from Spain. She noticed that in the barrel were a few grains of wheat. Muñoz wondered if the wheat would grow in Peru so she planted a few grains of wheat in a flowerpot. Soon, healthy spikes of wheat grew from those first few grains, so Muñoz tried to replant these in the soil of Peru. According to Martin, the wheat crop grew so well that within three or four years people began to produce bread in Peru.
In addition to these new crops, Europeans also introduced new animals to the Americas, such as horses, pigs, goats, sheep, and cattle. Some historians argue that these animals were far more important to the indigenous people of the Americas than were the new crops. I can imagine how valuable the horses were for labor and transportation, and how their use also helped people maintain control of herds of cattle or sheep.
New diseases also traveled to America, including microorganisms that carried smallpox, measles, and malaria. The natives had never been exposed to the diseases that Europeans unintentionally carried with them. I learned that the spread of these new diseases was catastrophic for them.
Now that we have descriptions of what crossed to America and from America, it’s time to investigate the consequences and impact of these new plants, animals, and microorganisms on the people of the different regions of the world.
Plants from the Americas quickly had a positive impact in Europe, Asia, and Africa. According to the McNeills, maize (corn), cassava (manioc) and potatoes had a very great effect on people’s diets in Africa, Europe, and Asia. Each crop grew fast, withstood droughts well, was easy to store, and gave very high yield in calories. Therefore, people in Europe, Africa, and Asia were able to grow these effectively and these crops increased the variety of food people could eat as well as providing them far more energy than other plants. Maize, cassava, and potatoes, along with other American plants such as peanuts, tomatoes, and beans soon spread throughout the world.
With improved diets, I would expect population to grow. But was population growing equally everywhere?
I wondered, did the indigenous people experience a growth in population, particularly with new diseases coming into the Americas? I must remind myself that before 1492, the civilizations of the Americas were highly successful. Like most agrarian civilizations, they had cities, monumental architecture, labor specialization, and vast populations. How then were such a relatively small group of Europeans able to conquer and control these civilizations?
In the Big History Project video Re-creating Pangaea, historian Charles Mann argues that there are two main reasons why small groups of Europeans succeeded in dominating and essentially conquering vast numbers of native people in the Americas in a relatively short period of time. One of the reasons, Mann argues, were the biological factors that led to what we now call “the great dying.”
For the first time, natives were exposed to new infections, which had a catastrophic impact on their population. Exactly how many people actually died? And how can we possibly know who died? What sources would we need to consult?
To begin this part of my research, I found two different estimates for population: The first, published in 1954 (M.K. Bennett’s The World’s Food: A Study of the Interrelations of World Populations, National Diets, and Food Potentials) and the second, published in 1979 (J.R. Biraben’s "Essai sur l’évolution du nombre des hommes," which David Christian quotes in Maps of Time: An Introduction to Big History). I put them together in the chart below. 
Let’s ignore the difference between the numbers the demographers used in 1954 and 1979 for a few minutes to look at the trends in each region. What happened to the population in the Americas between 1400 and 1700? What happened to the population in Africa between 1400 and 1700? How about Europe, India, and China? Were there any quite dramatic increases or decreases in population in any one of the regions?
The figures for the Americas between 1500 and 1700 really stand out. This region of the world had a very significant decline in population, losing somewhere around 30 million people during that time. There is no other region of the world that had such a dramatic drop in population. China, India, and Europe had quite dramatic growth in population over that time. Africa either had very modest growth or, according to some, a decline, but nowhere near the decline seen in the Americas.
Two questions about these figures come to mind: Why are there differences in population estimates? What explains the decline in population in the Americas?
My best guess as to why there are differences in the numbers between 1954 and 1979 is that historians and demographers were looking at different sources of evidence in those two time periods. In general, Europeans and the Chinese did keep track of their own population numbers through census data — counting the population — which I’m guessing they did mainly for financial reasons. They had to keep track of who needed to pay taxes to the government. This type of tracking may have extended to the countries they traded with, namely India and Africa. However, the difference in numbers in India and China are really striking. It appears that the population of China was greatly exaggerated in 1954, while the population of India was greatly underestimated. In 1954, both India and China were in political turmoil, which may have made it difficult to get accurate numbers from reliable records. By 1979, things had settled down a bit in both countries.
I already learned about the “great dying” among the native population of the Americas due to their lack of resistance to European diseases. The historian Robert McCaa agrees that “a demographic disaster occurred and that epidemic disease was a dominant factor.” However, McCaa adds that it was more than just disease that had such a catastrophic impact on these people. To understand why there was such a huge population decline, we also need to remember the “massive harsh treatment (forced migration, enslavement, abusive labor demand, and exorbitant tribute payments) and ecological devastation accompanying Spanish colonization.” So it’s actually the combination of disease, harsh treatment and the decimation of their food sources that led to an almost 55 percent decline in the native people living in Mexico.
Historians often work from partial evidence and must make reasonable explanations based on that evidence. Still, even if there is enough evidence to identify the exact number of people who died over that 200-year period, two things seem to be clear. First, the loss of human life was devastating and must have destabilized the agrarian civilizations that had been thriving in the Americas. Second, the diseases that Europeans brought with them must have contributed to their ability to conquer these civilizations.
So what were the consequences of the Columbian Exchange? Based on my analysis of the charts above, I can say that for the first time, the world’s separate regions were truly connected via the exchange of goods across the oceans. Historians J.R. and William McNeill believe these are some of the main consequences of the exchange:
—It made the world slightly richer – more goods on the move, more cash changing hands. More crops were spread over larger portions of the globe.
—It made the disease pools more homogeneous, as more and more people were exposed to the same diseases and developed new resistance to them.
—It made the world more unequal because some populations were better able to take advantage of the new connections than others.
Yet the pace of change was still relatively slow. It still took a month to cross the Atlantic by ship. It still took over a year for people, goods, and information to circulate the globe. So while the networks had increased, the rate at which stuff moved was slow. 
Christopher Columbus sailed from Spain to the New World in 1492. His voyage connected Europe and the Americas. It began a new period of human history.
Plants and animals started moving back and forth across the Atlantic Ocean. Historians call this the Columbian Exchange. It was named after Columbus.
The Columbian Exchange created global networks. What effect did these networks have on people around the world?
What was exchanged between 1492 and 1850? 
First, I want to answer some basic questions. What was exchanged between Europe and the Americas? What moved east? What moved west?
To answer these questions, I looked at two books by historian Alfred W. Crosby. The first is The Columbian Exchange: Biological and Cultural Consequences of 1492. The second is Ecological Imperialism: The Biological Expansion of Europe, 900-1900.
The map and chart show what items moved back and forth across the Atlantic in the Columbian Exchange. 
The Europeans who came to the Americas brought many things with them. Some of them surprised me. Animals like horses, sheep, and earthworms made the trip. Plants like sugarcane, wheat, fruit, and coffee crossed the ocean. These plants and animals had never before been seen in the Americas. 
Many items made the reverse trip from the Americas to Europe after 1492. They included corn, potatoes, turkeys, tomatoes, chili peppers, and cocoa. Before that, none of those things were found in Europe, Africa, or Asia.
Some of the exchanges happened on purpose. In their book, The Human Web, historians J.R. McNeill and William McNeill explain that people were able to make money bringing plants to new places. However, some of these exchanges happened by accident. Seeds sometimes traveled as “secret passengers," mixed in with other foods.
The Columbian Exchange sent new kinds of foods all across the world. As a result, people's diets improved. They now had more foods to choose from. 
I expected that better diets would lead to larger populations. I wondered: Did the Columbian Exchange make populations grow? If so, did populations grow equally everywhere?
As I began my research, I found two different estimates for population. The first was by M.K. Bennett and was published in 1954. The second was published in 1979 and was written by J.R. Biraben. I used information from both sources to make the chart below: 
Ignore the differences in number between 1954 and 1979. Instead, look at the trends in each part of the world.
The numbers in the Americas tell a tragic story. There was a huge change in the population there between 1500 and 1700. The region lost about 30 million people.
No other region in the world lost that many people. China, India, and Europe added more people. Africa's population did not change much.
What explains the loss of population in the Americas? Historians think it had to do with disease. When the Europeans arrived in the Americas, they brought new plants and animals. They also brought new diseases. They unintentionally carried smallpox, measles, and malaria. 
The natives had never been exposed to those diseases. Their bodies had no resistance to them. Because of this, the diseases spread quickly. Many Native Americans died. Some historians have called this event the “great dying.” 
Historian Robert McCaa agrees that disease played a large role. However, he says there were at least two other reasons as well.
One was harsh treatment. The Europeans used native people as slaves. They forced them to work and took their food. Like disease, this harsh treatment could have led to many deaths and caused the native population to shrink.
Another reason was environment damage. Some of the plants introduced by Europeans, like weeds, diseases and rats, changed the environment in parts of the Americas. They destroyed other plants and animals that were already there. This may have made it harder for natives to survive.
In the end, it was probably a combination of these three things. Disease, harsh treatment, and the destruction of food sources killed many people. In Mexico, for example, more than half of the native people died. 
The Columbian Exchange led to many changes. The whole world became connected for the first time in history. Plants and animals could now travel across oceans. 
The historians J.R. and William McNeill argue that this led to both good and bad changes. It made the world slightly richer overall. More goods were traded. More money changed hands.
Also, more crops were spread over larger areas of the planet. At the same time, more and more people were exposed to the same diseases. Those who survived developed new resistance to them. Their bodies could now fight the diseases. 
Finally, the Columbian Exchange made the world more unequal. Some groups were able to take advantage of the new connections better than others. 
For a brief period, from about 10,000 years ago to about 500 years ago, the rising seas at the end of the last Ice Age divided the world into four non-connected geographic zones. Isolated from one another, four groups of people developed distinct ways of life and conducted their own experiments in human culture.
What are world zones?
In his book Maps of Time, David Christian describes the division of the world into four world zones, which helps him analyze and explain human history. Many other historians have recognized the two largest world zones — Afro-Eurasia, which they often call the “Old World,” and the Americas, which they call the “New World.” But Christian was living in Australia, and preferred looking at the whole world. These are the four world zones that he uses:
Afro-Eurasia: Africa and the Eurasian landmass, including offshore islands like Britain and Japan.
The Americas: North, Central, and South America, plus offshore islands like the Caribbean Islands.
Australasia: Australia and the island of Papua New Guinea, plus neighboring islands in the Pacific Ocean.
The Pacific Islands: societies such as New Zealand, Micronesia, Melanesia, Hawaii.
(Antarctica is not considered a world zone because until very recently no people lived there.)
A world zone is simply a large region of human interaction, linked geographically, culturally, economically, and sometimes politically. It may have a hundred thousand to millions of people living in different types of communities. Each of the four world zones functioned as a separate world, not in regular contact with other zones until Europeans sailed to the Americas late in the fifteenth century. The world today no longer has four separate world zones — our world is increasingly global. 
For most of human history, humans existed only in Afro-Eurasia. Homo sapiens migrated to Australasia about 60,000 to 50,000 BCE and to the Americas about 20,000 to 15,000 BCE. Human interaction continued among these three areas until the melting at the end of the Ice Age caused sea levels to rise sufficiently to drown the land bridge between Asia and the Americas. There never was a land bridge between Australasia and Afro-Eurasia; a significant sea passage always existed, which is why the arrival of humans in Australasia seems such an achievement. But the passage between Afro-Eurasia and Australasia became wider, and harder to cross, after the seas rose.
The rising of the seas occurred sometime after humans got to the Americas, creating three separate world zones. The fourth world zone, the Pacific Islands, did not emerge until humans became skilled enough at sailing to reach these islands — sometime in the past 4,000 years. Hence three of the four world zones operated from about 10,000 BCE to about 1500 CE, while the fourth functioned only from about 2000 BCE to 1500 CE. After 1500, extensive travel by sea connected all of the zones and established the first global exchange network.
The rising seas cut off the four groups of humans from each other long enough for them to develop different experiments in culture and civilization, but not so long that they would develop into separate species. How amazing is that? 
Comparing human societies is a bit like deciding whether a glass is half full or half empty. You can notice how different human societies are from each other, or you can exclaim how similar they are to one another. World history and anthropology courses usually focus on the differences in human societies in the four world zones. Big History courses focus instead on the similarities of different human societies, even though they were completely separated from each other for quite a long period.
Agrarian civilizations emerged only in the two largest world zones for very specific reasons. A closer look at the four zones demonstrates that some zones had more advantages than others. Afro-Eurasia was so much larger, with better plants for food and animals better suited for transportation, that civilization emerged there several thousand years earlier than in the Americas. This gave peoples from Afro-Eurasia a decisive edge when they arrived in the Americas and found civilizations similar to theirs in structure, but earlier in their development.
The smaller two world zones were so much smaller in their habitable land mass, available resources, and population that they did not reach the density of people required for civilization in the time allowed. On the larger islands in the Pacific, like Hawaii and New Zealand’s North Island, agriculture emerged, and something very close to states. Would these societies have become states or civilizations if they had not been interrupted by conquest from the larger zones? We can never know.
In most areas of the Australasian world zone, people remained foragers until the arrival of the Europeans. Agriculture did emerge in the highlands of Papua New Guinea, but their root crops could not be stored in large quantities and villages were not easily connected. Hence, political structures beyond village life did not emerge. On the Australian mainland, widespread agriculture never developed. Soil was poor and, by chance, the available species of plants were not easy to domesticate. Still, archaeological sites show that the population was increasing in the 2,000 years before the Europeans arrived.
When you compare the four zones, it’s easy to see the advantages that people living in Afro-Eurasia had over the other regions. Its people had a head start with the earliest human habitation, the greatest geographic area, and the largest population. Afro-Eurasia also had the most varied resources and the largest networks of collective learning, which contained more — and more diverse — information than those networks existing in the smaller zones. 
When the Ice Age ended, the seas rose. For a time, rising seas divided the world. This lasted from about 10,000 years ago to about 500 years ago. Four geographic zones formed. They were separate. Four groups of people created their own cultures. The oceans kept them away from each other during this time.
What are world zones?
Historian David Christian divides the world into four zones. Many other historians focus on just the two largest world zones. They look at Afro-Eurasia and the Americas. Afro-Eurasia, the “Old World," is the largest zone. The Americas, or the “New World,” is the second largest. But Christian lived in Australia. He preferred looking at the whole world. These are the four world zones that he uses:
Afro-Eurasia: Africa and Eurasia, which is Europe and Asia. It includes islands like Britain and Japan.
The Americas: North, Central, and South America. The Caribbean Islands are included here.
Australasia: Australia and the island of Papua New Guinea. Nearby islands in the Pacific Ocean count as Australasia.
The Pacific Islands: societies such as New Zealand, Micronesia, and Hawaii.
(Antarctica is not considered a world zone. No people lived there.)
A world zone is simply a large area where humans interact. It is linked together geographically. It's also linked by things like language, religion, trade, or politics. It may have a hundred thousand people living in different types of communities. There may even be millions. Each of the four world zones was its own world for a time. There was no regular contact between the zones. That all changed when Europeans sailed to the Americas in 1492. Today, the four separate world zones are gone. Our world is now connected.
For most of human history, humans existed only in Afro-Eurasia. Humans moved to Australasia about 60,000 to 50,000 BCE. We reached the Americas about 20,000 to 15,000 BCE. Humans interacted together in these three areas until the end of the Ice Age. As the Ice Age ended, ice melted. Sea levels began to rise. Once, a land bridge connected Asia and the Americas. But the rising waters covered the land bridge. 
There never was a land bridge between Australasia and Afro-Eurasia. The only way of getting between those zones was by sea. After the seas rose, traveling between Afro-Eurasia and Australasia became even more difficult.
The seas rose after humans reached the Americas from Afro-Eurasia. Once humans arrived there, the world had three separate zones. The fourth world zone was the Pacific Islands. It developed later. Until humans became skilled enough at sailing, there was no way to reach the Pacific Islands. People's sailing skills did not become good enough to reach the islands until 4,000 years ago.
And so, three zones existed from about 10,000 BCE to about 1500 CE. The fourth was the Pacific Islands. It was only around from about 2000 BCE to 1500 CE. After 1500, all of the zones became connected through sea travel. 
The rising seas cut off the four groups of humans from each other. Humans remained separate long enough to develop different cultures and civilizations. But they were not separate for so long that they developed into separate species. How amazing is that? 
Farming civilizations emerged only in the two largest world zones, Afro-Eurasia and the Americas. They succeeded there for good reason. Those two zones started with advantages over the others. Afro-Eurasia had the greatest advantages. It was extremely large. It had better plants for food and better animals for transportation. These advantages allowed civilization to begin there several thousand years earlier than in the Americas. This gave the people from Afro-Eurasia an advantage when they arrived in the Americas. It made conquering the Americas easier.
The two smaller world zones had much less room for people to live. There were fewer resources and fewer people. There were not enough people living close together to develop civilization. Agriculture did emerge on the larger islands in the Pacific, like Hawaii. Something close to countries sprung up. But then these lands were conquered. They did not have a chance for civilizations to grow on their own. Would they have become civilizations if they had not been conquered by people from the larger zones? We will never know.
On Australia, widespread agriculture never developed. The soil was poor. The plants there were not easy to grow. Still, archaeological sites show that the population was increasing in the 2,000 years before the Europeans arrived.
It is easy to see that people living in Afro-Eurasia had a huge head start. They had the earliest human settlements. They were helped by having the greatest geographic area. They had the most people. Afro-Eurasia also had the most resources. Perhaps most importantly, it had shared the most knowledge. Its networks contained more information than the ones in the smaller zones. Jericho, located in the West Bank region of the Middle East, is the oldest continuously inhabited city on the planet.
Jericho’s 14,000-year survival is a direct result of biological and geological advantages that explain why a settlement was established there in the first place. This essay explores the idea that the history of a place is just as much about its physical environment as it is about superior technology or government. Big Historians, who are interested in the appearance and development of the first agrarian civilizations, ask probing questions: What were the geographical and biological advantages favoring certain regions that facilitated the appearance of the first towns and cities there? What role did climate play in allowing for agrarian civilizations to appear in some regions, while others remained better suited for foraging? And why is it that, while some agrarian civilizations seem to have abused their environments, and thus sowed the seeds of their own destruction, others were able to husband the advantages provided by geography and biology and successfully sustain themselves for thousands of years? 
To illustrate this critical relationship between history and its environmental context, we use the city of Jericho as a case study. Jericho is the oldest city on the planet, situated today in the West Bank region of the Middle East. The location and long-term survival of the city is an excellent example of the impact of the environment on human history. The establishment of Jericho 14,000 years ago resulted from the same geographical and biological factors that led to the most significant revolution in all human history — the appearance of agriculture.
To remind ourselves just how revolutionary this transition was, let’s consider the situation some 15,000 years ago. Humans had by then occupied every continent on the globe except Antarctica. Every single human, wherever they lived, survived by foraging, also known as hunting and gathering. Humans had invented a wide array of foraging techniques specifically adapted to different environments, which ranged from the deserts of Australia to the Arctic ice. But the small size of most foraging bands, and the fact that few exchanges took place between them, limited the amount of collective learning that went on.
But then something changed. Between 11,000 and 10,000 years ago, new ways of life and technologies associated with farming began to appear. Farming eventually gave humans access to more food and energy; consequently, humans began to multiply more rapidly and live in larger communities like villages, towns, and eventually cities. These processes led to an entirely new level of complexity in the human condition. The transition to agriculture was the first step in a cultural revolution that utterly transformed human societies and drove our species onto a path that led rapidly toward the astonishing complexity of the modern world. And one of the most significant steps in the early stages of that process was the emergence of large settlements like Uruk and Tenochtitlan — and Jericho.
To explore the history of Jericho, we need first to take a look at the role of climate change in encouraging humans to make this transition to farming, particularly in the Fertile Crescent. Then we need to consider the Natufian people, who were some of the first humans to adopt farming and were the founders of the small foraging base that went on to become the city of Jericho. Next we need to ask, why there? What particular geological and biological advantages did Jericho have that not only explain why it was established where it was but also account for its longevity? We conclude with a closer look at events in Jericho, further evidence of the importance of environmental factors in the rich tapestry of human history.
As we have seen elsewhere in the course, of all the factors that help explain the transition to agriculture and the appearance of large settlements, the most critical is the climate change that occurred at the end of the last ice age. It was only with the end of the last ice age early in the Holocene epoch, some 13,000 years ago, that the first evidence of farming begins to appear in the archaeological record. Conditions were warmer and more stable; entire landscapes were transformed. Forests spread across the steppes, displacing the large animal species, such as mammoths and bison, that had grazed there. As the herds of these big animals that humans had hunted for tens of thousands of years migrated northward, communities became dependent on smaller game like boar, deer, and rabbit, as well as on new root and seed plants.
These changes were especially notable in the Fertile Crescent, an arc of high ground that stretches north up the coast of the eastern Mediterranean, east through the mountains of Turkey and northern Iraq, and then south along the high ground between Iraq and Iran. All across the Fertile Crescent, the change in climate encouraged the spread of small game and warmth-loving cereal grasses. Abundance was particularly great in regions where there were good supplies of water, of course, and  where the local environment had produced a range of plants and animals that were good potential domesticates. These same locations attracted humans, too, and we have evidence of numerous Stone Age foraging communities that were experimenting with these plants and animals. The most important of the groups attracted to the abundance of the Fertile Crescent was the Natufians.
The Natufians and the “trap of sedentism”
From about 11,000 years ago, some groups of humans began to adopt less nomadic lifestyles, becoming at least “part-time” sedentary. There were two main reasons for this: climate change and local population pressure. With the arrival of more stable climates at the end of the last ice age, regions of natural abundance appeared where large numbers of humans were able to settle. These people were not farming, but living off the rich natural resources of the land. Those communities that abandoned nomadism but still lived as foragers are called “affluent foragers,” or wealthy hunter-gatherers, meaning those who have enough resources to settle down and stay in one place. The most important affluent foragers in the story of Jericho were the Natufian people, who began occupying the western Fertile Crescent (present-day Israel, Jordan, Lebanon, and Syria) just over 14,000 years ago.
Evidence for the Natufian culture first came to light in 1928 with discoveries made in northern Israel by Dorothy Garrod at a place called Wadi en-Natuf (hence the name Natufian — we have no idea what they called themselves). We do know that they lived in villages, harvested wild grains, and hunted gazelles. The Natufian toolkit was not really any more sophisticated than that of other foragers, but their more intense use of stone sickle blades to harvest large quantities of wild cereal grains is evidence of a serious change in food-gathering practices. The grain they harvested was also subject to much higher levels of processing than ever before. Many Natufian sites show that standard mortars and grinding stones were supplemented by much larger pipe-shaped mortars dug deep into the bedrock.
The construction of regular cemeteries also separates the Natufians from their contemporaries, because they suggest more complex communities with leaders and social hierarchies. Some individuals were buried wearing personal adornments like caps, bracelets, and garters, which look like indicators of their higher status. It’s also worth noting that only a tiny minority of the population was selected for ceremonial burial, which reinforces this idea that Natufian society was more socially stratified than any earlier human community.
Evidence that the Natufian diet consisted mainly of harvested and prepared cereal grains was discovered at the important Ain Mallaha site in Syria. Skeletal remains showed that most of the residents had suffered from rotten teeth as a result of eating too much barley and wheat. Ain Mallaha also shows that affluent foraging was leading to increasing populations. Although the site’s estimated year-round population of 200 to 300 people might seem tiny by today’s standards, this may well have been one of the largest human communities that had ever existed up to that time. This tells us that one of the most important impacts of affluent foraging is that population pressure was forcing humans into smaller territories and denser settlements.
By 10,000 BCE, foragers had migrated to most parts of this region, and in some areas there was simply not enough room for them all to settle. With each group having to survive off smaller and smaller parcels of land, these communities found themselves caught in what Big Historian David Christian has called the “trap of sedentism.” Traditional foraging is almost always nomadic, requiring near constant migration, so human communities had to keep populations small. It is impossible for migrating bands to support too many feeding infants or less mobile elderly members. Survival necessitated not only natural birth control but also killing off unwanted infants and the elderly to keep populations sustainable.
Once groups like the Natufians decided to remain in one place through the pursuit of affluent foraging, all this changed. There were no longer the same constraints on population. Older members of the community did not have to be abandoned; more children could be supported. As a result, affluent foraging groups began to increase in size, and this led to the problem of overpopulation. This is, in fact, what we find at most Natufian sites — clear evidence of population pressure. Eventually there were simply too many mouths to feed by foraging practices, which is what archaeologists have found at the site of Ain Ghazal on the outskirts of Amman, Jordan — a rapid fourfold increase in population around 9,000 years ago.
This created so much pressure that increasingly desperate and environmentally unsustainable attempts were made to increase food supplies. The result at Ain Ghazal and so many other sites was that groups were forced to leave the settlement to try to survive elsewhere. At a handful of more sustainable sites, however, agriculture did prove capable of supporting much larger populations, once the inhabitants learned to domesticate certain plant and animal species and increase their production through full-scale farming. One such site was Jericho.
The environmental advantages of Jericho’s site
The ultimate significance of this transition to farming is that eventually sedentism led to the creation of larger settlements, until towns, cities, states, and empires appeared on the surface of the Earth for the first time. But cities and states emerged only in a handful of regions that possessed enough favorable environmental factors to allow for the establishment of these large communities. Rather than thinking of the emergence of cities and states as an inevitable outcome, we need to focus on the particular natural reasons that allowed some villages to continue to grow until they became towns and cities. 
There are many examples of villages that did grow especially large, although the reasons are not always clear. Some may have become important ritual centers of great spiritual significance. Others had access to a critical resource, such as a reliable water supply. Yet others became important commercial centers because they controlled the trade in valuable goods, or they occupied a strategic site on important migration routes. Jericho has proven itself remarkably sustainable because it benefited from several of these advantages, most importantly a very favorable environment.
Jericho is located in the Jordan River Valley in the West Bank. At an elevation of 864 feet below sea level, Jericho is not only the oldest city on Earth but also the lowest one. The city is well known in the Judeo-Christian tradition as the place where the Israelites returned from slavery in Egypt under the leadership of Joshua. According to the Bible, the walls of Jericho came crashing down after the Israelites unleashed the devastating sound of ram’s horn trumpets, a story we will return to in a moment. But it is the natural walls surrounding Jericho that are of even greater importance in the story of this most ancient of cities.
The geological walls of Jericho were created by seismographic activity so intense that it tore a great rift in the Earth’s crust extending all the way from Palestine to northeastern Africa. Of course, the engine that drives plate tectonic movements such as this, and that forces entire continents to move about the surface of the Earth, is the heat trapped deep inside the planet, heat that can be traced back to the processes that created the Earth and Solar System in the first place, heat that can ultimately be traced back to the energy generated in the Big Bang itself.
Jericho lies deep in this Jordan Rift Valley, a tectonic feature formed by a fault along the boundary between the African and Arabian plates. As a result of the fault that opened up between these two plates, the land dropped 3,000 feet, eventually settling almost 900 feet below sea level. At this astonishingly low elevation Natufians established the settlement that became Jericho around 14,000 years ago. But we still haven’t answered the question why. What attracted these affluent foragers to this particular location? Again, it is geography and biology that provide the answer.
The Jordan River is the only major water source that flows into the Dead Sea, and Jericho is located just a couple of miles west of the river, about 10 miles north of the Dead Sea. The city is well protected by Mount Nebo to the east and the Central Mountains to the west. These geological features form natural defenses because they rise up over a mile above the city. Jericho’s location in central Palestine was also ideal for the control of trade and migration routes, which pass up and down this natural valley. Throughout the city’s long history these geographically strategic advantages have made it a source of envy and a coveted possession for a whole series of invaders, many of whom have seen Jericho as the key to controlling Palestine.
Despite the importance of these natural defenses and location, by far the most significant environmental advantage Jericho possessed is access to reliable supplies of water. This critical resource, essential for survival in the harsh desert environment, explains the city’s ancient origin and long history. Jericho is located in an oasis and sustained by an astonishingly dependable underground water supply known as the Ain es-Sultan. This natural spring — also known as Elisha’s spring, after a biblical story in the Book of Kings in which the prophet Elisha heals these waters — has apparently never dried up during 14,000 years of continuous human residency.
More than 1,000 gallons of fresh water bubble up from the source every minute. Early farmers quickly worked out a system of irrigation canals to disburse this precious resource to the surrounding farmland, which is made up of very fertile alluvial soil. It is this almost unique combination, of natural defenses, strategic location, rich soil, abundant sunshine, and, most of all, plentiful water, that has made Jericho such an attractive and sustainable place for foragers and farmers alike for so many thousands of years. When we tally up this list of environmental advantages it’s hardly surprising that Jericho has enjoyed the sort of long and rich history that it has.
Archaeologists have discovered at least 20 successive layers of settlement at the site of Jericho. Kathleen Kenyon was the first to extensively investigate the site using modern techniques, back in the 1950s. She was searching for the Bronze Age city named in the Hebrew Bible as the “city of palm trees,” but her excavations quickly revealed evidence of occupation dating back many thousands of years before the Bronze Age. Her trenches reached the remains of an early farming settlement about six acres in area, dated to circa 9600 BCE. Continued excavations revealed even earlier layers, proving that the site had been first occupied, most probably by Natufian foragers, as early as 12,000 BCE. This made Jericho the oldest continuously inhabited settlement in all human history. 
After the original foraging settlement, evidence showed that early farmers had learned to domesticate emmer wheat and barley. The availability of these two cereal grains is another significant biological advantage enjoyed by this region. Of the hundred or so domesticated plants humans depend upon today, wheat is one of the most important. It is a superb example of a species genetically pre-adapted for domestication. It can grow in a wide range of environments, and it can generate new diversity at an incredibly rapid rate, which accounts for its tremendous global success as a food crop.
Domesticated emmer wheat rapidly spread from the Fertile Crescent all across West Asia until it was replaced in the Bronze Age by free-threshing wheat. Today, our planet produces more than 620 million tons of wheat each year, providing roughly one-fifth of all the calories consumed by the more than 7 billion members of the human community.
Over the thousand years between 8350 and 7350 BCE, the village of Jericho evolved into a town that was home to perhaps 3,000 farmers. They lived in mud-brick houses arranged without any obvious evidence of town planning. Subsequent residents learned to domesticate sheep and developed a cult of preserving human skulls and placing shells in their eye sockets.
Later farming communities were more socially complex and better coordinated than their predecessors. The residents now lived in rectangular shaped buildings made of mud bricks resting on stone foundations. In each of these buildings, a number of rooms were clustered around a central courtyard. One room was usually larger — the living room — while the rest were small and probably used for storage. Kathleen Kenyon believed that one particularly large room she excavated may have been a shrine where some type of sacred object — perhaps a pillar of volcanic rock she found nearby — was worshipped in a niche in the wall.
Archaeologists working in these later agrarian layers have discovered farming implements like sickle blades, axes, and grindstones; eating vessels including dishes and bowls made from limestone; spinning whorls and loom weights for weaving textiles; and extraordinary full-sized plaster human figures that must have been associated with some sort of religious practice. 
After more than 10,000 years of continuous occupation, Jericho reached its apex in the Bronze Age, between 1700 and 1550 BCE. A class of chariot-riding elites dominated and defended the city during an age of widespread intercity conflict across much of Palestine, or the “land of Canaan,” as it was then called. The defenses were based upon a massive stone wall, but even this was not strong enough to prevent disaster; evidence shows conclusively that around 1550 BCE the ancient city of Jericho was destroyed.
For more than a century, archaeologists and biblical historians have debated the question of whether this destruction might be evidence of the Battle of Jericho. This is described in the Book of Joshua as the first battle fought by the Israelites in their campaign for the conquest of Canaan. In the biblical account, Joshua’s army marched around the city walls for seven days. On the seventh day, the priests sounded their ram’s horn trumpets, the Israelites unleashed a mighty war cry, and the walls of Jericho collapsed, killing every man, woman, and child in the city.
According to biblical chronology, this battle would have taken place in 1400 BCE, but modern archaeologists date (with 95 percent certainty) the destruction of Jericho to a century and a half earlier. Because of the discrepancy, modern scholars often dismiss the historical accuracy of the Battle of Jericho, although many biblical historians continue to make claims for its veracity.
Despite this calamity, Jericho rose again in the centuries that followed. By the eighth century BCE it had fallen to the Assyrians. The powerful Babylonian king Nebuchadnezzar also conquered the land of Israel and sent tens of thousands of residents into exile. But the exiles were freed soon after by the Persian king Cyrus the Great. Jericho then served as an administrative center for the Persians, and later as a private estate for Alexander the Great, both of whom were attracted to the city by its strategic location and abundant resources.
Three centuries later, the Hebrew king Herod the Great was granted control over Jericho by the Romans. Under Herod the city flourished as an important agricultural, commercial, and administrative center, and as a winter resort for Jerusalem’s aristocracy. In the first century of the Common Era, the Greek geographer Strabo described the city’s environmental advantages like this:
Jericho is surrounded by mountainous country which slopes toward it like a theater. It is mixed with all kinds of cultivated and fruitful trees, though it consists mostly of palm trees. It is everywhere watered with streams. In the same century, according to the Christian Gospels, Jesus passed through Jericho, where he healed a blind beggar and inspired the local tax collector Zacchaeus to repent of his unethical practices.
After the fall of Jerusalem to the Romans in 70 CE, Jericho entered a period of decline, although it remained an important Christian pilgrimage site into the Byzantine period. In the seventh century, Jericho became part of the expansive realm of Islam, and we have another description of the advantages of the city written by the tenth-century Arab geographer Al Maqdisi:
The water of Jericho is held to be the highest and best in all Islam. Bananas are plentiful, also dates and flowers of fragrant odor. During the Crusades, Christians occupied the city until they were driven out by Saladin, the leader of the Arab and Muslim opposition to the Crusaders. Throughout the long reign of the Ottomans, from 1517 to 1918, Jericho slowly shrank to the size of a village and was regularly raided by Bedouins. In the twentieth century, Jericho was controlled at various times by Britain, Jordan, Israel, and the Palestinians. Today, Israel and the Palestinian Authority continue to argue over the status of Jericho, and the future of the city and its 20,000 residents is anything but clear.
The history of Jericho is rich and complex, punctuated with the same parade of triumphs and tragedies that so many other ancient cities have experienced. But Jericho’s status as the most ancient city on Earth makes it unique. This longevity strongly supports the idea that history is ultimately as much about the physical environment in which it takes place as it is about technology or leadership. At the end of the last ice age the Fertile Crescent was favored with an array of natural advantages, which explains not only the emergence of agriculture but also that of the first villages, towns, and cities. These same advantages of geography, flora, fauna, and climate made it possible for the Natufians to establish a small foraging community deep in the tectonic fault of the Jordan Rift Valley, surrounded by natural defensive walls, and blessed with rich soil and a seemingly endless supply of fresh water, that easily transitioned into a thriving agricultural community. 
The history of Jericho is a 14,000-year-long reminder that the story of humanity can really be understood only if it is embedded deeply into the natural context in which it has played out, for the environment is truly the great physical stage upon which our human drama continues to unfold.  Jericho is the oldest city on Earth. It has existed for thousands of years. Jericho is located in the Middle East.
Jericho has lasted so long because of its environment. The environment includes land, water, air, and all other parts of nature. Jericho's environment is the reason humans first moved there. A place's environment can be as important as its technology or government. 
Why did early cities and towns start in certain places? What did those places offer?
What role did climate play in where people decided to start farming?
Why did some farming societies eventually destroy their own land? How did others use nature to keep themselves alive?
Studying Jericho can help us answer these questions.
People used to live by hunting and gathering, moving around to find food. Then, about 10,000 years ago, there was an enormous change. People started farming. Farming allowed people to stay in one place and grow more food. As a result, humans began to have more babies and the number of people living together grew larger.
Human societies became more complicated. Farming changed the world. Early cities like Jericho were an important early step in this giant change.
But why Jericho? What in its environment allowed it to stay around for so long?
About 13,000 years ago, the Earth started warming up. The shape of the land changed. Forests took over the grasslands. As that happened, animals that humans had hunted for thousands of years moved north. People had to hunt smaller animals like boar, deer, and rabbit. Root and seed plants became more important for food.
These changes were important in the Fertile Crescent. The Fertile Crescent is an area of river valleys in the Middle East.
Early humans were attracted to places with good environments. They needed water and animals that they could domesticate, or tame.
Many early human groups were finding new ways to grow plants and raise animals. In the Fertile Crescent, the Natufians were one such group.
The Natufians and the “trap of sedentism”
About 11,000 years ago, some human groups began to settle down. The Natufian people settled down in the Fertile Crescent.
They lived in villages, harvested wild grains, and hunted gazelles. Like other groups of the time, the Natufians moved around to find food. But to harvest wild grains, they used special tools. This was a huge change in how people gathered food.
About 200 to 300 people lived in one Natufian village. This may seem tiny today. However, at the time it may have been one of the biggest human groups on Earth. The way the Natufians collected food saved them time for other activities like raising children. The number of people living together kept growing, and people lived closer together.
By 10,000 BCE, more people had come to the Fertile Crescent. In some areas there was not enough room for them all to settle. Each group had to live on smaller and smaller pieces of land. Instead of moving around for food, they had to stay in one place.
Different groups had to find new ways to collect more food. In some places, people learned ways to grow plants and raise animals and eventually began farming. One place where this happened was Jericho.
The environmental advantages of Jericho’s site
Jericho is located in the Jordan River Valley. It is 864 feet below sea level. Jericho is not only the oldest city on Earth, it is also the lowest one.
The Jordan River flows into the Dead Sea. Jericho is located just west of the Jordan River and just north of the Dead Sea. The city is well protected. It has mountains on two sides that serve as natural walls. Jericho was also in a perfect spot to control trade and travel routes. Traders passed up and down the valley. 
Jericho's most important advantage was its water supply. It has an underground spring. This natural spring has never dried up during the 14,000 years humans have lived there. Early farmers used its water to grow their crops.
Natural walls. Perfect location. Rich soil. Lots of sunshine and water. Given these environmental advantages, it is not surprising that Jericho has enjoyed a long history.
Early farmers at Jericho found ways to grow wheat and other grains. Eventually the village evolved into a town, with a few thousand farmers living in simple mud houses. Over time, the town grew. The houses became bigger to make room for more people. 
Historians studying this period have found special tools. The people of Jericho made blades and axes for farming. They used limestone to make dishes and bowls.
After more than 10,000 years, Jericho reached its height. However, there was widespread fighting in the Middle East. Even Jericho's great stone wall was not strong enough to protect the ancient city. Around 1550 BCE, Jericho was destroyed.
Hundreds of years later, the city rose again. The Assyrians, Babylonians, and Persians all controlled Jericho at different times. Later, the Romans gave control of Jericho to the Hebrew king Herod the Great. Under Herod, the city became an important center for farming and business. 
Jericho changed hands again in the years that followed. Today, Israel and the Palestinians continue to argue over the city. The future of Jericho and its 20,000 people is not clear.
The history of Jericho is rich and complicated. It has seen the same triumphs and defeats as many other ancient cities. As the most ancient city on Earth, Jericho is special.
People have been living in Jericho for 14,000 years. The city's long life shows that history is not just about technology or government. It is also about the environment. 
The Fertile Crescent has many natural advantages, which explain the emergence of farming and the first towns and cities. The Natufians were a small group of hunters and gatherers. They evolved into a successful farming society.
Jericho shows that human societies depend on their natural settings. The environment shapes how history unfolds. 
Editor's Note: The port city of Alexandria in Egypt was once the largest and richest city in the world. Its lighthouse was one of the Seven Wonders of the World and its legendary library was the greatest seat of learning at the time. The secret to Alexandria, if classical historians are to be believed, lies in a golden casket. Studded with jewels and small enough to hold in one’s hands, the casket was a war trophy found in the lodgings of vanquished Persian king Darius III more than 2,300 years ago. The man who defeated Darius, Alexander the Great, locked his most treasured possession – the works of Homer – inside it.
Soon after conquering Egypt, Alexander had a dream in which Homer visited him and spoke lines from The Odyssey. Among them was a reference to the Egyptian island of Pharos in the Mediterranean, and so the next morning Alexander travelled to Pharos and stood upon its rocks, clutching the golden casket and staring out at a scrappy, forgotten stretch of coastline. After a long silence, he nodded. From these shores, the most remarkable city the ancient world had ever seen was about to rise.
Today, the original Alexandria lies buried beneath two millennia of urban evolution; the building blocks of its oldest temples and monuments have been carried as far afield as Cairo, London and New York, or else shattered by earthquakes and military invasions, or submerged under the sea. To understand the ancient city, archaeologists have had to peel back the modern one – along with deep and often contradictory layers of myth and folklore. Few metropolises are as steeped in legend as Alexandria, not least because few metropolises have ever attempted to gather together the world’s stories in one place as Alexandria once did, writing a new chapter of urban history in the process.
“Alexandria was the greatest mental crucible the world has ever known,” claim Justin Pollard and Howard Reid, authors of a book on the city’s origins. “In these halls the true foundations of the modern world were laid – not in stone, but in ideas.”
Although it is ancient Alexandria’s individual showstoppers – the lighthouse, library and museum – that are best remembered and celebrated in our own time, the city’s influence on contemporary life truly begins with its overall design. Alexander’s chief architect, Dinocrates, envisaged an epic gridiron that would knit together public space and private, spectacle and function, as well as land and sea. EM Forster, who became one of Alexandria’s most famous chroniclers in the 1920s, called it “all that was best in Hellenism”. Yet Dinocrates’ masterpiece very nearly sank without a trace before the first slab had ever been placed within the sand.
In the absence of chalk to mark out the shape of the new city’s future roads, houses and water channels, Dinocrates used barley flour instead. But as quick as his surveyors could calculate the relevant angles and his labourers could scatter the requisite lines of grain, flocks of sea birds swooped down and snatched this life-size blueprint for themselves. Many on the ground considered it a terrible omen for the settlement which was to bear Alexander’s name, but the general’s personal soothsayer took a different view: the birds’ feeding frenzy, he explained, was a sign that Alexandria would one day provide sustenance for the whole planet.
And so work continued, and before long those sea birds were gazing down at a frenzy of construction. Sites were allocated for Alexander’s royal palace, temples for both Greek and Egyptian gods, a traditional agora – both a commercial marketplace and a center for communal gathering – as well as residential dwellings and fortification walls. Canals were cut from the Nile, with rivulets diverted under the main streets to supply the homes of the rich with a steady provision of fresh water.
On one level, Dinocrates’ plan for Alexandria was a cut and paste job, following the typical pattern of many of the Greek cities with which he was familiar. Dinocrates was a student of Hippodamus, the man responsible for building the great Athenian harbor at Piraeus and often referred to as the father of urban planning. According to Aristotle, Hippodamus was the man who “contrived the art of laying out towns”, though the compliments ended there; the old philosopher went on to accuse Hippodamus of living in 'a very affected manner,' and cited his 'flowing locks' and 'expensive ornaments' with disdain.
Hippodamus and his school believed that designing cities meant more than just sketching out the boundaries of the relevant site; planners had to think about how the town was going to function, not only logistically but politically and culturally as well. In the eyes of Hippodamus, streets were not just by-products of houses and shops but centre-points in their own right: a showpiece of efficient urban governance. But whereas Hippodamus was largely confined to piecemeal projects, transforming small sections of older cities from within, at Alexandria Dinocrates was offered a blank canvas – and a chance to put his master’s innovations into practice on an unprecedented scale.
Dinocrates’ genius was to extend the lines of his gridiron right out over the water, building a 600ft wide land bridge – known as the heptastadion, because it was seven times the length of a Greek stadium – out from the mainland to the island of Pharos and creating two immense harbours on either side of the causeway. The level of integration between all the city’s various elements was profound. “You have the heptastadion forming the harbours, the harbours protected by the lighthouse, and the line to the lighthouse running back into the city’s main grid-plan on the same orientation,” says Dr Judith McKenzie, of Oxford University’s School of Archaeology and author of The Architecture of Alexandria. “It was a package deal, and it worked.”
Vitally, Alexandria’s success lay not only in its Grecian roots but also in its Egyptian influences. The tale of Alexander’s golden casket has been passed down the generations, but in reality the selection of the city’s location must have relied on local knowledge and expertise just as much as it did Homer. Not only did the new city form a perfect nexus between the relatively insular Egyptian pharaonic kingdom inland and the maritime trade empire of Greece and the Mediterranean beyond, but its roads were also angled to maximise circulation of the sea’s cooling winds, and its buildings soon melded the best in western and eastern architecture. The famous octagonal walls of the ancient lighthouse are replicated today on countless minarets throughout the rest of Egypt and on many of Christopher Wren’s church spires in Britain.
In Whose Image Was The City Created?
In the years to come, as Alexandria’s riches and reputation spiralled, its most famous institutions took shape: a musaeum (literally, a "temple of the muses") which brought together the leading scholars in every academic discipline, and within it a library, believed to be largest on Earth and sustained by the royally mandated appropriation of any books found on ships that came into the city’s port.
But Alexander himself would never live to see these marvels, or indeed the city which he founded. Soon after Dinocrates began laying out his lines of barley flour, the general travelled on to consult the oracle at Siwa, deep within Egypt’s western desert, and then headed east to new colonial campaigns in Persia and India. Within a decade, he had died in Babylon; his successor in Egypt, Ptolemy I, orchestrated an audacious kidnap of the body as it was en route to burial in Alexander’s native Macedon (modern-day northern Greece) and brought it instead to Alexandria where it was ensconced in a colossal tomb.
The fate of Alexander’s corpse is a window into a darker side of Alexandria, one that was less about intellectual endeavor and urban modernism, and more focused on harnessing the city as a vehicle for autocratic power and the entrenchment of divine rule. Ptolemy wanted Alexander in death because it helped legitimise his own authority in life. Whereas the original Hellenistic town was intended as a polis in which autonomous citizens enjoyed an equal say in decision making (unless, of course, they were female, foreign or enslaved), Alexandria became a template of urban absolutism – its regimented layout and carefully demarcated quarters a display of control from above, not democracy from below.
“What was left of the old urban drama was a mere spectacle,” argues urban historian Lewis Mumford in his seminal The City in History. “In the old polis every citizen had an active part to play: in the new municipality, the citizen took orders and did what he was told.” In Mumford’s eyes, the formal order and beauty so perfectly embodied by Alexandria on the outside reflected the disintegration of the real, messy freedom once promised by cities deep within.
That tension, over whether the design of our cities best serves its residents or its rulers, has persisted down the centuries and continues to color Alexandria today. Now home to nearly 5 million people, and the second largest metropolitan area in a country racked by mass rebellion and urban revolt in recent years, Alexandria remains on the frontline of competing visions of what thoughtful urban planning should really look like.
Last year a scheme was unveiled to rebuild the long-lost ancient lighthouse in its original location – part of a grand redevelopment project involving major new shopping malls and a high-end hotel. Critics insisted that the proposals failed to take into account the modern city’s complex informal economy and fragile architectural history, and pointed out that the decision was being taken without the input or agreement of residents. “The reality is not about amplifying Alexandria’s rich cultural history,” argued Amro Ali, an analyst of urban politics in Egypt, “as much as it is about which aspects of its history can be vulgarly commercialised at the expense of the public good.”
As Ali has noted, Alexandria’s contemporary power brokers would be wise to read up on the details of the ancient lighthouse, which was finally completed a few decades after Alexander first stood on the shores of Pharos and decided his great metropolis would be built here. As was customary, the lighthouse’s architect, Sostratus, officially dedicated its construction to Egypt’s royal family on a plaster plaque near the entranceway.
But underneath the plaque, Sostratus secretly carved a second inscription into the stone: on behalf of “all those who sailed the seas.” The question of whose interests our urban spaces are really planned for has remained a live one ever since. 
Editor's Note: The city of Alexandria in Egypt was once the largest and richest city in the world. Its lighthouse was one of the Seven Wonders of the World. Its library was the greatest place of learning at the time. Historians believe the secret to Alexandria lies in a small golden chest. It was covered with jewels. More than 2,300 years ago, it was taken from King Darius III of Persia. Alexander the Great defeated him in battle. Alexander then took the chest. He locked his most treasured possession – books written by Homer – inside of it.
Soon after conquering Egypt, Alexander had a dream. In it, Homer visited him. Homer spoke lines from his great tale "The Odyssey." Homer mentioned the Egyptian island of Pharos in the Mediterranean Sea. So the next morning Alexander traveled to Pharos. There he stood upon its rocks, clutching the golden chest. Alexander stared out at the coastline. After a long silence, he nodded. From these shores, the most remarkable city the ancient world had ever seen was about to rise.
Today, the original Alexandria lies buried. Two thousand years of city buildings are above it. Many of the building blocks of its oldest temples and monuments are gone. They have been carried off to museums. Some were shattered by earthquakes. War destroyed many of them. Others are now under the sea. To understand the ancient city, archaeologists have had to dig through Alexandria. They also had to dig through its legends.  
Ancient Alexandria is best remembered for its lighthouse, library and museum.
Yet Alexandria’s influence on life today really begins with its design. Alexander’s chief architect was Dinocrates. He wanted Alexandria's design to bring together spaces where people gathered and where they lived. He wanted it to be beautiful and lead to the sea. However, Alexandria almost did not get built. It was almost stopped before the first stone was ever placed in the sand.
No chalk was available to mark out the shape of the new city’s future roads, houses and waterways. Instead, Dinocrates had to use flour. His surveyors calculated the city's angles. Then his workers made lines of grain. Suddenly, flocks of sea birds swooped down. They ate this life-size blueprint for themselves. Many on the ground thought it was a terrible omen. Yet Alexander’s soothsayer took a different view: The birds’ feeding frenzy, he explained, was a sign. It meant that Alexandria would one day grow food for the whole world.
And so work continued. Alexander’s royal palace was built. Temples for both Greek and Egyptian gods were built too. A central square was built both as a marketplace and place for people to gather. Homes and walls around the city were constructed. Canals were cut from the Nile River. Its water was sent under the streets to the homes of the rich.
Dinocrates wanted to do more than just sketch out the city's boundaries. He also thought about how the town was going to work. He thought about politics and culture too. Dinocrates believed streets were not just for houses and shops. They also affected how cities should be governed. Now, Dinocrates got to put these ideas into practice.
Dinocrates had a brilliant idea. He chose to extend Alexandria over the water. He built a 600-foot-wide land bridge. It went from the mainland to the island of Pharos. The bridge created two huge harbors. All the city’s parts were well connected. The bridge formed the harbors, and the harbors were protected by the lighthouse.
It could not have just been Alexander's dream of Homer that decided Alexandria's location. Experts must have picked the perfect spot. The Egyptian kingdom was in the desert. Alexandria was on the coast by the Mediterranean. The city brought together Egypt and the sea-trading empire of Greece. 
In the years to come, Alexandria’s riches grew. Its great wealth was spent on its famous buildings, like its museum and library. 
Alexander himself would never live to see his city. Before it was built, he left the city. Alexander traveled east to conquer Persia and invade India. A few years later, he died in Babylon. Today, it is called Iraq. Ptolemy I succeeded him as a ruler in Egypt. He stole Alexander's body as it was on the way to be buried. Ptolemy brought the body to Alexandria. He had it placed in a huge tomb.
The stealing of Alexander’s body shows the darker side of Alexandria. Leaders wanted to use the city for their own power. Ptolemy's move tried to show that he had divine rule. In other words, the gods gave him the right to be king. Having Alexander's body helped prove that Ptolemy had the right to rule. 
Alexandria was meant to be a democracy, like the Greek city-states. Citizens were supposed to have a say in decisions. Of course, women and slaves could not vote. Now, Alexandria moved away from democracy. It became a model for how to control a city. It had carefully marked neighborhoods. They were not democratic. Alexandria's design let leaders control their people.
In the old democratic Alexandria "every citizen had an active part to play," argues Lewis Mumford. He was a historian of cities. Now, "the citizen took orders and did what he was told.”
Is A City Built For Its People Or Its Rulers?
Whether a city's design is best for its people or its rulers is argued in many cities. People are still discussing it in Alexandria today. The city is now home to nearly 5 million people. 
Last year, there was a plan to rebuild the ancient lighthouse in its original place. Shopping malls and an expensive hotel were also planned close by. Critics fought the plan. They said the plan did not consider how fragile the city's old architecture is. They also said fancy malls are not where many people do business in Egypt. Even more, they pointed out that Alexandria's people did not agree to the plan. Some people said the plan was just a way to make money off the city's history. For centuries societies in Afro-Eurasia had interacted on some level and exchanged goods, ideas, people, and diseases. With the advent of world travel, these types of exchanges became more profound — and sometimes more perilous.
In two books published in 1972 and 1986, American historian Alfred Crosby pointed out something quite astonishing about modern human history. It was the sort of thing that is hard to see if, like most historians, you just focus on human history. But it’s easier to see if, like Crosby and anyone studying a Big History course, you are also interested in how human history fits into the history of our planet.
Crosby pointed out that since 1500 it is not just humans who started to travel around the world. So, too, have the plants and animals that humans use, as well as the viruses and bacteria that carry human diseases, and the hangers-on of human societies, such as rats and cockroaches, and fleas. After millions of years in which particular species of plants, animals, and bacteria have been confined to those parts of the world in which they evolved, suddenly many species began to appear in all parts of the world. Crosby called this remarkable phenomenon the “Columbian Exchange.”
The Columbian Exchange was an event of colossal significance for both human and planetary history. In a wonderful book on the traces that human societies will leave behind, geologist Jan Zalasiewicz argues that, 100 million years in the future, a competent alien paleontologist will be able to notice this sudden “McDonaldization” of the species on Earth. That observer will see it most easily studying fossilized pollen from crops such as maize and rice, but may also notice a strange globalization of species such as rats and cockroaches. Zalasiewicz writes, “The transfer of species globally has become a merry-go-round of living organisms without precedent in the Earth’s four-and-a-half-billion-year history.”
Crosby noted that by shuttling so many other species around the globe in this way, humans were playing a role that had previously been performed by geology and climate. Remember Pangaea? Between about 300 and 200 million years ago, most of the planet’s continents were joined together in a single huge continent, which geologists call Pangaea. On Pangaea, species could spread over large areas quite easily. So when, today, paleontologists see similar fossil remains across large areas of what was once Pangaea they are not that surprised. In fact, Glossopteris fossils found in similarly dated strata on different continents offer strong evidence for Pangaea, continental drift, and, ultimately, plate tectonics.
What would human history have been like if Pangaea endured, with just one “world zone”? We don’t know of course (though it is an interesting exercise to try to guess). But Crosby pointed out that since 1500, we have, in effect, re-created such a world. Humans have unified the world biologically so that maize, rabbits, goats, tomatoes, and even some diseases can now be found everywhere.
Which species hitched a lift with their human patrons, and what was their impact on human history?
The list of plants that began to travel globally as a result of the Columbian Exchange is very long. It includes most of the major domesticated crops. The Americas contributed many of the crops farmed today in the rest of the world, including potatoes, maize (corn), manioc (cassava or tapioca), numerous varieties of squashes, avocado, chili, tobacco, and cocoa. Can you imagine Italian food without tomatoes? Korean food without chili? How about Ireland without potatoes, or a world without chocolate? Coffee, rice, oranges, and sugar traveled in the opposite direction.
New crops increased the choices available to local farmers, allowing them to adapt their crops to the soils, climates, and landscapes they farmed. Within 50 years of Columbus’s voyages, maize — carried by Portuguese ships — was being farmed in parts of China that were unsuitable for rice cultivation. Today, a third of all the crops grown in China originated in the Americas. The Columbian Exchange represented an agricultural revolution, and it is no wonder that populations began to rise in many regions around this time.
Plenty of livestock made the trip as well. In the Americas, there appeared large domesticated animals such as cattle and horses. Cattle soon multiplied on the plains of South America and sheep on the grasslands of Mexico, transforming local landscapes as they ate their way across entire continents. The horse-riding cultures of the American Plains Indians evolved as communities that had largely depended on farming learned to tame horses and hunt in new ways. (Ironically, horses had evolved in the Americas only to vanish soon after the arrival of the first humans, so they survived only in Eurasia where their ancestors had probably migrated across the Bering land bridge during the Ice Age.)
Bugs and diseases traveled too, and in regions unused to them the results were sometimes catastrophic. In Afro-Eurasia, where exchanges of goods, people, and diseases went back many centuries, populations had developed a wide range of immunities. When humans from Afro-Eurasia arrived in the Americas and, later, in the Australasian and Pacific world zones, they brought their diseases with them, with devastating results. According to some estimates, populations in the more densely settled regions of the Americas, namely Mesoamerica and the Andes, may have fallen by as much as 90 percent. For the Americas, this was a catastrophe much worse than the Black Death, which had devastated Afro-Eurasian societies in the fourteenth century. The destructive spread of Afro-Eurasian diseases helps explain the conquest of American societies by European invaders, the rapid decline of American empires, and the partial undermining of indigenous cultures and values.
Indigenous Americans understood perfectly well the source of the debacle. An inhabitant of Mexico’s Yucatan peninsula who witnessed the impact of the first Spaniards to arrive, wrote:
[before the Europeans came] there was then no sickness; they had no aching bones; they had then no high fever; they had then no smallpox; they had then no burning chest; they had then no abdominal pain; they had then no consumption; they had then no headache. At that time the course of humanity was orderly. The foreigners made it otherwise when they arrived here.
 ...within a few dayes after our departure from everies such townes, that people began to die very fast, and many in short space; in some townes about twenties, in some fourtie, in some sixtie, and in one sixe score, which in truth was very manie in respect to their numbers.... The disease also was also so strange that they neither knew what it was, nor how to cure it; the like by report of the oldest men in the countrey never happened before, time out of mind. A few days after we left each town, people there began to die very quickly. In some towns, 20 died. In others 40 or 60. In one town 120 died, which was very many considering their numbers. The disease was strange to them. They didn’t know what it was or how to cure it. The oldest men in the country had never seen it or heard of it before, for as long as anyone could remember. Local populations would suffer in similar ways when European settlers arrived in Australasia and the Pacific. The death of local populations made it much easier for European invaders to build societies of a kind that they were familiar with. Crosby calls these societies, built in the Americas, South Africa, Australasia, and the Pacific, “neo-Europes.”
With the Columbian Exchange, humans began to transform the world as a whole rather than just within particular regions or world zones. This is why it makes sense to see the great sea voyages that linked the world zones together from the end of the fifteenth century as one of the great turning points in human history. The rapid pace of globalization today is a continuation and acceleration of processes that began 500 years ago. Societies across Afro-Eurasia interacted for centuries. They exchanged goods, ideas, people, and diseases. World travel helped increase these exchanges. It also brought negative consequences to some societies. 
Humans began traveling around the world in large ships in about 1500. It wasn’t just humans who were traveling. American historian Alfred Crosby pointed out that plants and animals traveled, too. So did diseases.
For millions of years, animals, plants, and bacteria had stayed in one part of the world. Suddenly, they could travel. Crosby called this the “Columbian Exchange.” "Columbian" comes from Christopher Columbus.
The Columbian Exchange had a huge impact on human history. Corn and rice spread. Rats and cockroaches spread, too.
Humans moved many species around the world. Before, this role had been performed by geology and climate. Remember Pangaea?
Earth’s continents were joined into a single super-continent 200 million years ago. Geologists call it Pangaea. With one continent, species could easily spread over large areas.
What would human history have been like if Pangaea continued — if we had just one “world zone?” We don’t know, of course. But since 1500, we have basically recreated such a world. Humans have unified the world biologically. Corn, rabbits, goats, tomatoes, and even some diseases can now be found everywhere.
Which species traveled with humans? What was their impact on human history?
Many plants began to travel globally as a result of the Columbian Exchange. This includes most of the major domesticated crops. 
Most of the crops farmed today originated in the Americas. These include potatoes, corn, squash, avocado, chili peppers, tobacco, and cocoa. 
Can you imagine Italian food without tomatoes? Korean food without chili? Ireland without potatoes? A world without chocolate? Coffee, rice, oranges, and sugar traveled in the opposite direction. They were brought to the Americas.
New crops gave local farmers more choices. They could now adapt their crops to the landscapes they farmed. Within 50 years of Columbus’s voyages, corn was being grown in parts of China that could not grow rice. A third of all the crops grown in China today came from the Americas. The Columbian Exchange was an agricultural revolution. The Exchange allowed populations to rise in many regions around this time.
Plenty of livestock made the trip as well. Large domesticated animals such as cattle and horses appeared in the Americas. Cattle soon multiplied on the plains of South America. Sheep appeared on the grasslands of Mexico. These new animals transformed local landscapes as they ate their way across continents.
The American Plains Indians developed a horse-riding culture. They had farmed before. Now they learned to tame horses and hunt in new ways.
Bugs and diseases traveled, too. The results were sometimes terrible.
In Afro-Eurasia, exchanges of goods, people, and diseases went back many centuries. Populations there had developed many immunities to diseases. When humans from Afro-Eurasia arrived in the Americas, they brought their diseases with them.
Populations in Mesoamerica and the Andes may have fallen by as much as 90 percent. For the Americas, this was a catastrophe much worse than the Black Death. Black Death, or the plague, had devastated Afro-Eurasian societies in the 1300s.
The spread of Afro-Eurasian diseases had world-changing consequences. It led to the conquest of American societies by European invaders, the decline of American empires, and the destruction of local cultures.
Indigenous Americans understood the source of their misfortune. An inhabitant of Mexico’s Yucatan peninsula who witnessed the first Spaniards to arrive, wrote:
(Before the Europeans came) there was then no sickness. They had no aching bones. They had no high fever. They had no smallpox. They had no burning chest. They had no abdominal pain. They had no consumption. They had no headache. At that time the course of humanity was orderly. The foreigners made it otherwise when they arrived here. Thomas Hariot was an English colonist on the Roanoke Island settlement of 1587. He wrote that local people began to die soon after their first contacts with European settlers. Here is a simplified passage from his writing:
A few days after we left each town, people there began to die very quickly. In some towns, 20 died. In others 40 or 60. In one town 120 died. That was very many considering their numbers. The disease was strange to them. They didn’t know what it was or how to cure it. The oldest men in the country had never seen it or heard of it before, for as long as anyone could remember. Local populations suffered in similar ways when European settlers arrived in Australasia and the Pacific. The death of local populations made it much easier for European invaders to build their own societies. Crosby calls these societies “neo-Europes” (New Europes).
With the Columbian Exchange, humans began to transform the world as a whole. Before that, they only had transformed particular regions. The great sea voyages that linked the world zones together at the end of the fifteenth century were one of the great turning points in human history. The rapid pace of globalization today is a continuation of processes that began 500 years ago. 
Editor's Note: In 1955, the ‘Chicago of South Africa’ was one of the last areas of black home-ownership in Johannesburg. Then the bulldozers arrived to evict these residents, confirming apartheid’s brutal suppression of black upward mobility. The bulldozers arrived in Sophiatown at five o’clock on the morning of 9 February, 1955. Behind them in the darkness, police commanders lined up with piles of paper – lists of names and addresses, eviction notices, and assignments to new plots in the Meadowlands suburb, 15 kilometres away on the northern edge of Soweto.
Behind the commanders, an army of 2,000 police carried rifles and batons, ready to enforce the eviction and clear Sophiatown of its black residents. “Maak julle oop!” they shouted in Afrikaans. “Open up!”
By sunrise, 110 families had been forced to remove all belongings from their homes, pile into police trucks and move out to the Meadowlands, where hundreds of matchbox homes awaited them.
Sophiatown was one of the last remaining areas of black home-ownership in Johannesburg. Five years earlier, the South African parliament had passed the Group Areas Act, which sought to purge black South Africans from developed neighbourhoods and establish “urban apartheid”. In Johannesburg, the act gave license to the city’s government to push middle-class black residents out of northern areas including Sophiatown into southern townships such as Soweto, where the majority of poor black residents already lived.
“Sophiatown was the antithesis of what they wanted for this country,” remembered Don Mattera, a poet and former resident, in Sophiatown Speaks. “Sophiatown had the black people – meaning Coloured, Indians, Blacks of all tribes – and the whites living together.”
And the suburb fought hard to preserve this community. For months, the African National Congress and 5,000 of its freedom volunteers had been organising, petitions and marches through Sophiatown’s Freedom Square. “Asihambi! We are not leaving!” the people chanted. Throughout the town, across homes and churches and cinemas, residents painted their protest: “We Won’t Move.”
But the march of apartheid was swift. Within two decades, more than three million black South Africans around the country were forcibly removed from their homes and neighbourhoods. Sophiatown would become Triomf, Afrikaans for triumph – the brutal triumph of apartheid over black upward mobility in Johannesburg.
“Some were leaving behind family, others were leaving behind friends and lovers. And I cried. I cried because my friends were going,” Mattera remembered. “And then suddenly, I’m the only person in the whole street … and there the trucks go.”
Apartheid planning in Johannesburg was founded on a contradiction. On the one hand, black South Africans were the backbone of the city’s industries; gold mining along the “Golden Arc” – a long stretch from Welkom in the south up to Witswatersrand in the north – relied on a steady flow of black migrants to work in the mines. By the start of the first world war, roughly 100,000 black South Africans were working in mines, factories and homes across the city.
On the other hand, the government sought to check this inflow through “influx controls” that imposed harsh restrictions on black mobility. Through the 1920s, political pressure from lower-class whites was intensifying to legislate white privileges into the economy, reserving high-skilled and highly-paid jobs for white residents.
“Johannesburg is one of the major metropolises of significant size that is built in the middle of nowhere,” explains Benjamin Bradlow, a fellow at Brown University in the US. “It was essentially a mining town, and therefore the basis for conflict was: who was going to work in the mines, and where were they going to live?”
In 1923, the South African government passed the Native (Urban Areas) Act, proclaiming its cities as “white” and stripping black residents of ownership rights. Black residents were forced to carry permits, or “passes” – with their fingerprint, photograph and the name of the white employer that had given permission for passage into the city. Failure to produce the permit resulted in arrest or expulsion. Evicted from the central-city neighbourhoods, many migrants were relocated to townships such as Soweto. There, the national government developed thousands of “ticky-tacky houses” – small, two-bedroom homes in row after row – that black South Africans could occupy but never own outright.
With the intensification of migration, these townships became increasingly dense. Residents constructed shacks in backyards to accommodate growing families, and migrants developed makeshift housing in empty lots. Despite strict limits on economic activity in the townships, grocery shops and corner stores popped up to serve the local community.
According to Professor Susan Parnell, a geographer at the University of Cape Town, there is a “myth of segregation” in many portraits of apartheid. “The focus on race should not mask the fact that Johannesburg was made of many people from many places,” Parnell explains. “It has always been a diverse city in both inter-racial and intra-racial terms.”
While many black residents were excluded from Johannesburg’s growth by influx controls, some lived side-by-side with white families as domestic workers, while others were rising into a black middle class. “What apartheid policies said and what apartheid policies did were always very different,” Parnell says.
Sophiatown, along with a handful of other townships to the north, was one such exception. In 1897, an investor named Herman Tobiansky purchased 237 acres of land a few kilometres from Johannesburg. He named the area after his wife, Sophia, and named the streets after his children.
Not long after the purchase, however, the Johannesburg City Council decided to develop its sewage disposal plant next door. Wealthier white people began to lose interest in the new colony, so Tobiansky was left with little choice but to offer plots in Sophiatown to black residents. Alongside their white neighbours, these residents constructed homes and fences in a neighbourhood that looked much like other Johannesburg suburbs.
By 1950, the pressures of apartheid planning had pushed thousands more into Sophiatown, and the average number of families on each property swelled to eight. On these subdivided plots, residents leased out backyard rooms and, as in other townships, constructed makeshift dwellings to increase occupancy.
For Trevor Huddlestone, an English bishop who lived in Sophiatown throughout the 1940s and 50s, conditions often appeared dire. “Home was a row of corrugated iron shacks built in the very restricted area behind someone else’s house,” Huddlestone wrote. “It was not much of a home: hot in summer when the sun struck down on the iron roof and there was no ceiling to protect you; cold in winter, because the wind penetrated the joints and angles and there were no walls save the iron itself.”
Sophiatown was far from paradise, but it offered black residents freehold tenure – a safety of place that many state-owned territories lacked. And this sense of ownership bred a culture all its own: “In Sophiatown, however impromptu it was, there always seemed to be a party,” remembers Anthony Sampson, a former editor of DRUM magazine, one of the only voices of South African townships in the 1950s.
House Back of the Moon, House of Truth, House of Saints: Sophiatown was home to scores of speakeasies, or Shebeens, that hosted live music and local meetings. These were largely run by what became known as Shebeen Queens, who brewed and sold liquor in the bar. The 1927 Liquor Act had prohibited Africans and Indians from entering bars, let alone hosting them – but that did little to stop Sophiatown’s residents.
Americans, Berliners, Russians: Sophiatown was also home to a number of gangs that patrolled its streets. “If you were not a big-shot in Sophiatown, you could not stay in Sophiatown,” remembers George Mbalweni, aka “Kort Boy” – a member of the Americans – in Sophiatown Speaks. “It’s like New York; [there’s] fighting all the time in Sophiatown … You can’t stay if you can’t box.”
For its cultural vibrancy, Sophiatown became known as the Chicago of South Africa. “Cinema, dancing, American culture and jazz were very important in the cultural life of Sophiatown,” said the South African writer Es-kia Mphahlele in Sophiatown Speaks. “It was a place where people could express themselves more freely than in any other place … It was never a shanty town. It was a real suburb with front gates which said, ‘This is how I want to live.’”
Social relations in Sophiatown defied the apartheid ideal. “There was a Shangaan, a Zulu and a Coloured family living in the back and we lived happily together,” recalled Jane Dakile, a teacher in Sophiatown. “There was no friction; our children played well together and even went to school together.”
Politically, Sophiatown became a target. From Desmond Tutu to Nelson Mandela, its residents were among the loudest and most active in the struggle against apartheid. Freedom Square was the site of protests, speeches and consistent congregation of the ANC; it was where Mandela called publicly on the ANC to take up arms against apartheid.
Sophiatown had become a “political corn inside the apartheid boot”, according to resident William “Bloke” Modisane in his book, Blame Me on History. The government began planning its eviction in the early 1950s, citing poor living conditions and violence in the colony. The ANC mobilised often against the eviction, but there was little they could do to save the Chicago of South Africa.
A "Neo-Apartheid"
In February 2006 – on the 50th anniversary of the eviction – Mayor Amos Masondo changed the name of Triomf back to Sophiatown. “The name Sophiatown evokes memories of a vibrant, creative, multi-cultural community; a place where artists, writers and musicians flourished, against the odds, in an atmosphere of racial intolerance,” Masondo said.
But in many ways, post-apartheid repairs such as this have been cosmetic. “Apartheid is a distant memory for many people,” says Professor Owen Crankshaw, a sociologist at the University of Cape Town. “But it persists in certain respects. The apartheid spatial order was characterised by the suburbanisation of black townships far from centres of employment. This spatial order has persisted because new, low-cost housing developments were also built on the suburban edge of the cities.”
Many white residents, meanwhile, moved further north, taking with them the bulk of the city’s service-sector industries – and prompting a proliferation of gated communities. In a 2008 study of Johannesburg’s northern neighbourhoods, black residents accounted for only 3% of purchases between 1993 and 2000; many view this lingering segregation as evidence of “neo-apartheid”.
But according to Parnell, Johannesburg today cannot be defined exclusively in terms of black and white: “Race is a necessary but not sufficient explanation for Joburg’s history and its current challenges,” he says.
As was the case before apartheid, many of Johannesburg’s black residents are moving into the middle class, while many more remain excluded from the fruits of the global economy. “It is a myth that apartheid treated all ‘black’ people the same way,” Parnell says, “and that has ramifications for the impact of neo-apartheid policies.”
The future of Johannesburg may depend, then, on how the city addresses these inequalities. “Ultimately, despite a lot of good effort, the question of transformation has not been addressed,” Bradlow says. “What kind of economy is Johannesburg going to have? Will it rely on reserve labour and reinforce social divides? Or will it decide to integrate, and make a new social fabric that is both productive and inclusive for the people who live there?” 
Editor's Note: South Africa is a country at the southern tip of the African continent. In 1948, it passed laws to create "apartheid." This means "being apart." Under apartheid, people were divided based on the color of their skin. Black South Africans were not allowed to live next to white South Africans. They were kicked out of their homes and moved to different neighborhoods. In 1955, Sophiatown was one of the last areas where black people still had their own homes. The neighborhood was a thriving black area on the edge of Johannesburg. Johannesburg is the largest city in South Africa.
On the morning of Feb. 9, 1955, an army of 2,000 police came to kick the people out. “Maak julle oop!” they shouted in Afrikaans, a language spoken in South Africa. “Open up!”
By sunrise, 110 families had been forced out. They were carried in police trucks to the Meadowlands. There, hundreds of tiny government houses awaited them.
Sophiatown’s Freedom Square
Five years earlier, the South African government had passed the Group Areas Act. This law created apartheid in the cities. It allowed the government to relocate black South Africans.
Don Mattera is a writer who used to live in Sophiatown. He says the neighborhood was the opposite of what the government wanted. In Sophiatown, black people and white people lived together.
And the neighborhood fought hard to keep it that way. For months, thousands of freedom fighters led marches through Sophiatown’s Freedom Square. “Asihambi! We are not leaving!” the people chanted.
But apartheid came quickly. Within 20 years, millions of black South Africans around the country were removed from their homes and neighborhoods. Sophiatown was renamed Triomf. This is Afrikaans for "triumph," or victory. The name stood for the victory of apartheid over black freedom in Johannesburg.
In 1923, the South African government passed a law declaring its cities “white.” The law kept black South Africans from owning property. They were only allowed in the cities if a white boss gave them permission. As a result, many workers were kicked out of cities. They were relocated to townships such as Soweto.
But not all neighborhoods remained divided.
Sophiatown was one example. It was originally developed for rich white South Africans in 1897. Then the Johannesburg City Council added a waste treatment center next door. The rich whites lost interest. The developer of the land was forced to offer land to black South Africans. They built homes alongside their white neighbors. Sophiatown looked much like other areas of Johannesburg.
By 1950, apartheid had pushed thousands more into Sophiatown. They struggled to make room for new people. Sophiatown was far from perfect. However, it offered black South Africans some control and safety. And this freedom created its own way of life. The neighborhood was known for its clubs. The clubs hosted live music and meetings. They brought together all kinds of people, including musicians, artists and freedom fighters.
Sophiatown became known as the Chicago of South Africa. People there were fans of American culture. They enjoyed movies, dancing and jazz. "It was a place where people could express themselves more freely," said the South African writer Es-kia Mphahlele.
Politically, Sophiatown became a target. From Desmond Tutu to Nelson Mandela, its people were among the loudest in the struggle against apartheid. As a result, the government began planning to kick people out in the early 1950s. Freedom fighters tried to stop them. However, there was little they could do to save the Chicago of South Africa.
Apartheid officially ended in 1994. In February 2006, Mayor Amos Masondo changed the name of Triomf back to Sophiatown. He said that the name remembers those who fought against intolerance.
But in many ways, there has been little change. Today, many people no longer remember apartheid. "But it persists in certain respects," says Professor Owen Crankshaw. Many black South Africans still live in poor areas near the city edges. And many white South Africans live behind gates in their own neighborhoods. To many people, this separation is a new apartheid.
The future of Johannesburg may depend on how the city addresses these inequalities. “The question of transformation has not been addressed,” says Benjamin Bradlow. He studies South African history. He wonders what Johannesburg will look like in the future. Will it preserve divides between white people and black people? Or will it try to bring people together?  In the 1960s, Luud Schimmelpennink devised the ‘white bike’ plan to counter the rise of pollution and cars. His invention has revolutionised public transport all over the world – so why has his cycle-loving home city never embraced it? Take an old bicycle. Paint it white. Leave it anywhere in the city. Tell people to use it. This was the first urban bike-sharing concept in history. Launched in Amsterdam in the 1960s, it was called the Witte Fietsenplan (the “white bicycle plan”). And it was not a great success.
In fact, the plan was just another wild initiative by which Provo, an infamous group of Dutch anarchist activists, wanted to provoke the establishment and change society. But eventually the idea would revolutionise public transport across the world. Nowadays, hundreds of cities have bike-sharing systems, and the phenomenon is still growing.
The original idea was floated on a summer’s day in 1965 as Provo’s answer to the perceived threats of air pollution and consumerism. In the middle of Amsterdam, the activists painted a small number of used bikes white, and issued a pamphlet stating that “the white bike symbolises simplicity and hygiene as opposed to the gaudiness and filth of the authoritarian car”. The white bicycles were left unlocked around the city, to be used by anyone in need of transport.
“I was inspired by what happened in 17th-century Amsterdam,” explains industrial engineer Luud Schimmelpennink. The inventor of the Witte Fietsenplan is now an energetic octogenarian with keen, blue eyes under bushy eyebrows, and who still lives – and cycles – in the Dutch capital.
“In that era, Amsterdam doubled in size in a relatively short time, and it became blocked by all the carriages trying to get through. So the council set up ‘carriage squares’ on the outskirts of the city, where people could leave their carriage in order to continue by foot. This was exactly what Provo wanted: to make people leave their cars behind in order to continue by white bike.”
“We were young and we thought we could change the world,” remembers Sara Stolk-Duijs, who was involved in Provo as a teenager. “The white bike was a statement against the growing number of cars, which was a real problem in Amsterdam. The city simply couldn’t deal with all that traffic. It polluted the air and children couldn’t safely play in the streets any more.”
Stolk-Duijs even got married on a white bike, which caused a sensation in her hometown of Zaandam due to Provo’s notoriety. “To get married was very bourgeois of course, but in those days you had to if you wanted to live together as a couple. So we decided to do something fun. We took the bike of my future husband’s recently deceased grandfather, painted it white and rode it to the town hall, where we were met by fellow Provos. There was a lot of press.”
The Witte Fietsenplan may have attracted much attention, but it was short-lived. The free white bikes were quickly removed by the police, who were hostile to Provo’s anarchist initiatives. But for Schimmelpennink, and for bike-share schemes, this was just the beginning.
“The first Witte Fietsenplan was just a symbolic thing,” he says. “We painted a few bikes white, that was all. Things got more serious when I became a member of the Amsterdam city council two years later.”
Schimmelpennink seized this opportunity to present a more elaborate Witte Fietsenplan. “My idea was that the municipality of Amsterdam would distribute 10,000 white bikes over the city, for everyone to use,” he explains. “I made serious calculations. It turned out that a white bicycle – per person, per kilometre – would cost the municipality only 10% of what it contributed to public transport per person per kilometre.”
The council unanimously rejected the plan. “They said that the bicycle belongs to the past. They saw a glorious future for the car.” Schimmelpennink laughs heartily as he remembers – but he was not in the least discouraged.
“I said, ‘You people don’t understand the power of this system. It’s a form of individual public transport. But if you want, I can do the same with cars.’” And so he went on to develop a system for sharing small electric cars, known as Witkarren.
Thanks to the influence of the socialist politician Ed van Thijn, who believed in the project, Schimmelpennink got the chance to realise his idea in 1974 – but with only one station and four electric cars. To be able to use a witkar, one needed to become a member and pay a small contribution per mile. The whole thing functioned on a computer system that was primitive, but way ahead of its time.
“It was a miracle we were able to pull it off,” Schimmelpennink recalls. “In the beginning, the police would drive behind the witkarren to see if anything would go wrong. At night we would park the cars in a church, because we were afraid they would be stolen. But in order to make it a success, we needed to have a network of at least 25 stations – and in the end, we were unable to finance the extension of the network. That’s why it didn’t work out. But there were witkarren on the streets for 10 years, and we proved that a system like that could function.”
Schimmelpennink never stopped believing in bike sharing either, and in the mid-90s, two Danes asked for his help to set up a system in Copenhagen. The result was the world’s first large-scale bike-share programme. It worked on a deposit: “You dropped a coin in the bike and when you returned it, you got your money back. A lot of bikes got stolen though, because the users could remain anonymous.”
After setting up the Danish system, Schimmelpennink decided to try his luck again in the Netherlands – and this time, he succeeded in arousing the interest of the Dutch Ministry of Transport. “Times had changed,” he recalls. “People had become more environmentally conscious, and the Danish experiment had proved that bike sharing was a real possibility.”
A new Witte Fietsenplan was launched in 1999 in Amsterdam. Riding a white bike was no longer free of charge; it cost one guilder per trip and payment was made with a chip card developed by Postbank, a Dutch bank. Schimmelpennink designed conspicuous, sturdy white bikes locked in special racks which could be opened with the chip card – the plan started with 250 bikes, distributed over five stations.
“It was great to work with Schimmelpennink; he was very enthusiastic, full of ideas and always one step ahead,” says Theo Molenaar, a system designer for the project. “I remember when we were testing the bike racks, he announced that he had already designed better ones. But of course, we had to go through with the ones we had.”
The system, however, was prone to vandalism and theft. “After every weekend there would always be a couple of bikes missing,” Molenaar says. “I really have no idea what people did with them, because they could instantly be recognised as white bikes.”
But the biggest blow came when Postbank decided to abolish the chip card, because it wasn’t profitable. “That chip card was pivotal to the system,” Molenaar says. “To continue the project we would need to set up another system, but the business partners lost interest.”
Schimmelpennink was disappointed, but – characteristically – not for long. In 2002 he got a call from the French advertising corporation JC Decaux, who wanted to set up his bike-sharing scheme in Vienna. “That went really well. After Vienna, they set up a system in Lyon. Then in 2007, Paris followed. That was a decisive moment in the history of bike-sharing.”
The huge and unexpected success of the Parisian bike-sharing programme (which now boasts more than 20,000 bicycles) inspired cities all over the world to set up their own schemes, all modelled on Schimmelpennink’s. “It’s wonderful that this happened,” he says. “But financially I didn’t really benefit from it, because I never filed for a patent.”
By the end of 2014, the number of shared bikes in the world amounted to almost one million. China led the charts with more than 750,000 shared bikes in 237 cities, followed by France with almost 43,000 bikes in 38 cities. Britain was seventh highest with almost 11,000 bikes. Only last month, the Dutch city of Rotterdam announced yet another Witte Fietsenplan, this time using more than 450 electric bicycles and 20 stations, to be implemented in 2017.
Nowadays 38% of all trips are made by bike in Amsterdam and, along with Copenhagen, it is feted as one of the two most cycle-friendly capitals in the world – but the city never got another Witte Fietsenplan. “I guess the reason why it never worked out is that everybody in Amsterdam already has a bike,” says Molenaar.
“Nonsense,” says Schimmelpennink. “People who travel on the underground don’t carry bikes around. But often they need additional transport to reach their final destination. If a bike-sharing system could take care of that, it would reduce the costs of public transport enormously.
“I really think it’s strange and unreasonable that Amsterdam doesn’t have a proper bike-sharing system. In the 60s we didn’t stand a chance because people were prepared to give their lives to keep cars in the city. But that mentality has totally changed. Today everybody longs for cities that are not dominated by cars.”
At 80 years of age, Schimmelpennink is still active – and still hopeful. The godfather of bike sharing is currently working on a new system of shared electric cars that will connect the Amsterdam Hermitage with the Van Gogh and Stedelijk museums. He has already found a business partner.
“I have always had a passion for progress,” he says. “So I am giving it one more try. It would be great if I could make this work before I die.”  In the 1960s in Amsterdam, many people were using cars. It is a city in the Netherlands, which is in Europe. The city was polluted. It was also very crowded. A Dutch man named Luud Schimmelpennink came up with an idea. He would create a system where people shared bikes. His idea has become popular in many cities. So why did Amsterdam not like it right away? The idea behind a bike-share program is simple. You take a bike and ride it to where you need to go. Then you leave it for the next person. About 50 years ago, Amsterdam became the first place to do it. They called it the Witte Fietsenplan. It is Dutch for the "white bike plan."
It began as a project by Provo, a well-known group of Dutch protestors. The group was against having any government. Because of this, they were not popular with the Dutch government. The group also disliked pollution. It cared about the environment. In 1965, Provo members took some action. They painted a small number of used bicycles white. They left the bikes around Amsterdam to be used by anyone. It was the group's way of speaking out against pollution.
Luud Schimmelpennink came up with the plan. It was called Witte Fietsenplan. Now, Schimmelpennink is a lively man in his 80s. He still lives and bikes in Amsterdam.
In the 1600s, Schimmelpennink said Amsterdam grew a lot. The streets were blocked by all the horse-drawn carriages trying to get through. So the city set aside spaces for people to park their carriages and continue on foot.
Hundreds of years later, Provo wanted something like this. They wanted people to leave their cars behind. Instead of walking though, they wanted them to bike.
“We were young and we thought we could change the world,” said Sara Stolk-Duijs. She was involved in Provo as a teenager. She even got married on a white bike. 
The Witte Fietsenplan did not last long. The white bikes were soon removed by police. For Schimmelpennink though, this was just the beginning.
“The first Witte Fietsenplan was just a symbolic thing,” he says. “We painted a few bikes white, that was all."
Schimmelpennink joined the Amsterdam city council two years later. He developed a larger Witte Fietsenplan, which called for the city to offer 10,000 white bikes for everyone to use. According to his calculations, providing the white bicycles would cost Amsterdam much less than what it paid for other kinds of public transport, like buses and subways. 
The council rejected the plan. They said that bicycles were old-fashioned. They thought cars were the way of the future.
So Schimmelpennink created a plan for sharing small electric cars, known as Witkarren. He tested the idea in 1974, but had only one station and four cars. Drivers paid for each mile they drove. The program used an early computer network.
In the end, there were not enough stations, and the system was shut down. But there were witkarren on the streets for 10 years, according to Schimmelpennink. To him, this proved his ideas could work. In the mid-90s, he was asked to help set up a bike-sharing system in Copenhagen, Denmark. The country is in northern Europe near the Netherlands. The result was the world’s first large-scale bike-share program. Riders would drop a coin in the bike, which they would get back after the bike was returned. 
After that, Schimmelpennink decided to try again in the Netherlands. This time, he grabbed the interest of the Dutch government. 
A new Witte Fietsenplan was launched in 1999 in Amsterdam. The white bikes were no longer free. Instead, riders paid with a chip card developed by Postbank, a Dutch bank. Schimmelpennink designed special bike racks which could be opened with the chip card. The plan started with 250 bikes and five stations.
Often, the bikes were vandalized and stolen. The biggest blow came when Postbank stopped making the chip cards. Without them, the project couldn't go on.
Schimmelpennink was disappointed. But in 2002, he got a call from French ad company JC Decaux. They wanted to set up bike-sharing in Vienna, Austria. The program soon came to Paris, France. It was going all around Europe.
Bike-sharing worked fantastically there, and the program in Paris now includes more than 20,000 bicycles. Cities around the world began to offer bike-sharing plans. They were all based on Schimmelpennink’s plan. By the end of 2014, there were almost one million shared bikes in the world.
Schimmelpennink is currently working on a new way to share electric cars, which will run through Amsterdam. Although Amsterdam is considered one of the most bicycle-friendly cities in the world, it never got another Witte Fietsenplan. Schimmelpennink still finds that strange.
"In the 60s we didn’t stand a chance because people were prepared to give their lives to keep cars in the city," he said. "Today everybody longs for cities that are not dominated by cars.”  Editor's Note: Civil rights activist Floyd McKissick dreamed of a southern utopia where the racially integrated community would be planned and managed by African Americans. Although the city was never completed, some traces remain. At first glance, this North Carolina town would have looked much like the thousands of others that were built across America’s vast countryside in the decades following the second world war. It would have consisted of single family homes on curvilinear streets within walking distance of manmade lakes, shopping centres and industry. In short, a 1970s vision of suburbia.
One key factor would have made this town different, however. The self-contained, racially integrated community would be planned, developed and managed by black people. Those black foundations would be celebrated in the town’s name: Soul City.
The idea was dreamed up by Floyd McKissick: attorney, civil rights activist and force of nature. In January 1969, amid the waning days of US president Lyndon B Johnson’s administration, McKissick strolled into a Washington DC news conference with secretary of agriculture Orville Freeman and announced plans to build Soul City on 5,000 acres of rural land in impoverished Warren County, just over an hour’s drive from Raleigh, North Carolina.
That was the easy part. While Johnson supported the effort and pledged government help, McKissick’s real task began five days later when a new president was sworn in: the politically conservative Richard Nixon.
Having secured the US’s southern states, including North Carolina, in the 1968 presidential election using a decidedly anti-black campaign tactic called the “southern strategy”, the prospect of Nixon backing $14m-worth (£9.7m) of federal loan guarantees to support the construction of this new town – built and managed by black people and called, of all things, Soul City – looked remote. Yet that’s exactly what happened.
Construction on this “southern utopia” began within a few years. And for a while at least, it looked as if McKissick – an African American who had marched with Martin Luther King in the violent south and successfully sued for admission to the University of North Carolina School of Law – had prevailed again.
“The black man has been searching for identity and destiny in the cities,” McKissick said in that 1969 news conference. “He should be able to find it in the plains of Warren County.”
Soul City came at time when black culture was taking a larger role in the American mainstream. In 1968, a show called Soul! – conceived as a black version of the Tonight Show with Johnny Carson – had premiered on New York public television. There were black sitcoms, and soul music began to cross over to the pop charts with frequency. The nationally syndicated dance show Soul Train premiered in 1971.
Major cities such as Los Angeles and Atlanta elected black mayors for the first time. Also, in 1971, hair care company Chicago’s Johnson Products became the first minority-owned firm to be listed on the New York Stock Exchange. Given the context, a black city did not seem out of the realm. 
McKissick foresaw a town that would grow to 44,000 residents by 2004. There would be homes and industry surrounded by trees, hills and lakes. Above all, there would be no prejudice, poverty or slums, according to a Soul City brochure. For a black person in the segregated urban ghettos of the north, the message was clear: “Come back home.”
Floyd McKissick Jr, son of the Soul City founder and formerly the development’s planning chief, says that company officials visited and made direct appeals to black families in the north – many of whom had left the south just a generation earlier.
“It’s interesting, we’d give a ‘dog and pony’ show (a slide presentation) that could be used exactly for that purpose,” McKissick Jr recalls. “People living in Harlem and in Newark ... even if they were working hard and making a living, the price of buying a home was unaffordable. And if they did buy something, they weren’t getting much for their money.”
Despite its name, Soul City was never intended to be an all-black town, but rather, a multi-racial community built and managed by black people. To tamp down perceptions that he was building a racially exclusive town, the senior McKissick briefly considered changing its name to Open City.
Soul City was born under the federal government’s Model Cities programme, which began in 1966. A plank in President Johnson’s anti-poverty efforts, it funded housing, employment, infrastructure and planning. Of the programme’s 14 new developments, Soul City was the only one to be built from scratch, with no pre-existing infrastructure – and the only one by a black developer.
McKissick hired the black New York architecture firm Ifill, Johnson & Hanchard to turn the rolling North Carolina acreage into Soul City. The project got urban planning assistance from the very school he had sued more than 20 years earlier: the University of North Carolina.
“It had probably looked pretty much the same since the 1700s and 1800s,” McKissick Jr says of the site. “So you were transforming the land, laying out plans for it.”
In a county where slaves toiled in cotton and tobacco plantations barely a century earlier, the planners envisioned a broad Soul City boulevard leading south into the development from nearby Interstate 85. The road would pass Soul City’s executive office complex and the industrial park Soultech 1. After passing a manmade lake, recreational buildings, and a shopping centre (to be developed later), the boulevard would connect to Opportunity Lane – leading into the residential areas of Soul City.
A county-wide high school and bike trails were also planned. Land was set side to grow food. Soul City would have a freight rail spur, new water purification and sewage treatment facilities, and even a fire department.
“You were going to bring to bear, in a rural area, urban types of interactions and economic opportunities,” recalled Eva Clayton, former executive director of the Soul City Foundation, in 1989, as part of the University of North Carolina’s Documenting the American South project. “You were going to have houses, you were going to have shops, you were possibly going to have the schools.”
A new, “limited purpose” governance structure was also planned as part of the experiment. This new town government would create the infrastructure, but the operation and law-making capabilities would be left to Warren County.
According to McKissick Jr: “It would have been a very liveable, planned community ... something you’d see in many places throughout America – but which was very unique for Warren County.”
The new President Nixon supported Soul City – and on closer examination, it’s not hard to see why. The Republican party still courted black voters now and again, and the business-oriented McKissick, a believer in capitalism and free markets, had become more Republican-like.
He had also grown disenchanted with the traditional civil rights movement, the Black Power movement and the Democratic party. By 1972, he was a full-on member of the Republican party who supported Nixon’s re-election.
One year after Nixon was returned to power, Soul City – armed with those $14m loan guarantees that enabled it to raise capital and sell bonds to begin construction – broke ground in a November 1973 ceremony.
“It was a very exciting period,” McKissick Jr remembers. “The governor of the state flew in on a helicopter and spoke.”
“Oh, it was visionary,” Clayton said in the 1989 interview. “It was bold.”
Gini Richards is one of a team of three filmmakers who are completing a 20-minute documentary on Soul City: “I think a lot of people mentioned the groundbreaking as this wonderful moment because it happened several years into the project,” she says. “Up until that point, it had been such a struggle to get buy-in and funding – you can’t build it unless you have people; but if you don’t have buildings, nobody is going to come.”
After the groundbreaking, Soul City’s first houses went up, along with a water system plant, a health clinic, and the Soultech 1 industrial centre. A few residents from Richmond, Virginia and Newark heeded the call and moved into this revolutionary new development.
Constructed at its main entrance on US Highway 1 and Soul City Boulevard was the “Soul City marquee” – a 20-ft tall, rectangular concrete monument with the town’s name written in a stylish, rounded 1970s font. “I’m extremely happy with our progress at this stage,” said the elder McKissick in 1973.
He was tempting fate. Getting the private sector and the necessary homebuyers to come in, sit down and invest was already proving a struggle. Then the project was dealt a heavier blow by the 1974 US oil crisis, which caused the cost of petrol to skyrocket, taking the prices of plastic piping and asphalt with it.
“You’d see 200 or 300% increases in costs almost overnight,” McKissick Jr says. “That meant you might as well throw the projections out of the window.”
After the Watergate scandal had pushed Nixon from office in 1974, and with the project’s finances now skewing, the Raleigh News & Observer newspaper accused the elder McKissick of misspending Soul City’s government funding.
Then the state’s US senator Jesse Helms – a Republican and noted segregationist – demanded a federal audit of Soul City, bringing the project to a near-standstill. Alleging financial waste and mismanagement, Helms called Soul City “an insult to the hard-pressed taxpayers of North Carolina, and the nation”.
The probe found no wrongdoing, but the delay further weakened the project’s viability. With 30-year home mortgages rising above 10% in 1978, Soul City was to all intents and purposes finished – despite the arrival in April of that year of Welmetco, a manufacturer of backpacks and duffel bags.
Amid severe criticism that the project wasn’t progressing, the US Department of Housing and Urban Development finally pulled its funding in 1979. The agency took over Soul City’s ownership the following year and auctioned off the town for $1.5m.
McKissick, who sued the department and later settled, kept a few properties under his control. Throughout the 1980s he continued to push the Soul City concept, even after becoming a judge. He died in 1991 aged 69, and was buried in Soul City.
More than 6 million black people left the south in the first two-thirds of the 20th century. They escaped the harsh boot of Jim Crow to find a better life in the north of the country, reshaping everything from art to politics in the process.
In this century, however, the trend is reversing. It is a phenomenon that would have been unthinkable 50 years ago; black people in their tens of thousands are returning to America’s southern states.
And Soul City is still there, unfinished. It’s now part of the city of Manson, North Carolina, with Soultech 1 making up a section of the county’s jail complex. But the streets, the giant Soul City sign, and other reminders of those heady days are still there.
Portions of the area resemble a ghost town, rotting – or perhaps waiting. Could Soul City ever be resurrected?
“I could see it occurring,” says McKissick Jr. “It’s just a matter of whether it’s in this decade or the next, or if it takes longer. If Soul City could all be reassembled, it could have great potential.” Editor's Note: Floyd McKissick was a black lawyer and a member of the civil rights movement. He wanted to build a Southern community of black and white people living together. McKissick wanted this community to be planned and run by African-Americans. The city was never finished, but traces of it remain. Soul City would have looked like most small towns in the 1970s. There would have been houses on curved streets. Nearby would be lakes, shopping centers and factories.
This town would have one important difference, though. It would be planned, built and run by black people.
Soul City was dreamed up by a man named Floyd McKissick. He was a black lawyer who fought for equal rights for black people. He marched with Martin Luther King Jr.
In 1969, Floyd McKissick announced plans to build Soul City. The city would be built in a poor part of North Carolina. Slaves had once worked in the area. 
The national government supported McKissick's plan. About $14 million was set aside to help build Soul City. It looked like the city would be a success.
Soul City came at time when black culture was becoming popular. By the late 1960s, people watched many black television shows. Soul music was very well-liked.
In the early 1970s, Los Angeles and Atlanta elected black mayors. A city built and run by black people seemed possible.
McKissick imagined homes and businesses surrounded by trees, hills and lakes. He thought 44,000 people would live in Soul City by 2004. There would be no racism. Everyone in the town would have enough money to live.
McKissick's son became part of the project, too. His name is Floyd McKissick Jr. He was Soul City's planning chief. He said that the planners wanted black people in the North to move to Soul City. Many black families had lived in the Southern states not long ago. He said they could not afford homes in Northern cities. Soul City might give them a chance at a better life. 
Soul City was not just open to black people, though. It was meant to be a town for all races. At one point, McKissick thought about changing the name to Open City.
The city would have a wide street running through the town. The road would pass offices, factories, and a man-made lake. The road would then pass recreational buildings and a shopping center.
There would be houses, a high school, bike trails and land to grow food. There would also be water purification and sewage treatment buildings. The town would even have its own fire department.
Soul City's first houses were built in 1973. A water treatment plant, health center and area for factories were also built. A few people from Virginia and New Jersey moved to Soul City.
At Soul City's main entrance was a 20-foot-tall concrete sign. The town's name was written on the sign. McKissick told people he was very happy with the work being done on the city.
However, it was hard to find people to buy homes. Then, in 1974, the costs of building materials rose. Costs more than doubled almost overnight, McKissick's son said.
Soon after, a North Carolina senator said McKissick was wasting money. The senator said the government should study how Soul City's money was being used. Construction nearly stopped.
The study found no wrongdoing. Still, the delay hurt the city. By 1978, Soul City was doomed.
The government stopped paying for Soul City in 1979. It sold the town for $1.5 million. Floyd McKissick Sr. died in 1991 at age 69 and was buried in Soul City.
Soul City was never finished, but the streets, the Soul City sign and other reminders are still there. The remains are now part of Manson, North Carolina.
Could the ghost town of Soul City ever be brought back to life? Floyd McKissick Jr. said it could happen someday, maybe years from now. He thinks it could be a great town. The planners of independent India’s new capital failed spectacularly in their attempt to create a poverty-free modernist utopia. Their legacy is a sprawling city awash with slums and hampered by bureaucracy. In the late hours of 14 August 1947, on the eve of Indian independence, Jawaharlal Nehru stood at the podium of the Constituent Assembly and delivered his vision for a new capital city. “We have to build a noble mansion of free India where all her children may dwell,” said the country’s inaugural prime minister.
Just outside parliament, however, Nehru’s mansion was crumbling.
In Delhi’s old city, mobs of young men rioted through Muslim neighbourhoods with impunity. Families fled from their homes, stuffing themselves into train cars or marching from the city centre by foot. A few kilometres to the south, thousands more poured into Mughal ruins at Purana Qila and Humayun’s Tomb. Fleeing violence in their home states, these families found refuge in the makeshift colonies sprouting on Delhi’s periphery.
The city appeared, according to a report in the Daily Mirror, “like a battlefield with blazing houses, hordes of refugees, dead cattle and horses and the rattle of automatic weapons”. 
The departure of the British left a subcontinent divided. In the aftermath, 350,000 Muslims fled Delhi for Pakistan, while 500,000 non-Muslims arrived in the city in 1947 alone. It was labelled “history’s greatest migration”. It was also a scale of transformation for which the city was entirely unprepared. Services came to a standstill: trains, buses, hospitals, even phonelines. Without trains, the food supply dwindled to just two days’ worth of wheat.
Yet Nehru and his team of planners remained undeterred. Over the course of the coming decade, they would develop the most ambitious masterplan in India’s history: a capital city free of poverty and slums. “Delhi was to be Nehru’s ‘all-India’ city,” says Ashutosh Varshney, professor of political science at Brown University. “It was to be the first city that belonged to the independent India.”
The ingredients of Delhi’s ambitious plan were, however, imported. Far away from the tumult of independence, eight British and American consultants from the Ford Foundation had gathered in Berkeley, California, to review maps, draw up plans, and mock up drafts of India’s new capital city. Albert Mayer, the head of the programme, was a prominent New York planner and architect. They called their project the “Delhi imperative” – their imperative being to bring the ideas of England’s garden city movement to bear on Delhi’s chaotic and sprawling urban form.
Of course, almost none of the committee members had worked in India before. The Berkeley meetings were, in many ways, briefings on Delhi and its centuries of disjointed urbanisation. Yet Delhi has a long history of outsourcing its vision to foreign planners.
A half-century earlier, when it became the capital of the British Raj, Edwin Lutyens arrived as chief architect of the Delhi town planning committee. Over the course of two months, he assessed the city on the back of his elephant, then withdrew, satisfied, to the mountains, to reshape Delhi in his image of a “proper European capital” – wide avenues, axial vistas, parks and roundabouts, just like his beloved Champs-Élysées. Lutyens’ portion of the city became known as New Delhi.
The Ford Foundation committee similarly sought to reconstruct the city anew. “Delhi was to become the model of development for India,” says AK Jain, a former commissioner of planning at the Delhi Development Authority (DDA). “The masterplan was Nehru’s showpiece.”
On paper, the masterplan is a high modernist dream. Six “ring towns” grow from Delhi’s periphery, each with its own “economic, social and cultural ties with the central city”.
Under the guidance of the newly founded DDA, each town should hit its targets for population, manufacturing and employment for each of the next 30 years of urban growth. And, of course, they would be beautiful – in the words of the plan, beauty “should pervade the design of all public and private buildings: modern industrial buildings in attractively landscaped grounds, pleasing shopping centres, simple and beautifully designed schools and homes.”
This was a social vision as much as an architectural one. “Tamils should be there, Telugus should be there, Assamese should be there,” Varshney explains. “The city was to incorporate all the languages and all the regions of India.” For Delhi’s planners, the key to implementing this vision was centralisation. Until then, they argued, Delhi had “evolved in a haphazard manner, more often that not without the benefit of planning development in the public interest. Private interests run rampant, overlooking or not being concerned with the efficiencies and facilities that are required.”
The DDA would take over the sole responsibility for directing Delhi’s growth. “As the development authority takes shape, two things happen,” says Partha Mukhopadhyay, a senior fellow at the Centre for Policy Research in New Delhi. “First, there is a fair degree of land acquisition and eminent domain. Second, almost all private development in the city comes to a halt.” Delhi’s major developers, who had constructed colonies through the south of the city, were no longer allowed to build. Instead, the DDA amassed more than 50,000 acres of land for its various construction and redevelopment projects.
“The entire city is taken over as a public project,” Mukhopadhyay says. “Once the DDA starts growing, there is a much more intentional effort to reshape the city. They want to create an imperial capital.”
Outside of the development authority, however, the masterplan remained a fantasy. “The promise was so seductive: a large land nationalisation, formal employment in the government, and the state building all levels of housing to construct a more equal and mixed city than a real-estate market would have,” says Gautam Bhan, professor at the Indian Institute of Human Settlements in Bangalore. “But many parts of it fell apart slowly.”
At the root of the issue was the fact that the Delhi government – like city governments around the country – was close to bankruptcy. “They just didn’t have the resources,” says Mukhopadhyay. “The pressure on the city is growing. But the DDA is overwhelmed.” 
The total revolving fund at the height of its masterplanning was no more than 50 million rupees – or roughly $1million: “Not enough to build more than a few metres of metro railway,” says Mukhopadhyay.
The result was that, over the course of the coming decade, the DDA consistently fell short. It promised to develop 30,000 acres for residential use, but delivered only 13,000. Where it did succeed in developing housing stock, it was rarely for Delhi’s poorest. A mere 10 percent of the DDA’s housing plots were designated for its low-income group between 1960 and 1970.
Without support from the state, the refugee crisis that had spurred Nehru to action at Independence intensified. “The pressure on the city – the attractiveness of the city as a destination – is growing, and the DDA is aggressively planning to stop the bleeding,” says Mukhopadhyay. “But given India’s politics … it just can’t stop people from coming in.”
Each year, more than 200,000 new migrants arrived in Delhi from the surrounding countryside. Tent cities that first appeared in the early days of independence grew into larger neighbourhoods, as residents built up from kutcha houses of mud and wood to pukka houses of brick and stone. Relatives joined their families, built new rooms, and Delhi’s periphery steadily urbanised outward. It had become a “partition city”, and its migrants had become residents. But the DDA refused to recognise them. Under its public ownership of the city, informal settlements were illegal, and their residents were invaders. In many cases, the authority moved to evict and relocate these illegal occupants to make way for its new projects. In others, Delhi’s slum-dwellers were left unacknowledged.
They could apply for legal titles to the land, known as “regularisation”. But moving through the bureaucracy would take them years, if not decades. The DDA trapped them in a double bind: it outlawed informal construction, but failed to provide formal accommodation to replace it.
According to Ashutosh Varshney, providing for the urban poor was never part of the DDA’s vision. “Where the poor were to be located, what kind of facilities were to be made for them – I don’t think those questions were discussed, or featured in that imagination.” Furthermore, Delhi’s planners never adapted to the new reality. “At independence, the ideal of this planned, modern city makes some sense,” says Mukhopadhyay. “But that ideal has been continuously confronted with a different reality. A lot of the DDA’s planning is purely fictional.”
Yet the city’s planners buried their heads in the original masterplan, and continued to pursue their original targets. “The biggest failure was that it took 30 years for the next plan to come,” says Bhan. “So the essence of planning – review, course correction, adjustment – vanished. There is no plan that can shape a city for 30 years, no matter how good.”
"We Are Building The World-Class City"
Even five decades after its first masterplan, the DDA was waxing poetical about its accomplishments in its 2006/07 annual report: “In the 50 years of its relentless efforts to maintain the pace of development and match steps with the best cities of the present era, DDA has crossed one milestone after another. Emperors have come and emperors have gone, history has been written and rewritten, but Delhi has continued to grow in glory and spread its warmth.”
Even to the most casual observer, that report is a masterpiece of magical thinking. Much as it was on the eve of independence, Delhi today is the site of frenzied urbanisation. Skyscrapers, malls and gated communities sprout from farmland on the city’s eastern edge. Trucks flow from highways into factories along its north. Throughout, new informal settlements continue to crop up, housing roughly half of Delhi’s 18 million residents.
Yet the DDA remains largely blind to these changes. At Vikas Sadan, where its headquarters are located, Nehru’s urban planning apparatus remains intact, a fossil of a different era. Bureaucrats shuffle through long, dark hallways. Stacks of rotting files line hallways and closets; triplicate traces of decades-old applications. In one office, four engineers sit cross-legged behind their desks, drinking chai and examining new plans for a housing development. “With this, we are building the world-class city,” one tells me. He pulls out a copy of the masterplan 2021, which promises to “make Delhi a global metropolis”: a centre of IT innovation, green parks and new high-rise housing.
Outside, lines of housing applicants snake around the block, holding thick folders of forms, bills and photocopies. Their joke is always the same: if you apply for a house from the DDA, your great-great-great-great-great-granddaughter will live to inhabit it.
Modern Delhi was born of this contrast – great vision, and little implementation. From the outset, Delhi’s planners have imagined a vibrant capital city with ordered growth and universal housing. Yet in doing so, they planned for a city that did not exist, and they left the city’s actual residents without a plan.
According to Mukhopadhyay, this is the “original sin” of Delhi’s urban conception. “You can imagine going wrong for five, 10 or even 30 years. But at which point do you start recognising reality?”   The planners of Delhi tried to make a model modern city. Instead, it is disorderly, and many people there live in poor conditions. In 1947, there was an exciting new plan for the city of Delhi.
Delhi is a large city in India. It is the center of India's government. In 1947, the country of India had just become free. The new leader of the country was named Jawaharlal Nehru. He hoped that Delhi would become a beautiful modern city. 
It was a dangerous time, though. There was violence in the streets of Delhi. The city was filled with houses on fire, gunfire and people with no place to live. Families left their homes in fear. 
At the same time, many new people came to Delhi. Thousands had to leave their home states where they were unsafe. These people are called refugees. The refugees found safety at the edges of Delhi. People quickly built tents and houses made of mud to live in. Soon, the edges of Delhi were filled with neighborhoods of these new homes. These neighborhoods were called settlements.
In 1947 alone, 500,000 refugees moved to Delhi. The city was not ready for so many new people. Trains, buses, hospitals and phone lines stopped working. Without trains, there was no way to bring food to the city. The food supply fell to only two days’ worth of wheat.
Nehru and his city planners made a plan for Delhi. Nehru wanted a modern city where everyone had enough money, food and homes. They planned a perfect city with beautiful and simple buildings.
The Delhi Development Authority (DDA) is part of the Delhi city government. It was put in charge of carrying out the new plan. Only the DDA was allowed to build roads and buildings in Delhi.
The plan promised jobs and housing for the rich and poor alike. However, it remained only a nice dream during the first years after independence.
The problem was that the Delhi government had no money. The most the city ever had during planning was about $1 million. This was only enough to build a few yards of metro tracks.
Over the next 10 years, the DDA promised 30,000 acres for housing. Only 13,000 acres were delivered. Between 1960 and 1970, the housing did not go to those who needed it the most. Only 1 in 10 houses were set aside for the poor.
Without housing, the refugee problem got worse. Each year, over 200,000 new refugees came to Delhi. Tent cities grew into large neighborhoods. People moved from houses of mud and wood to houses of brick and stone. The edges of the city spread outward. 
The DDA would not treat refugee neighborhoods as part of the city. All city land was owned by the government. Homes people built for themselves were against the law. The DDA forced many of these people to move out. However, many refugees living in these neighborhoods were simply ignored.
People could ask permission to legally own the land. The government moved slowly, though. It took many years for some families to get permission. One expert said housing for the poor was never the DDA’s aim.
Over time, it was clear that the city Nehru planned could not be built. Still, Delhi's planners ignored the problems that made the plan impossible. 
The DDA still exists. In 2007, it said in a report that it has been meeting its goals. Anyone can see that this is false.
Today, Delhi is a mix of tall buildings, malls and farmlands in the east. In the north are highways and factories. There are crowded settlements all over the city, and more are appearing all the time. About half of Delhi’s 18 million people live in these settlements. 
There is little order, and it does not look like the city Nehru planned. Yet, the DDA ignores this. Its new city plan promises to make Delhi a world-class city with green parks and new housing. However, people who need housing now know they will be waiting a long time.
Delhi’s planners imagined a perfect city with housing for all. Yet, they left the people who live in the city without a plan. 
Great Cities: Kingston, Jamaica – a city born of "wickedness" and disaster
The devastating earthquake of 1692 ripped through Port Royal, the "richest and wickedest city in the world." A very different Caribbean city rose up in its place. But could Kingston’s grid bring order after the chaos? Downtown Kingston, the conflicted heart of Jamaica’s modern capital, was born of disaster. A battered pocket watch, its hands frozen at exactly 11:43, memorialises the moment on 7 June 1692 when an earthquake ripped through this English Caribbean colony. Mountains split, buildings shattered and a tsunami swept away uncountable bodies, living and dead, as the earth’s convulsions exhumed corpses from their graves.
The pocket watch was discovered in 1959 at the bottom of the harbour, where two thirds of the bustling commercial centre of Port Royal was sunk by the earthquake and still lies preserved under water, like a submarine Pompeii.
A sketch drawn by the seafarer Edward Barlow in the 1680s gives an impression of this town before its destruction: a dense, fortified hub rising from the end of a 10-mile sandy spit. With tall houses built of brick shipped from England as ballast, Port Royal had been proclaimed the “London of Jamaica”.
Seized from Spanish colonists by English soldiers under Oliver Cromwell in 1655, Jamaica was considered ideally located for trade and conquest. “No island in the world lies like it for advantage,” argued the 17th-century economist Carew Reynell, for whom it was “the seat of riches and empire”. Within a couple of decades, Port Royal had become the region’s “storehouse or treasury”, according to the resident lawyer Francis Hanson, “always like a continual mart or fair”.
A pivotal site in the escalating businesses of slavery and sugar, Port Royal was also a hotbed of pirates. Even after piracy was officially outlawed, Jamaica’s authorities were accused by local residents of “winking” at the buccaneers, “in consideration of the treasures they brought and squandered away there”. It earned Port Royal the epithet of “the richest and wickedest city in the world”.
It could also claim, as it turned out, to be the weakest. The physician Hans Sloane, who came to visit Jamaica in 1687, reported that much of the land on which all this wealth and fame had been built –- a mere 53 acres -– was merely loose sand “kept up by palisadoes and wharfs." The combination of a heavily built-up city and insubstantial foundations was a disaster waiting to happen in this earthquake danger zone.
And on that fateful summer morning in 1692, the sand slipped away and the bricks came crashing down. One survivor, the Reverend Emmanuel Heath, recorded how he had finished prayers "to keep up some show of religion among a most ungodly, debauched people". At a local tavern, the floor began rolling beneath his feet. He ran outside to see “the earth open and swallow up a multitude of people, and the sea mounting in upon us”.
The eyewitness reports still make shocking reading today. The town’s inhabitants were crushed in the earth’s clutches or by collapsing walls. Ships cast adrift rode over the rooftops of sunken houses, which became “habitations for fish”. So much sand was washed away that Port Royal in effect became a tiny desert island. The destruction was widespread across Jamaica, yet Port Royal “had much the greatest share in this terrible judgment”, according to Heath, who naturally interpreted the event as punishment from God. Roughly 2,000 people were killed, with thousands more succumbing to disease soon after.
In a few seismic seconds, as the watch fell from a pocket and stopped, the fortunes of Port Royal changed forever. Ideas for a deliberately different kind of town took hold: a gridiron plan designed to suit the white, colonial, slave-trading and slave-holding elite – and to underscore its control of people and space.  This would be the king’s town, Kingston.
“Refugees from the earthquake fled to the mainland and began occupying the broad, flat plain on that side of the harbour,” writes Louis Nelson in his book Architecture and Empire in Jamaica. “Relocating the city allowed Jamaican merchants to reimagine their urban fabric.” The surveyor John Goffe drew up a plan of broad, straight streets providing easy access to wharfs along the waterfront, and plots were for sale by 1693. 
Securely stored between the lines of this fledgling Kingston grid were the principal imports and exports – slaves and sugar – on which the rise of both the British empire and the 18th century’s quickly globalising economy would depend; its network of streets inextricable from the wider network of shipping lanes that stretched and intersected around the world.
Colin Clarke, a leading expert on Kingston’s urban development and social change, points out that both streets and plots were designed to meet commercial requirements. The main thoroughfares, wider than the rest at 66ft, formed free-flowing transport routes between the port and plantations in the hinterland, while plots were oriented to maximise the number of frontages available in prime commercial areas.
Not everyone, though, was convinced about building anew on the “firm land of the island”, as Sloane described the site where Kingston emerged. In the years following the earthquake, Port Royal was also rebuilt along the same lines as before, albeit to half its previous size. In the late 1690s its crammed and crooked streets remained a more desirable place to live than the town taking shape across the water. Port Royal’s association with London, and that city’s recent resurrection after the Great Fire of 1666, help to explain its people’s attachment to the site, as well as their urge to rebuild.
But Port Royal was to suffer its own great fire just 10 years after the earthquake. “Port Royal burnt, all but the Castle,” a boat master recorded in his log in January 1703. An act was swiftly drawn up to prohibit the resettling of Port Royal and to move all its inhabitants to Kingston, sparking a heated transatlantic debate between Jamaica and England over the relative advantages of each site. Placating the colonists, London eventually resolved that both towns should be allowed to continue, with Port Royal serving as the outermost defence for Kingston and the wider island.
If Port Royal had meaning by association with the restored ancient City of London, the design of colonial Kingston has more in common with unused proposals for rebuilding London that envisioned an entirely new city. “The grid plan markedly differentiated the city from its predecessor,” Nelson notes of Jamaica’s new port. In charts of the harbour drawn amid the debate over whether to rebuild or abandon Port Royal, the fluid, uncertain form of the latter contrasts sharply with Kingston’s rigid, rectilinear grid.
The development of that grid was overseen by the military engineer Christian Lilly. With four main thoroughfares leading into the centrepiece Parade – which combined military, civic and commercial functions – the gridiron layout relates to other English colonial urban plans such as Londonderry in Northern Ireland (where Colonel Lilly had previously served in campaigns to crush Irish resistance) and Philadelphia in North America.
However, Kingston was also intended as an improvement on the irregular grid street plan of St Jago de la Vega -– the Spanish colony’s principal town in Jamaica, which the English had appropriated as their own capital in 1655 –- and as a rival to the French and Spanish Caribbean cities that Lilly knew from his involvement in military attacks and spying missions.
A Frenchman held prisoner in Jamaica in 1706, during war between England and France, took the opportunity for some military espionage of his own. In addition to Kingston’s uniformity, he noted that the town had no fortification, only a long entrenchment to the north of the Parade which, with the houses on the other three sides of the square, “formed a kind of strongpoint”.
It took at least another century for this strongpoint to become Kingston’s physical centre, yet the Frenchman’s observation hints at the broadly defensive character of the city’s plan. The wide streets and large plots served not only to prevent the spread of fire and reduce the destructive chaos of earthquakes or hurricanes –- which occurred with disturbing frequency –- but also to order and control the inhabitants and their activities. Noting that Jamaican port towns were “rarely the sites of slave rebellion”, the historian Barry Higman describes them as “Janus-faced barriers as well as portals to profits and progress”.
Michael Hay’s plan of Kingston c1740 was clearly intended to promote the port’s profitability, with busy wharves and views of prosperous-looking houses. But the invisible background to Hay’s image is the conflict that had been raging for more than a decade between colonists and the island’s “maroon” communities. These groups of African Jamaicans -– the descendants of slaves who had been freed by Spanish colonists as they tried to keep hold of the island in 1655, joined by growing numbers of runaways from the English plantations -– resisted the occupation from multiple mountain bases.
Hay dedicated his print to Jamaica’s governor Edward Trelawny, who signed a treaty with the maroons in 1739 after a decade of intensified guerrilla warfare in which plantations were burned and settlements attacked. The gathering strength of the resistance gave Jamaica’s enslaved population ideas of rebellion and freedom, while the white planter class feared the island would be “lost to the nation”.
This is the wider scene of disorder behind the visual and spatial ordering of Kingston’s grid plan. The imposition of the grid may be seen as a response to the reality –- articulated by the Jamaican poet Kei Miller in his 2014 Forward Prize-winning collection –- that “whole places will slip / out from your grip”.
In Jamaica, Miller writes, history and its landmarks "become unfixed / by earthquake / by landslide / by utter spite." 
Strikingly, the footprint of old, colonial Kingston survived intact through full emancipation in 1838 and independence in 1962, and remains ingrained in Kingstonian minds -– so ingrained, Clarke suggests, that decolonisation of the grid has been impossible. The colonial past lives on in the names of streets and spaces: the Parade is still commonly known by that name, for example, despite being renamed Victoria Park in the 19th century, and then St William Grant Park after the 20th-century Jamaican labour activist.
But for Anne-Marie Bonner, executive director of the Institute of Jamaica (based in downtown Kingston), the grid offers more opportunities than obstacles in reviving the city and its culture. Not only does it contribute to much-needed “orderliness” in modern times, it contains history worth preserving -– the former British army ground having resounded to the political speeches of Jamaican national heroes such as Marcus Garvey, Alexander Bustamante and Norman Manley. With efforts under way to have the city recognised as a historic district, the grid may yet gain a new lease of life.
“I guess the grid pattern of the city is hardwired into me,” says the Kingston-born writer Lorna Goodison, who has weaved the “bandana plaid”, as she describes the city’s pattern, into her poetry and short stories.
“Retracing the streets of Kingston in my mind always makes me feel more connected, more grounded,” Goodison explains. “However, it is the old Kingston I retrace; the one I grew up in in the 1950s and early 60s, when it was a vibrant, bustling place that was mostly safe for a child to walk around. Now my hope is that a new Kingston, which will manage to maintain some of the better things about the old Kingston, is somehow rising from the grid.” 
Great Cities: Kingston, Jamaica – a city born of "wickedness" and disaster
The devastating earthquake of 1692 ripped through Port Royal, the "richest and wickedest city in the world." A very different Caribbean city rose up in its place. But could Kingston’s grid bring order after the chaos? Downtown Kingston is the heart of Jamaica’s modern capital. It was born from a disaster.
A battered pocket watch captured the moment the disaster occurred. The watch's hands are frozen on exactly 11:43. At that time on June 7, 1692, an earthquake ripped through the Caribbean colony, which belonged to England. Mountains split. Buildings shattered. The pocket watch was discovered in 1959. It was at the bottom of a harbor that was sunk by the earthquake.
Before the earthquake, Port Royal was a city filled with tall brick houses. The bricks had been taken there from England. Port Royal was called the “London of Jamaica.”
Jamaica was taken from the Spanish by the English in 1655. The island was considered an ideal location for trade. Port Royal was also a place where people were bought and sold. This was known as the slave trade. The city was also popular with pirates. People called Port Royal “the richest and wickedest city in the world.” It also might have been the weakest. The city of brick was built on sand. It was built in an area that had many earthquakes. Port Royal was a disaster waiting to happen. 
The sand slipped away on that morning in 1692. Bricks came crashing down. A person who survived wrote about feeling the floor began to roll beneath his feet. He ran outside to see the sea rising toward the city.
The eyewitness reports still make shocking reading. Walls collapsed. Ships sailed over the rooftops of sunken houses. So much sand was washed away that Port Royal became a tiny desert island. About 2,000 people died. 
Port Royal changed forever in the seconds that the watch fell from a pocket and stopped. When it was time to rebuild, ideas for a different kind of town became popular. The new town would have a gridiron plan. The plan would use a grid of roads to keep order. That is how the important white slave traders and slave owners wanted it. This would be the king’s town, Kingston. 
But it did not happen right away. A smaller Port Royal also was rebuilt in the years following the earthquake. In the late 1690s, people wanted to live among its cramped and crooked streets. They did not want to live in Kingston, the town being built across the water. Why did people stay in Port Royal? It was still the "London of Jamaica." People thought it would have a rebirth like London did after the Great Fire of 1666. 
But Port Royal had its own great fire 10 years after the earthquake. The government stopped letting people move back to Port Royal for a time. Instead they moved to Kingston. But eventually both towns were built.
Kingston's wide streets and large lots were meant to stop the spread of fire. They would also hopefully protect against earthquakes. Hurricanes also kept hitting the island. The grid layout helped the people who ran the city keep order and control residents who lived on the island.   Kingston's grid was meant to show off how the port made money. There were busy wharves and views of fancy houses. But there was another reason for the design. That reason was a fight on the Island. 
The fight was between the people who ruled Jamaica and the people who that resisted their rule. Runaway slaves and people who were free but who had slaves as ancestors did not like the people who ruled Jamaica. The people who fought the rulers met in mountain bases. The fight against the government grew stronger. It made Jamaica’s enslaved people believe that they should be free. The white planter class feared the island would be “lost.”
The area of old Kingston stayed even after everyone in Jamaica was free. It stayed even after the British left. It is always in the minds of Kingstonians. 
Great Cities: Haussmann rips up Paris – and divides France to this day
Editor's Note: Georges-Eugène Haussmann is feted internationally for transforming the French capital with an audacious programme of urban planning. Yet 125 years after his death, his legacy at home remains much more controversial. Why? He was the Parisian who ripped up his home city; one of the most famous and controversial urban planners in history. Even now, 125 years after the death of Baron Georges-Eugène Haussmann, France remains divided over whether the man who transformed Paris into the City of Light was truly a master planner – or an imperialist megalomaniac.
Internationally, Haussmann is celebrated for much that is loved about the French capital; notably those wide avenues flanked with imposing buildings of neatly dressed ashlar and intricate wrought iron balconies.
To his republican compatriots, however, Haussmann was an arrogant, autocratic vandal who ripped the historic heart out of Paris, driving his boulevards through the city’s slums to help the French army crush popular uprisings.
Historian and Haussmann expert Patrice de Moncan is exasperated by the century’s worth of criticism that has been levelled at this hugely influential figure. “Sometimes I don’t know where to start; it’s bullshit from beginning to end,” de Moncan says. “But it’s a view many people still hold in France.
“Haussmann has been portrayed as this almost sinister figure, only out to enrich himself and with his fingers in the till. His critics accused him of filling Paris with cobbled streets, bland buildings with stone facades and wide, dead straight avenues so the army could repress the masses.”
de Moncan, who is writing a new biography of Haussmann, smarts with the injustice of what he sees as the ongoing maligning of his hero. “Some said he was austere, but from what I have discovered he liked a good party and threw great ones. Others accused him of chasing the girls – it’s true he had a mistress [the opera star Francine Cellier] with whom he had a child, but unlike others at that time, he accepted, recognised and educated the girl.”
In 1848, Haussmann was an ambitious civil servant determinedly climbing the ranks when Louis-Napoléon Bonaparte – nephew and heir of Napoléon I – returned to Paris after 12 years’ exile in London to become president of the French Second Republic.
Bonaparte, later elected Emperor Napoléon III, hated what he saw. In his absence, the population of Paris had exploded from 759,000 in 1831 to more than a million in 1846 – despite regular outbreaks of cholera and typhoid that killed tens of thousands.
The French capital was overcrowded, dingy, dirty and riddled with disease. Why, Bonaparte pondered, was it not more like London, with its grand parks and gardens, its tree-lined avenues and modern sewage system? Paris, he declared, needed light, air, clean water and good sanitation.
Haussmann was an imposing figure both physically – at 6 feet 3 inches – and intellectually. Born into a bourgeois military family with strong Lutheran ties, he had been a brilliant student at elite Paris colleges, and personified the Protestant work ethic. Portraits show a tall, solid, often studious figure with a not unkind face, often sporting a chin-strap beard and, in later years, thinning hair.
France’s interior minister, Victor de Persigny, believed Haussmann to be the ideal candidate for the job of Prefect of the Seine and overseer of Napoléon III’s plan to transform the city. “He is one of the most extraordinary men of our time; big, strong, vigorous, energetic and at the same time clever and devious,” wrote de Persigny to the emperor. “He told me all of his accomplishments during his administrative career, leaving out nothing: he could have talked for six hours without a break, since it was his favourite subject, himself.”
Haussmann got the job. A week after his appointment in the summer of 1853, he was summoned to the emperor’s official residence at the Palais des Tuileries, where Napoléon III produced his plan for Paris. It showed a map of the city with three straight, dark lines drawn over it: one running north-to-south and two east-to-west either side of the Seine, all cutting through some of the most densely populated but historic areas of central Paris. 
“This is what I want,” Napoléon III told Haussmann. It was the start of the most extensive public works programme ever voluntarily carried out in a European city, turning Paris into a vast building site for more than 17 years.
Haussmann cut a swathe through the cramped and chaotic labyrinth of slum streets in the city centre, knocked down 12,000 buildings, cleared space for the Palais Garnier, home of the Opéra National de Paris, and Les Halles marketplace, and linked the new train terminals with his long, wide and straight avenues.
Less well known is Haussmann’s commissioning of an outstanding collection of street furniture – lampposts, newspaper kiosks, railings – and the decorative bandstands in the 27 parks and squares he created.
Below ground, Haussmann oversaw the installation of les egouts, the city’s complex sewage network. He also commissioned reservoirs and aqueducts to bring clean drinking water to the city.
On his orders, gas lamps were installed along the widened cobbled streets; now when the elegant flâneurs who strolled the 137 kilometers of new boulevards retired for the night, the revellers and prostitutes who emerged from the bars and the shadows could walk safely. The new streets came with trees and broad pavements along which café terraces sprang up, soon to be filled with artists and artisans enjoying “absinthe hour.”
In his Dictionary of the Second Empire, Joseph Valynseele wrote of Haussmann: “During his career he showed a maniacal ambition, an impudent opportunism and was, whatever he did, a genius of showmanship.”
But republican opponents criticised the brutality of the work. They saw his avenues as imperialist tools to neuter fermenting civil unrest in working-class areas, allowing troops to be rapidly deployed to quell revolt. Haussmann was also accused of social engineering by destroying the economically mixed areas where rich and poor rubbed shoulders, instead creating distinct wealthy and “popular” arrondissements.
Critics also accused him of destroying the city’s medieval treasures, citing the enduring charm of the narrow winding streets of the Marais: the city’s oldest district and one which escaped Haussmann’s razing. 
There was additional outrage at the staggering 2.5 billion franc bill for the work – around €75 billion today. By 1869 the attacks had become deafening, and Haussmann was forced to vigorously defend himself before MPs and city officials. In the hope of salvaging his own flagging popularity, Napoléon III asked Haussmann to resign. He refused.
“Haussmann had a great belief in public service and had spent his whole career in the service of the king and then the emperor,” de Moncan says. “He believed if he resigned it would be assumed he had done wrong, when in fact he was very proud of what he had done. Napoléon III offered him all manner of inducements but he still refused, so the emperor sacked him.
“The Second Empire and Napoléon III were despised by republicans, and Haussmann was the victim of this political backlash. Victor Hugo hated him, and because everyone in France regarded what Hugo wrote as the word of God, they hated Haussmann too. Hugo, the man who wrote "Les Miserables" about how desperate conditions were in Paris, accused Haussmann of destroying the city’s medieval charm!”
de Moncan observes this was the same “charm” that had brought epidemics to Paris; the charm that “had 20 people living in one room with no light and no toilets, just a common courtyard into which they did their business. People like Hugo forgot how truly miserable Paris had been for ordinary Parisians.”
Out of a job and persona non grata in Paris, Haussmann spent six months in Italy to lift his spirits. He returned and was given a management post with the military – which lasted less than a week before Napoléon III was defeated.
Haussmann lived out his final days in rented accommodation on a paltry 6,000-franc pension, the equivalent of €20,000 a year today, paying regular visits to his three beloved daughters. In his memoirs, he seems stoic rather than bitter about his fall from grace:
“In the eyes of the Parisians, who like routine in things but are changeable when it comes to people, I committed two great wrongs. Over the course of 17 years I disturbed their daily routines by turning Paris upside down; and they had to look at the same face of the prefect in the Hôtel de Ville. These were two unforgivable complaints.”
Some of Haussmann’s harshest critics, including the politician and philosopher Jules Simon, later changed their view of him: “He tried to make Paris a magnificent city and he succeeded completely,” Simon wrote in 1882. “He introduced into his beautiful capital trees and flowers, and populated it with statues.”
Today, Haussmann is remembered by the grand boulevard that bears his name, on which the Palais Garnier sits, and a statue on its corner with Rue de Laborde in the 8th arrondissement. But according to de Moncan, Haussmann’s vital contribution to modern Paris is still not fully appreciated.
“Haussmann was never forgiven or recognised in his lifetime in France, and still isn’t. If I give a conference here, people groan when I talk about him. Right up until the 1980s, his buildings were dismissed as rubbish and as many as possible were destroyed, so that all those unlovely 1970s glass and concrete structures could go up.
“But what he did was phenomenal; he was the world’s first modern urban developer. Everyone who came to Paris for the universal exhibitions, including Queen Victoria, was astonished by the transformation of the city. In 1867, there was a meeting of European architects in Germany at which Haussmann was hailed as a pure genius; a brilliant modern urban developer. Yet all that was said about him back home was that he was a crook.” 
Great Cities: Haussmann rips up Paris – and divides France to this day
Editor's Note: Georges-Eugène Haussmann was a city planner. In the 1800s he helped reshape Paris, France. Yet, to this day, people disagree whether he made the city better.  Georges-Eugène Haussmann helped make Paris the city it is today. As a city planner in the 1800s, he added many of the things that people love about the city. He is responsible for the large stone buildings and the wide streets lined with trees.
To many people in Paris, though, Haussmann was selfish and destructive. In their view, he destroyed the historic Paris. Many believe he divided the city's neighborhoods to help the French army control the poor.
Patrice de Moncan is a historian. He is writing a new book about Haussmann's life. He is annoyed by the attacks on this important figure. “Sometimes I don’t know where to start,” de Moncan says. He thinks Haussmann is unfairly portrayed as someone only interested in his own power and profit.
In 1848, Haussmann was a small-time government officer looking for a bigger job. That year, Louis-Napoléon Bonaparte became president of France. Three years later, Bonaparte would make himself emperor, giving himself complete power. As emperor, he took the name Napoléon III.
Napoléon III felt that Paris needed to change. The French city was overcrowded, dirty and filled with disease. He wondered why it was not more like London, England. The English city was famous for its parks, gardens and wide streets. Napoléon III declared that Paris needed light, air and clean water.
Victor de Persigny was a French government leader. He believed Haussmann should oversee Napoléon III’s plan to reshape the city. He told the emperor that Haussmann was very talented.
Haussmann got the job. A week later, Napoléon III showed Haussmann his plan for Paris. It was a map of the city with three straight, dark lines drawn over it. They cut through some of the oldest and most crowded areas of Paris. 
“This is what I want,” Napoléon III told Haussmann. It was the start of a huge program that would reshape Paris. The project took more than 17 years to complete.
Haussmann cut a clearing through the city center. His long, wide avenues broke up the messy network of poor neighborhoods. They also linked the new train stations. Haussmann knocked down 12,000 buildings, making room for a theater for music performances and a marketplace.
He also ordered the building of street furniture, including lampposts and railings. On his orders, gas lamps were put in along the widened streets. Now, partygoers could walk safely at night. The new streets came with trees and wide sidewalks. Cafés sprang up along them. Soon they were filled with artists and craftsmen enjoying afternoon drinks. 
Some people disliked Haussmann's work, though. They thought his wide streets were designed to help government soldiers stop protests. Haussmann was also accused of destroying neighborhoods where the rich and poor lived side by side. His planning made sure the two did not mix.
"Proud Of What He Had Done"
There was also anger at the huge cost of the work. People were upset at Haussmann and the government. In the hope of saving his own popularity, Napoléon III asked Haussmann to quit. He refused.
“He believed if he resigned it would be assumed he had done wrong," de Moncan says. "In fact he was very proud of what he had done."
After Napoléon III was defeated, Haussmann was without a job. He lived out his final days in rented housing. In his writings, he seemed to accept his fortune.
Some people who had disliked Haussmann later changed their minds. The lawmaker and writer Jules Simon was one of them. Haussmann "succeeded completely," he wrote in 1882. Simon felt that Paris was much more beautiful with Haussmann's trees, flowers and statues.
The city planner is remembered today by the grand street with his name, Boulevard Haussmann. There is also a statue of him on one of the street's corners. Even so, de Moncan thinks that Haussmann's work is still not fully appreciated.
“Haussmann was never forgiven or recognized in his lifetime in France, and still isn’t," the historian says. 
Great Cities: Los Angeles and "The Great American Streetcar Scandal"
Editor's Note: When Los Angeles, California, was stripped of its beloved streetcar in the 1960s, the city was quickly thrust into a traffic-clogged world of private cars and diesel buses. But with the involvement of automobile and oil companies, was this the work of a conspiracy? The last train on the last line of greater Los Angeles’ Pacific Electric streetcar network made its last run on  April 9, 1961. You can see the final days of this once-robust public transport system for yourself in the short film Ride the Last of the Big Red Cars.
This footage of the remaining “red cars” (as the Pacific Electric’s fleet was commonly known) strikes an elegiac tone, especially to modern Angelenos. They have little more than history books and the rose-tinted memories of old-timers from which to reconstruct the heyday of urban rail in Los Angeles, a city that spent decades after the disappearance of the red cars saddled with the reputation as a car-dependent, smog-choked, freeway-bound yet traffic-paralysed dystopia – and not without cause.
The Pacific Electric, along with the “yellow cars” of the Los Angeles Railway, made up the young southern California metropolis’ rail transit system throughout the first half of the 20th century. At the peak of their combined coverage and accessibility, they made Los Angeles’ public transportation the best in the country, if not the world. Why, then, did they vanish from the cityscape by the mid-1960s, their tracks yanked from the streets and their rolling stock tossed on the heap (or sent to Argentina)? What forces could have replaced the proud red and yellow cars with a fleet of plain old buses, the likes of which so many Angelenos still disdain today? It looks, to some, like the work of a conspiracy.
Between 1938 and 1950, one company purchased and took over the transit systems of more than 25 American cities. Their name, National City Lines, sounded innocuous enough, but the list of their investors included General Motors, the Firestone Tire and Rubber Company, Standard Oil of California, Phillips Petroleum, Mack Trucks, and other companies who stood to benefit much more from a future running on gasoline and rubber than on electricity and rails. National City Lines acquired the Los Angeles Railway in 1945, and within 20 years diesel buses – or indeed private automobiles – would carry all the yellow cars’ former passengers. Does that strike you as a coincidence? 
It didn’t look that way to the Federal District Court of Southern California, which in 1947 indicted nine corporations and seven individuals on counts of “conspiring to acquire control of a number of transit companies, forming a transportation monopoly” and “conspiring to monopolise sales of buses and supplies to companies owned by National City Lines” in violation of the 1890 Sherman Antitrust Act. The conviction came in 1949, with GM, Firestone, Standard Oil of California, Phillips Petroleum, and Mack Trucks found guilty and subsequently slapped on the wrists. (GM paid a fine of $5,000.)
The 1988 film Who Framed Roger Rabbit? set its story in the year 1947, pitting workaday Los Angeles private detective Eddie Valiant against the villain Judge Doom, a cadaverous, black-clad personification of all these backroom-dealing companies. In the film’s final act, Judge Doom reveals to Valiant his plot to build “eight lanes of shimmering cement running from here to Pasadena”.
And who, asks Valiant, would drive on such a monstrosity when they could ride the Pacific Electric – “the best public transportation system in the world” – for 5 cents? “Oh, they’ll drive,” replies Judge Doom. “They’ll have to. You see, I bought the Red Car so I could dismantle it.”
The notion of a plot not just to monopolise the bus-and-supply market but to deliberately destroy the rail transit systems of urban America only came to wide attention in 1974, when a young anti-trust attorney named Bradford Snell argued to the U.S. Senate that the introduction of “noisy, foul-smelling buses turned earlier patrons of the high speed rail systems away from public transit, and, in effect, sold millions of private automobiles” – and that “General Motors’ destruction of electric transit systems across the country left millions of urban residents without an attractive alternative to automotive travel”.
Snell called upon testimony from Los Angeles Mayor Tom Bradley, which he gave in absentia but in unambiguous terms, describing GM as having, through its subsidiaries, “scrapped the Pacific Electric and Los Angeles streetcar systems, leaving the electric train system totally destroyed.” GM, in the face of such harsh accusations, made no recorded public response except to admit to its investment in American City Lines, a company with which National City Lines merged in 1946.
It didn’t matter that National City Lines, even with GM’s money, never actually got around to buying the Pacific Electric system like they bought the Los Angeles Railway, nor that the public Los Angeles Metropolitan Transit Authority oversaw the last of its dismantling; "The Great American Streetcar Scandal” was already well on its way to the public consciousness.
In the second half of the 20th century, Los Angeles had little or nothing in the way of rapid transit infrastructure, and certainly nothing of the efficiency that car-owning Angelenos felt could compare to simply driving themselves. “Transit had been reduced largely to poor service on decrepit buses,” writes Brian Ladd in Autophobia: Love and Hate in the Automotive Age. “Why had American mass transit, especially the streetcars that were once the envy of the world, been so thoroughly dismantled? How could Americans have been so shortsighted?”
The answer begins with the very nature of the Pacific Electric and the Los Angeles Railway: neither began as the sort of publicly owned and operated transit systems we expect in the 21st century, but as mere tools in a larger, for-profit, real-estate development development operation. Both entered service in 1901, as the descendants of the electric trolleys that first appeared in Los Angeles in its booming 1880s, under the ownership of magnate and southern California booster Henry E. Huntington. Unprofitable in and of themselves, Huntington’s streetcars grew into such an extensive system in large part because he needed them to take newly minted Angelenos out to far-flung tracts where they could purchase a lot of their own – from the massively land-owning Huntington himself. The streetcar system itself, in other words, was a kind of conspiracy.
Just as the Pacific Electric-connected land around Los Angeles was sold off and built up, the automobile craze swept through America. “Los Angeles embraced the automobile at a much faster rate than in other places around the country,” says Ethan Elkind, author of Railtown: The Fight for the Los Angeles Metro Rail and the Future of the City, “in part because of the flat terrain and nice climate, but also because the previous streetcar system subdivisions ironically lent themselves well to automobile driving as an appealing alternative to the streetcars, at least in the beginning when the population was small and traffic was minimal.” And when even 10 percent of Los Angeles’ population got behind the wheel, their presence so slowed the streetcars, which lacked their own lanes, that they could no longer make their schedules, and their level of service declined overall.
All across America, writes Ladd, streetcar transit “had been expected to pay for itself, but after ridership ceased to grow in the 1920s, the private franchises that operated most transit systems were unable to make money under the regulations imposed on them by local governments. As they cut service, former passengers bought cars, ridership and fare revenue declined further, and a death spiral ensued, leaving cities to pick up the bankrupt pieces and offer grudging subsidies to keep a bare-bones system running,” even as, due to their much lower infrastructure and operating costs, “transit companies across the country, whoever controlled them, were seeking to switch many lines to the promising new technology of motor buses.”
This conversion process had begun well before General Motors and the others involved in National City Lines started buying up streetcar systems. By the end of the 1920s, about 20 percent of the country’s cities used buses only, and even in 1923 the Pacific Electric had put its order in for buses to run instead of trains on some routes. NCL did indeed replace more trains with buses after purchasing the financially troubled Los Angeles Railway in 1945, but that just continued a process that had begun much earlier, and which took place similarly across the country and indeed the world. Streetcars vanished in almost every metropolitan area in the United States, and only in 10 percent of those cases did NCL have anything to do with it. 
One can confidently accuse General Motors and its National City Lines of nothing worse than scheming to profit from a trend already in motion. As far as who took away the streetcars, more of the blame lies at the feet of the United States federal government, whose suite of anti-urban, post-war policies from building freeways on a colossal scale to incentivise single-family home ownership – not to mention the local voters who both refused to bring the Los Angeles’ rail systems under public ownership in the 1920s and repeatedly shot down rapid-transit proposals in favour of improved automotive infrastructure for decades thereafter.
Yet even without strong evidence of a car company-driven streetcar-dismantling conspiracy, we can see all around us, especially in America, that just the well-documented social and economic forces acting on cities in the mid-20th century – an obsession with cars and the consequent rise of auto-centric planning along with “white flight” from the central cities and the suburban living that the Pacific Electric itself encouraged – did more damage than could even the most malevolent cabal.
So why does the Great American Streetcar Scandal live on in the hearts and minds of Los Angeles? “Angelenos are rightfully frustrated by being forced to buy cars and sit in traffic to get around, and many feel like this situation was foisted on them without the consent of residents,” says Elkind. “It’s easy to blame car companies because they’re the logical economic beneficiary of this car-oriented system. But the reality is more complex, and if there’s any conspiracy here, it’s on the part of local officials who kept approving sprawling subdivisions that have led to the present inefficient land use patterns.”
Or, in the words of Judge Doom, to strings of “gas stations, inexpensive motels, restaurants that serve rapidly prepared food. Tire salons, automobile dealerships and wonderful, wonderful billboards reaching as far as the eye can see. My god, it’ll be beautiful.” 
Great Cities: Los Angeles and "The Great American Streetcar Scandal"
Editor's Note: Los Angeles, California, used to have one of the best public transportation systems in the country, but now it's gone. What happened to it? It's hard to believe now, but there was a time Los Angeles traffic wasn't so bad. Once it had one of the best streetcar systems in the world. Now that system is gone. Many people blame what they call "The Great American Streetcar Scandal." They say it was a secret plan by General Motors and other companies. The goal was to get more people to drive so the companies could make more money.   
In the early 1900s, Los Angeles had both Pacific Electric streetcars and the Los Angeles Railway. But a company called National City Lines teamed up with General Motors and other oil and gas companies. National City bought up the streetcars. The car and oil companies wanted to make sure more people drove cars and rode buses. 
A court ruled that what GM and the other companies did was against the law. But the companies only got light punishments. The court's ruling didn't bring back Los Angeles' streetcars. It was too late. More people had to drive. 
Some people blame GM and the other companies for causing the end of Los Angeles' streetcars. In 1974, Los Angeles Mayor Tom Bradley went to the United States Senate. He  accused GM of destroying electric streetcar systems across the country in order to sell more cars. GM said it didn't do anything wrong. 
Some people agree that GM and the other companies can't be blamed for what happened to the streetcars. They say it started with a businessman named Henry Huntington. In the 1880s, he created streetcars to take people to the Los Angeles suburbs. He wanted to get them there so they could buy the land that he was selling and build their homes on it. 
But there were so many people who wanted to buy the land that the streetcars couldn't keep up. And when people started buying cars, they drove instead of rode streetcars, says Ethan Elkind. He wrote a book called "Railtown: The Fight for the Los Angeles Metro Rail and the Future of the City." There were so many cars on the road that the streetcars stopped making money. With fewer streetcars, more people had to buy cars. General Motors and the others companies then started buying up streetcar systems. Eventually, streetcars disappeared.  Elkind doesn't put all the blame on GM and the other companies for what happened to streetcars. He says the U.S. government can be blamed also. It built more freeways and encouraged more people to live in the suburbs instead of in the cities. He also blamed voters. Californians voted against building public transportation systems.
“It’s easy to blame car companies" says Elkind. "But the reality is more complex,” 
Great Cities: Jacobs vs. Moses, battle of New York's urban titans
Editor's Note: When city planning supremo Robert Moses proposed a road through Greenwich Village in 1955, he met opposition from one particularly feisty local resident: Jane Jacobs. It was the start of a decades-long struggle for swaths of New York. In 1961, Bennett Cerf, one of the founders of the publishing firm Random House, sent a copy of a new book by Jane Jacobs, "The Death and Life of American Cities," to the legendary city planner Robert Moses. Moses’s reply was curt:
"Dear Bennett, I am returning the book you sent me. Aside from the fact that it is intemperate and inaccurate, it is also libelous. I call your attention, for example, to page 131. Sell this junk to someone else. Cordially, Robert Moses" This was no ordinary demurral over a book’s merits. It was a salvo in a struggle between a man who had amassed vast bureaucratic powers and remade New York with expressways, parks and housing towers, and the woman who assembled neighbours and public opinion to stop him when he set his sights on the evisceration of a swath of lower Manhattan.
Moses was an avatar of the early 20th century vision that the only salvation of cities was the large-scale destruction of their existing features, and Jacobs an exemplar of another, which maintained that the future of cities rested on preserving exactly those qualities. Jacobs’ book was the most powerful retort to Moses’s mode of thinking, and her actions a resounding retort to his mode of operating.
The struggles between Jacobs and Moses loom large in the popular consciousness. The subject of books by Roberta Brandes-Gratz and Anthony Flint, they now feature in what is surely the world’s first opera about an urban planning dispute, "A Marvelous Order," which premiered last month.
The only hazard to this libretto is that their conflict, which has become an iconic representation of the tension between top-down and organic notions of urbanism, was one in which most contact was indirect. In fact they encountered each other in person only once. Moses’s sneering dismissal of Jacobs’ book was one of very few direct acknowledgements of her existence.
This is fitting since both worked through realms of indirect influence and power: Moses within the byzantine and barely accountable tangle of New York’s public authority powers; Jacobs in the inherently decentralised world of community organising and writings about urbanism. But however indirect the sparring, there’s no doubt who prevailed in the end. 
"Immense Behind-The-Scenes Influence"
Despite never winning a single election, Robert Moses reigned over a set of principalities that would rival a Habsburg monarch. At his peak he held 12 offices, the most prominent being the New York city parks commissioner, state parks council head and chairman of the Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority. The latter, created in 1933 to oversee construction of the set of bridges connecting Manhattan, the Bronx and Queens, was pivotal, providing Moses with a steady stream of revenue that he leveraged into countless other construction projects.
As Robert Caro wrote in his epochal tome "The Power Broker," “Moses … displayed a genius for using the wealth of his public authorities to unite behind his aims banks, labor unions, contractors, bond underwriters, insurance firms, the great retail stores, real estate manipulators – all the forces which enjoy immense behind-the-scenes political influence in New York.”
Moses’s early construction was largely confined to Long Island: he steadily knit his spider’s web of roads nearer the heart of the city, bulldozing increasingly dense urban fabric, and eventually setting his sights on Washington Square Park, the historic centre of Greenwich Village.
Washington Square Park anchored the Village, offering 10 acres of green space to a steadily changing set of neighbours, from Edith Wharton to Bob Dylan. In 1880, Henry James wrote in Washington Square of its “rural and accessible appearance” – a quality that had not entirely dimmed by the 1950s. Moses, however, upon looking at the park, was convinced that the amenity it most sorely lacked was a four-lane road through its centre.
One neighbourhood resident, Jane Jacobs, received a flyer from the Committee to Save Washington Square Park in 1955, providing notice of the proposal to extend Manhattan’s 5th Avenue through the park. Jacobs, born in the small city of Scranton, Pennsylvania, had arrived in the neighbourhood in the 1930s, holding a variety of writing jobs culminating in work for the prominent publication Architectural Forum.
News of the proposed roadway provoked alarm. In a letter to the city’s mayor, Jacobs wrote: “It is very discouraging to do our best to make the city more habitable and then to learn that the city is thinking up schemes to make it uninhabitable.” Moses’ previous road plans had an unerring tendency to become reality. Jacobs set about ensuring that this one didn’t.
She rapidly took on the roles of both strategist and media and community liaison with the park’s committee, displaying a great skill for community organising – enlisting supporters both small and large, from local children to prominent neighbourhood residents such as Eleanor Roosevelt.
Jacobs cultivated the media in all its forms, garnering the support of independent press such as the nascent Village Voice. Nor were traditional levers of power neglected: the support of Carmine DeSapio, New York secretary of state, Democratic machine politician and Village resident, proved very helpful. The Board of Estimate (a city body controlling land use decisions) was prevailed upon to drop the plan. "I saw him only once, at a hearing about the road through Washington Square, which was to be an entrance ramp to the Lower Manhattan Expressway. He was there briefly to speak his piece. But nobody was told that at the time. None of us had spoken yet because they always had the officials speak first and then they would go away and they wouldn’t listen to the people. Anyway, he stood up there gripping the railing, and he was furious at the effrontery of this, and I guess he could already see that his plan was in danger. Because he was saying: ‘There is nobody against this – NOBODY, NOBODY, NOBODY but a bunch of … a bunch of MOTHERS!’ And then he stomped out.” Jacobs continued her struggle against urban renewal by articulating a positive vision of the “teeming city” in a 1958 article for Fortune magazine – which led to the commission of her masterwork, "The Death and Life of American Cities."
This broadside against the prevailing scientific rationalism of urban planning extolled diversities of usage, old buildings and the organic structures of cities: “Why have cities not, long since, been identified, understood and treated as problems of organised complexity?” It was a powerful call in an era in which any such complexity was the very thing that planners were looking to organise out of existence.
Another such effort arose about a month after Jacobs had finished her manuscript. The city’s Housing and Redevelopment Board was pursuing a study intended to classify a large area of Greenwich Village south of Washington Square Park as “blighted,” in order to enable large-scale redevelopment. Moses was not personally responsible but his associates headed the effort. Jacobs soon became co-chair of a Committee to Save the West Village, devising a new set of efforts to derail the flattening of her neighbourhood.
Moses’ efforts had frequently glided forward thanks to assertions of expert knowledge unavailable to the general public and the skillful manipulation of civic processes. Jacobs fought back on both fronts. The committee conducted their own survey of neighbourhood conditions to rebut the “blighted” designation, collecting ample documentation that the neighbourhood was not, in fact, a slum.
Public hearings on the proposal had not been held, as mandated by law; Jacobs obtained an order from a state judge that they must take place. It soon emerged that the City Planning Commission had already, surreptitiously, designated the area as blighted.
A frequent Moses tactic, aped by the city in these proceedings, was to schedule public hearings at short notice, to avoid mobilised resistance. But Jacobs had a source at City Hall providing regular tips, and worked to deluge these meetings with opposed citizens.
Additional skulduggery was unearthed. She noticed the same irregular “r” appearing both on press releases from the real estate company charged with redeveloping the area, and on statements from an ostensible community group in support of the redevelopment. The latter was revealed as a front that had vastly misrepresented the scale of the project proposed to neighbourhood residents.
Rising public distaste with the secrecy and collusion at work in the process led to the city’s abandonment of the “blighted” designation, and its plans for redevelopment. By then, however, another potentially more destructive threat awaited.
"A Monstrous And Useless Folly"
The Lower Manhattan Expressway was an effort to tie up the loose ends of local roadways by extending Interstate 78 – all 10 lanes of it – from the Holland Tunnel to the Manhattan and Williamsburg Bridges. The obstacle was the streetscape of SoHo and Little Italy, and the great variety of uses within that the city found dispensable.
“The grand total for proposed demolition was 416 buildings that housed 2,200 families, 365 retail stores and 480 other commercial establishments,” wrote Anthony Flint in "Wrestling with Moses."
The area was both densely settled and architecturally significant, containing one of the greatest collections of cast-iron architecture in the world. Yet neither factor registered as even slightly consequential initial objections to a fresh new expressway – and one eligible for 90% federal funding as part of the Interstate Highway system. 
The expressway had the support of the city, the Regional Plan Association, the American Institute of Architects, the Municipal Art Society, business groups and construction workers’ associations.
Once again, Jacobs set about forging a diverse local coalition to stop it.
An organic network of support was developed, drawing on a diverse set of local residents, Puerto Ricans, Italians, intellectuals, labourers and, rumour has it, even the mafia – united by a common opposition to their homes and businesses becoming a merge lane.
Jacobs’ coalition pursued both short- and long-term tactics, obtaining delays for resident relocation studies while holding frequent rallies – one featuring residents in gas masks, to dramatise the likely increase in pollution – and blanketing any public hearings with opposition. She herself offered frequent quotable barbs, once describing the expressway at a Board of Estimate meeting as a “monstrous and useless folly.”
The city’s mayor, Robert F. Wagner, halted the condemnation proceedings in 1962. But the expressway was a beast that refused to be slain, thanks to continued support from powerful backers – none more powerful than Moses. By 1965, the mayor announced his renewed support, offering a slightly altered plan that submerged parts of the expressway complex, as well as a proposal for some new housing as a sop to relocated residents.
Mayoral challenger John Linsday took up the baton of expressway opposition – yet once elected, he too went about tweaking the proposal in the hopes of making it more palatable. New versions included an 80-foot elevation and an ultra-modern Paul Rudolph proposal for a wrapping of new housing. Multi-lane highways are, however, a difficult dish to make appetising.
The city’s steamroller processes continued. At one public meeting concerning the project, writes Flint, “the microphone faced toward the audience, not the officials the residents were nominally addressing ... suggest[ing] that state officials were just going through the motions.”
“The city is like an insane asylum run by the most far-out inmates,” Jacobs pronounced. She led protesters onto the stage, and the stenographer’s record of the meeting was destroyed. She was arrested and jailed for a night on charges including inciting a riot and criminal mischief, and could have faced years in prison if convicted.
Jacobs eventually determined to leave New York. Her architect husband had obtained a commission in Toronto, and she was eager to take her sons beyond the risk of the draft for Vietnam. She left in 1968 – not in defeat, however, but in victory. The expressway project had lost all steam, and Mayor Lindsay declared it scrapped the following summer.
Moses received his final comeuppance in the same year, undone by the internal manoeuvrings in government that had so elevated him, as Governor Nelson Rockefeller engineered the dissolution of his most lasting fiefdom, the Triborough Bridge Authority. While Jacobs went on to enjoy a distinguished career as author and urbanist, Moses descended into increasing obloquy. He died in 1981, Jacobs in 2006 – one largely reviled, the other venerated.
“And sure enough,” wrote Tom Wolfe in 2007, “over the past 40 years, the rebirth of Lower Manhattan from Chelsea to Tribeca, of northern Brooklyn, of Astoria and Long Island City in Queens, has taken place without razing a single building in the name of ‘urban renewal,’ or shooing away a single citizen through ‘eminent domain’.”
Jacobs – one of those common citizens, denigrated at the time as merely a “housewife” – has, perhaps more than any other, offered inspiration to those informed that plans drawn up in the corridors of power will require them to move elsewhere. Simply say “no.” 
Great Cities: Jacobs vs. Moses, battle of New York's urban titans
Editor's Note: When city planning czar Robert Moses proposed a road through Greenwich Village in 1955, he met opposition from one particularly outspoken local resident: Jane Jacobs. It was the start of a decades-long struggle for swaths of New York. Robert Moses and Jane Jacobs were fierce enemies. They were both experts in city planning, and both lived in New York City. However, they had very different ideas about how New York should change and grow.
Moses was a powerful figure in the city government. At one point he held 12 jobs. One of the most important was head of New York City parks.  
Moses reshaped New York with expressways, parks and housing towers. He wanted to make the city better, but he made a lot of enemies. To make way for new roads and buildings, existing buildings often had to be knocked down. Moses forced people to move if their homes stood in his way.   
Jacobs had lived in New York since the 1930s. She rallied her neighbors together to stop Moses when he tried to add and lengthen highways in lower Manhattan.
Jacobs believed that cities should be preserved. In 1961, she wrote "The Death of American Cities." In it, she argued that cities should not destroy their neighborhoods and history. It was a strong reply to Moses’ way of thinking.
Moses and Jacobs first went head to head in the 1950s. Moses had set his sights on Washington Square Park. This was the historic center of Greenwich Village, a famous neighborhood of artists. Moses wanted to build a four-lane highway right through the middle of the park.
Jane Jacobs lived in Greenwich Village at the time. In 1955, she heard about Moses' plan. She became alarmed. She wrote a letter to the city’s mayor. She argued that Washington Square Park was an important part of the neighborhood. 
Jacobs tried to ensure that the highway would never be built. Soon, she became a leader in the cause. Eventually, Moses' plan was dropped.
This was not the last time Jacobs and Moses disagreed. A few years later, Moses proposed building The Lower Manhattan Expressway. The new expressway would bring together a number of large roads. Two neighborhoods stood in the way, however. Both were crowded with people and full of interesting buildings.  
The expressway plan had many supporters. The city government was in favor of it. Once again, Jacobs organized within the neighborhood to stop the plan from being carried out.
In 1962, Jacobs and her partners won a victory. New York City Mayor Robert F. Wagner stopped the city from kicking people out of their homes. Three years later, however, he announced his support of the expressway. 
Still, Jacobs kept fighting. By 1968, her work had paid off. The expressway plan had become unpopular. The new mayor declared it dead the following summer.
Moses fell from power that same year. Jacobs went on to work as a writer and expert on city planning, but people lost respect for Moses's ideas and work. When he died in 1981, Moses was hated by many. When Jacobs died in 2006, she was remembered as a hero. 
Perhaps more than anyone else, Jacobs has offered hope to people who are told they have to leave their homes because of a city government's plans. She has taught them to simply say "no."
Editor's Note: Hitler’s megalomaniacal project to raze much of Berlin and transform it into his global Nazi capital killed thousands. Today, its few remnants are chilling, mundane, even graceful – and inseparable from a barbaric chapter in history Resembling a huge, ripe, cracked brie, one of the few remnants of the Nazis’ attempts to make Berlin a world capital of the Thousand Year Reich they claimed would be “comparable only to ancient Egypt, Babylon or Rome” now sits surrounded by shabby, peach-coloured residential blocks in the south of the city.
The monstrous concrete cylinder, with a 21-metre radius and weighing the equivalent of 22 Airbus A380s, juts out of the ground more than four storeys high and descends a further 18 metres under the surface. It is a chilling symbol of what might have been, had the Nazis managed to realise their plans.
The so-called Schwerbelastungskörper, or “heavy load test structure”, was built to simulate the weight of one of the four pillars of the 120-metre high Triumphal Arch, planned for the north-south axis of Germania, and marks the spot where the north-east pillar would have stood.
“Berlin’s swampy ground was seen as a potential hindrance for such a massive structure, so the engineers of the German Society for Soil Mechanics were commissioned to check the extent to which it would have to be reinforced,” says Micha Richter, a Berlin architect and leading member of Berlin Underworlds, an association that holds tours of historic sites across – and mainly underneath – the city. “Its 12,650 tonnes of concrete were poured over seven months in 1941,” he says. French PoWs were among those deployed in its construction. 
The Berlin historian Gerlot Schaulinski, who curated the exhibition Mythos Germania, argues that the concrete cylinder emphasises the huge mistake in the common perception of Germania as an architectural chimera, detached from the hateful regime which conceived it. Rather, a closer look at the inhumane and murderous methods used to achieve it leaves Germania as a concise reminder of what Nazism really was.
The relationship between the building craze sparked by Germania and the concentration camps could hardly be closer. The demand for labour and materials led to many of the camps being built very near to quarries – among them Gross-Rosen, Buchenwald and Mauthausen, now all bywords for human suffering. Sachsenhausen was nearby to a planned brickworks. Germania was all too real for the tens of thousands who died in the task of quarrying stone or baking bricks for it, not to mention the many PoWs who made up a 130,000-strong workforce in Berlin. Demand for labour was so great that from June 1938, police forces were ordered to round up any male beggars, tramps, Gypsies or pimps fit to work. Many of the forces were so delighted at the opportunity that they provided far more “misfits” than had been required, including hundreds of the city’s homosexuals.
Many thousands of ordinary Berliners also felt the sting from 1939, as they were forcibly rehoused to make way for the new city, the government buying up much of the property that was to be destroyed. Often they were given new homes where Jewish families had lived, as the Jewish citizens were moved to ever more cramped accommodation, and later to ghettos and then concentration camps. So it was that Germania had a crucial role to play in enabling Nazi authorities to carry out the Holocaust, its plans leading to Jews being driven from their homes even before the pogroms of November 1938.
Had they succeeded, the capital of the Third Reich, in keeping with the wishes of Adolf Hitler and his general building inspector, Albert Speer, would have been altered beyond recognition. Broad swathes of the city would have been swept away – including between 50,000 and 100,000 houses – and old structures like the Reichstag and the Brandenburg Gate, which seem plenty large enough to the modern eye today, would have been swamped by new building compositions of massive proportions.
The designation Welthauptstadt Germania, or World Capital Germania, often believed to be the official name given by the Nazis, is – like many of the project’s details – in fact a historical misnomer.
“The name only emerged after the publication of Speer’s 1969 memoirs, Inside the Third Reich, and is actually based on casual remarks made, we believe, just twice by Hitler in conversation with a close circle of acquaintances,” says Schaulinski. “It combines the image of a visionary city of the future with that of a megalomaniac dictator. Now, ‘Germania’ stands for the hubris of the Nazi system and the failure of those big plans, because it only exists in drawings and model images.”
Schauinski points out Speer’s use of the name served him well during his postwar portrayal of his role in the project. “It supported his attempts to prove the strength of Hitler’s allure and why Speer – the architect, the artist – was so taken in by his egotism. It serves to divert our attention from architectural castles in the air and therefore manages to purposely blank out the criminal consequences of the project.”
Among the historical truths we now know about Germania, some of which have only come to light in recent years, is how Speer drove Berlin Jews from their homes, as well as his active support of deportations of Jews and others to concentration camps, and how, in cooperation with the SS, he ensured the Nazi’s slave labourers produced the building materials he required. His plans seemed so extraordinarily ambitious that even his own father told him he was crazy.
“Amid the aspirations to tear down and rebuild large parts of the capital, visions and crimes were inextricably linked,” says Schaulinski.
"A Nightmarish City"
There is evidence to suggest Hitler had started mapping out his plans as early as 1926. The two postcard-sized sketches he made then of the Great Arch, which he envisaged as a reinterpretation of Germany’s defeat in the First World War and was to have been engraved with the names of Germany’s 1.8 million war dead, he handed to Speer in the summer of 1936.
The following year, on the fourth anniversary of his rise to power, he created the Inspector General of Buildings (GBI), appointing Speer its head. The GBI was tasked with planning and organising the comprehensive redevelopment of Berlin that was to correspond with Hitler’s conquest of Europe.
The plans centred around a grand, seven-kilometre (4.3-mile) north-south avenue, which was to link two new railway stations. The crowning jewel was to be the Great Hall, inspired by the Pantheon, whose dome would have been 16 times higher than that of St Peter’s in Rome. As the largest covered space in the world, designed to take 180,000, its planners harboured concerns over the effect the exhaled breath of so many might have on the atmosphere inside. 
Connecting the Grand Hall and the Great Arch along the new axis were to be a vast array of new buildings for business and civic use, flanked by wide avenues (broad enough to fit large numbers of marching troops), a vast artificial lake and a large circus of ornamental Nazi statues. Plans also included a complex new system of roads, ring roads, tunnels and autobahns.
While the scale is still hard to imagine, what is clear is that Berlin would have been transformed from being an attractive living space for its citizens into a daunting, theatrical expanse, the main purpose of which would have been to allow the state to show itself off. The scale would even have reduced Hitler to an insignificant pin prick when he addressed crowds from the Great Hall – a point that concerned some of his advisers. Architects and urban planners who have analysed the city in recent years claim it would probably have been nightmarish to live in: hostile to pedestrians, who would regularly have be sent underground to cross streets, and with a chaotic road system, as Speer’s did not believe in traffic lights or trams. Citizens would have been made to feel variously impressed and inhibited by the towering structures around them.
Schaulinski points to a 2013 sculpture by the Colombian artist Edgar Guzmanruiz, also on display at Mythos Germania (a permanent exhibition opened in a shaft of the Berlin underground station), as giving one of the best impressions as to how the city would have looked. Guzmanruiz has superimposed a transparent Plexiglas mold of Germania over modern-day Berlin.
Schaulinski jokes that the current-day cuboid chancellery building, nicknamed the “washing machine”, which many criticised for being wildly oversized when it was completed in 2001, “looks like a garage” next to the Führerpalast, and the Reichstag building – seat of the German parliament – “like an outhouse”.
Anyone wanting a hint of the scale aimed at can visit Berlin’s Olympic Stadium, Tempelhof airport or the former Reich Air Transport Ministry (now the finance ministry) for examples of Nazi architecture. But remnants of authentic Germania are not easily found today. There is the avenue running westwards from the Brandenburg Gate, the east-west axis now called Strasse des 17. Juni, which is still flanked by Speer-designed, and – it cannot be denied – rather graceful doubled-headed street lamps.
There is also the Siegesäule, or Victory Column, on the other end of the avenue at the Grosser Stern, which was moved from the square in front of the Reichstag to make way for a parade ground on the planned north-south axis. Originally unveiled in 1873 to mark numerous Prussian victories, the Victory Column was lengthened, on Hitler’s insistence, by the insertion of an additional drum into the pillar. In the southern city of Stuttgart there are traces of Germania: the 14 travertine columns fashioned out of “Stuttgart marble” for the planned Mussolini Platz in Berlin – but never delivered after the outbreak of war impeded their transport – today form the property border of a huge waste-incineration plant.
But it’s the test load concrete plug, which many would like to have been destroyed at the end of the war had its sheer size not made that virtually impossible, that is arguably the clearest reminder. It continued to be used as an engineering test site until 1984, before efforts were made in recent years to turn it into everything from a climbing wall with a cafe on top to a car showroom. But campaigners fought to have it preserved as a silent reminder of what might have been, and it now attracts thousands of visitors on guided tours every year. “It shows better than anything how it was a project where no compromises were to be made,” says Richter.
Buffeted by a fittingly chilly April wind, Richter walked me up to a 14 metre-high viewing platform next to the concrete form for a soaring view across the city, with scores of cranes indicating the huge amount of postwar reconstruction that is still going on across Berlin. “This is the best impression you really get of just how crazy the Germania project was,” Richter explains. “On the plans it all looks fairly flat, but here you see the extent to which they planned to completely change the topography of the city.”
The ground level of the Triumphal Arch site was to have been raised by 14 metres, “creating an optical illusion allowing a stage-managed view of the Great Hall, the prime object on the north-south axis, within the arch,” Richter says. The test structure would have been buried underneath the elevation and sealed by the arch, which would have stood three times as large as Paris’s Arc de Triomphe. It was just one small section of the mind-boggling plans to transform the city into a gargantuan and imposing metropolis.
But just because only a few traces and plans survive, it is a mistake to see Germania as something that only existed in theory, and which was unrealisable, insists Wolfgang Schäche, an architectural historian and expert on the topic.
“It was never a utopia, rather a very concrete, ideologically loaded projection of architecture and urban construction. All the ideas were checked by engineers and the best constructors of the time, and the Germania project had the support of an entire elite of German building experts who were actively involved in it, so that there is next to nothing – even the Great Hall – which would not have been technically feasible,” he says.
The plans to demolish large swathes of the capital were in fact only helped by the massive allied air strikes on the city, as Speer himself liked to point out. One of the senior members of his planning department, Rudolf Wolters, went so far as to write in his diary after one particular attack: “Today once again the destruction by the allied bombers has assisted us greatly in our planning efforts!”
While it was impossible not to know of the restructuring plans, most details of the project were kept secret from ordinary people. Even the architects commissioned to build individual constructions were often not made aware of the other buildings that would be in the vicinity. No press reporting on the scheme was allowed without it going through the censors of Speer’s GBI.
For a while a trio of political satirists called Die Drei Rulands managed to poke fun at the town planners on the very public stage of a leading cabaret venue. In one musical number that addressed the plans to change the course of the River Spree to accommodate the Great Hall, they sang: “Yes, through Berlin it still flows, the Spree / But from tomorrow it’ll go through the Charité”, a reference to the city’s largest hospital. Unsurprisingly, in January 1939, they were slapped down with a lifetime performing ban by propaganda minister Joseph Goebbels.
Somewhat ironically it was the war that got in the way of Germania not being realised, as resources and attention – including Speer’s, following his appointment by Hitler as his minister of armaments and war production – was diverted elsewhere. The plans were to have been resumed at full throttle following a German victory, when the nations over whom Hitler expected to conquer would provide an endless supply of labour and materials. “Which is precisely why there was never any discussion about what the whole scheme was supposed to cost,” according to Schäche. “Right from the start, Speer was banking on materials and financial means that would be stolen from people now subservient to Germany.”
The extent to which money was never seen as an obstacle to realising Germania is illustrated by an anecdote about a visit made by Speer and his planning department to Horcher, one of the most popular VIP restaurants of the day, in which the group was seen slapping their thighs after one of them remarked: “Normally an authority has to shape its spending according to its income. We’re able to do precisely the opposite!”
Today, while Germania seems like a distant nightmare it still maintains a certain hold on the city. The government district of the “new Berlin”, following the 1991 move of the capital from Bonn, was deliberately built on the opposite axis to the one planned by Speer, a move that its architects described as “historical decontamination”.
From the viewing platform above the heavy load test structure, Richter points out an area in the district of Tempelhof-Schöneberg that has recently been the focus of strife between the government and renters. From 1938, around 1,000 properties worth a total of 200m Reichsmark were bought up by the authorities, for a price fixed by them, to enable the building of Germania. “They were marked ‘for destruction’ to make way for the so-called Great Road between the Triumphal Arch and the Great Hall. The residents were given similar properties elsewhere in the city and Jewish residents were moved in temporarily before they were deported to concentration camps.”
Property prices in Berlin are currently booming. So it’s hardly a surprise that the present-day federal government, who still owns those properties (they never were destroyed) and knew it was sitting on a gold mine, announced that they would sell them off to the highest bidder. The reaction from the local residents fearful of being pushed out of their homes by increased rents set by private investors was bitter and angry.
“So you see how the traces of Germania are still to be found even now,” says Richter, digging his hands into the pockets of his thick winter coat. 
Editor's Note: Adolph Hitler was the dictator of Nazi Germany during World War II. He wanted to conquer the world. He planned to tear down much of Berlin and make it into his Nazi capital. His city would be called Germania. Thousands died building it. Today, there is little left of Germania. The buildings look ordinary, but they are part of a terrible chapter in history. In the city of Berlin, there is a huge concrete circle.
It was built by the Nazis. It is almost 69 feet across and weighs about as much as 22 large airplanes. It sticks out of the ground more than four stories high. Its base goes 59 feet underground.
The concrete circle is called Schwerbelastungskörper. It means “heavy load test structure” in German. The Nazis wanted to build a huge Triumphal Arch. The circle was built in 1941 to see if Berlin's swampy ground could handle something so heavy.
German engineers came up with the concrete circle as a test, says Micha Richter. He is a Berlin architect, or building designer. Richter is a member of Berlin Underworlds. The group gives tours of historic sites across the city. The tours are mostly underground. French prisoners of war (POWs) were forced to build the concrete circle. 
Gerlot Schaulinski is a history expert in Berlin. He put together an exhibit called Mythos Germania. It is about the Nazi's plans to rebuild Berlin. He says that Germania shows what Nazism really was. It was cruel and showed that the Nazis thought they were better than everyone else.
World War II was a terrible time in history. Jewish people were put in prison camps and were killed by Nazi Germany. Germania was part of this plan. German Jews were forced to leave their homes and were sent to camps. Many of the camps were built very near to rock quarries. Tens of thousands of Jews and others died while digging rocks or making bricks for Germania.
If Germania was built, Berlin would have been completely changed. Large areas of the city would have been knocked down. From 50,000 to 100,000 houses would have been destroyed.
Now, Germania only exists in drawings and models.
Hitler became head of the German government in 1933. In 1937, he created a government department to rebuild Berlin.
The department planned a grand, 4-mile avenue. The crowning jewel was to be the Great Hall. Its dome would have been 16 times higher than the dome of St. Peter’s church in Rome, Italy. The Great Hall would have been the largest covered space in the world. 
Huge new buildings would have connected the Grand Hall and the Great Arch. On either side, wide streets were planned, as well as a huge lake and Nazi statues. Plans also included new roads, tunnels and expressways.
The size is still hard to imagine. It is clear, though, that Germania would have been difficult to live in. The Nazis just wanted a way to show off.
The Project Was "Crazy"
Many thought the test cylinder should have been destroyed at the end of the war. It was too big, though. People have tried to turn it into everything from a climbing wall with a cafe on top to a car showroom. Many people fought to save the cylinder. They wanted people to know what Berlin would have looked like if the Nazis has won the war. Thousands of people visit the cylinder every year.
Richter walked up to a platform for a view across the city. He could see dozens of construction cranes. It showed the huge amount of building still going on across Berlin. “This is the best impression you really get of just how crazy the Germania project was,” Richter explains.
Germania was never built because of the war. The Nazis had to use the building materials and money to fight the war. They planned to build the city after their victory. They believed they would conquer many countries and these countries would provide workers, money and building materials to build Germania.
None of this happened, because Germany lost World War II in 1945.
There is little left of Germania. People say that today, it seems like a nightmare from a long time ago. 
Editor's Note: Constricted by its medieval walls, Barcelona was suffocating – until unknown engineer Ildefons Cerdà came up with a radical expansion plan. Rival architects disparaged him, yet his scientific approach changed how we think about cities. In the mid-1850s, Barcelona was on the brink of collapse. An industrial city with a busy port, it had grown increasingly dense throughout the industrial revolution, mostly spearheaded by the huge development of the textile sector.
The city was living at a faster pace than the rest of Spain, and was ready to become a European capital. Yet its population of 187,000 still lived in a tiny area, confined by its medieval walls.
With a density of 856 inhabitants per hectare (Paris had fewer than 400 at the time), the rising mortality rates were higher than those in Paris and London; life expectancy had dropped to 36 years for the rich and just 23 years for the working classes. The walls were becoming a health risk, almost literally suffocating the people of Barcelona – who were addressed directly in the following public statement of 1843:
“‘Down with the walls!’ has said this province’s council, and ‘Down with the walls!’ has no doubt answered your town hall, which knows the importance of making this girdle disappear that is squeezing and choking us.”
Demolition work would finally start a year later. Now the city and the Spanish government had to design and manage the sudden redistribution of an overflowing population. It was a controversial and highly political decision – which ultimately led to the then unknown Catalan engineer Ildefons Cerdà’s radical expansion plan for a large, grid-like district outside the old walls, called Eixample (literally, “expansion”). In the process, Cerdà also invented the word, and study of, “urbanisation”.
By the early 19th century, the old walled city of Barcelona had become so crammed that the working classes, bourgeois society and factories all co-existed in the same space. “Everyone was suffering the consequences of an Asian-level density,” says the writer and essayist Lluís Permanyer, whose book Eixample: 150 Years of History chronicles that period.
As there was no more land left inside the city walls, all kinds of inventions were used to build more lodgings – houses were literally being created on empty space. Arches were erected in the middle of streets to be built upon, and a technique called retreating façades saw house fronts extended out into the street as they rose up – until they almost touched the building opposite (this practice was banned in 1770, as it prevented air circulation). 
Traffic – in those days, horse-drawn carts – was problematic too: the city’s narrowest street (now gone) was just 1.10 metres wide, while around 200 were less than three metres across. This, combined with residents’ Mediterranean way of life (which meant being on the street whenever it was light – and in the case of some artisanal professionals, working there too), worsened an already severe lack of hygiene in the city.
Barcelona’s epidemics were devastating: each time they broke out, 3% of the population died, according to Montserrat Pallarès-Barberà, geography and urbanism professor at Universitat Autònoma de Barcelona. Cholera alone killed more than 13,000 people between 1834 and 1865.
Into this came Cerdà. His plan consisted of a grid of streets that would unite the old city with seven peripheral villages (which later became integral Barcelona neighbourhoods such as Gràcia and Sarrià). The united area was almost four times the size of the old city (which was around 2 sq km) and would come to be known as Eixample.
This unknown engineer was revolutionary in what he envisioned – but also in how he got there. Cerdà decided to avoid repeating past errors by undertaking a comprehensive study of how the working classes lived in the old city. “He had thought he would find all these urbanism books, but there were none,” Permanyer says. So he was forced to do it himself.
Cerdà’s eye was as careful as it is fascinating. His was the first meticulous scientific study both of what a modern city was, and what it could aspire to be – not only as an efficient cohabiting space, but as a source of wellbeing (not a straightforward concept back then).
He calculated the volume of atmospheric air one person needed to breathe correctly. He detailed professions the population might do, and mapped the services they might need, such as marketplaces, schools and hospitals. He concluded that, among other things, the narrower the city’s streets, the more deaths occurred.
In short, Cerdà invented “urbanisation” – a word (and discipline) that didn’t exist in Spanish or Catalan, nor English or French, and which he codified in his General Theory of Urbanisation in 1867. His work is still studied in Catalan schools to this day. “The high mortality rates of the working class population, and poor health and education conditions, pushed Cerdà to design a new type of urban planning,” wrote Pallarès-Barberà in a recent paper about the district.
Gardens in the centre of each street block; rich and poor accessing the same services; and smooth-flowing traffic were among his then revolutionary, even utopian-sounding ideas – many of which materialised to at least some extent (although not the central gardens).
Eixample remains a prominent part of Barcelona’s image today: the octagonal blocks, chamfered in the corners, were his unique idea to deal with traffic, allowing drivers to see more easily what was happening to the left and right. Cars hadn’t even been invented yet – but when Cerdà discovered railways: “He realised there would be some sort of small machines moved by steam that each driver could stop in front of their house,” Permanyer explains. Even today, this design makes traffic circulation infinitely easier in Eixample.
And yet, none of these ideas were well-received or appreciated in Barcelona at the time. In fact, when the council originally opened a public competition for the extension plan in 1859, it had awarded it to its chief architect, Antoni Rovira. But in an unexpected intervention, the Spanish government stepped in and, via the creation of a new ministry of public works (which suddenly ruled over city councils), imposed Cerdà in a sign of historical – and future – tensions between Spain’s central and Catalan administrations.
This would forever taint Cerdà’s legacy in the city. A well-travelled but little-known engineer when he began his career-defining project, he was immediately mistrusted by Barcelona’s architects, who were in the middle of a considerable rivalry with engineers. As it was impossible to oppose the rulings coming from Madrid, his opponents instead tried to discredit him ideologically and intellectually.
Leading architects such as Domènech i Montaner (designer of the city’s celebrated Palau de la Música) and Josep Puig i Cadafalch slashed and patronised the streets’ excessive width, the monotony of the grid, and the sameness of the “communist phalanstery-like squares”.
“He has been nibbling at and turning all the gardens ... and spaces destined to public buildings into the monotony of an American city, destined for a pretentious tribe without more aspirations than the agglomeration of houses to eat, drink and sleep,” wrote Cadafalch.
But if Barcelona’s rival architects turned their back on Cerdà, the bourgeoisie didn’t – at least not all of it. Some members were the first to benefit (and pay for) his new district, wherein affluent families experimented and commissioned architects such as Antoni Gaudí to design their homes, turning them into beautiful, organic structures that evoked nature.
With this explosion of modernism, an unspoken urban competitiveness emerged. According to Permanyer, property owners and architects alike wanted to build “the biggest, tallest, most attractive house. This is why there’s such a rich diversity in architecture in the district – one that matches the anarchist touch of the local bourgeoisie”.
This drive to be different is illustrated by an anecdote Salvador Dalí once told Permanyer. According to the artist, when asked how he wanted his house, a member of the bourgeoisie said: “I’m only asking for one thing: for it to be taller than my neighbour’s, so that I can piss on it!” 
Cerdà’s plan, though, was a “liberation for everyone”, according to Permanyer. The engineer was a utopian socialist – and at the centre of his urbanism was a deep sense of equality and a populist ideology.
He had created a neighbourhood without class divisions where, both for ideological and public health reasons, the population would be spread out equally, and there wouldn’t be exclusive areas for the rich or poor. Over the following decades, Eixample grew with magnificent modernist buildings standing cheek by jowl with artisan homes demanding much cheaper rents.
Ramon Casas, a painter who had grown up in a shadowy house in the old town, was one of the modernist artists who moved to this new district, and could often be seen strolling or riding a bike on its streets with fellow cultural figures. His palette changed with the new luminosity that Eixample balconies let in – showing, with art, how a whole city was ready to look, and step, outside.
Barely cited in any urbanism books not written in Spanish or Catalan to this day, Cerdà finally began attracting praise from his compatriots, and even internationally, in the 1980s and 90s, when Catalan architects started revising history and recognising him – something that became “official” when the city hosted the 1992 Olympics.
These days, Barcelona is consistently praised as an urban success story. And its fortunes are inextricably linked to Cerdà’s work, which propelled it, in the words of Permanyer, “from a provincial town where it was difficult to live, to a truly modern city”.
Editor's Note: Trapped inside its city walls, Spain's Barcelona was suffocating. Unknown engineer Ildefons Cerdà developed an innovative plan to expand the city. His plans were criticized at the time, but he ended up changing how we think about cities.  Barcelona, Spain, was in serious trouble in the 1850s. It had many factories, a busy port and very many people. Many people had moved there to work in the cloth-making factories. However, there was no space for these people to live.
There were 187,000 people living in Barcelona at that time. They all lived in the same tiny area. Barcelona could not grow beyond the walls built around the city hundreds of years earlier.
In fact, Barcelona was so crowded that it was unhealthy to live there. People there were dying younger and younger. The city walls were making it hard for the people of Barcelona to breathe. 
In 1844, people began tearing down the walls. However, this created a new problem. Barcelona now needed a plan for where to move its people.
Ildefons Cerdà was chosen for this difficult and complicated project. Cerdà was an engineer from Catalonia, the region around Barcelona in northern Spain. Very few people knew who he was. 
Cerdà's plan for how to expand the city was new. It surprised many people. The plan featured a large, grid-like area outside the old walls. This new area was called Eixample, which means “expansion” in Catalan.
Before the old walls came down, Barcelona was very crowded. Rich people, poor people and the city's factories were all on the same streets. Many of these streets were very small and dirty. Very little fresh air moved through the streets.
Diseases were a huge problem. Each time a disease broke out, very many people died. Between 1834 and 1865, more than 13,000 people died from cholera alone. 
These were some of the problems Cerdà wanted to solve. His plan was to build a grid of very wide streets leading out of the old city. This grid would reach as far as seven nearby villages, making them part of Barcelona. The united area was almost four times the size of the old city. It came to be known as Eixample.
This plan was revolutionary. Cerdà wanted to avoid repeating the mistakes of past city planners. He wanted to design Eixample based on the habits of the people who would live there. To do this, he studied the working class people living in old Barcelona. No one had designed a city this way before. 
He calculated the amount of air a person needs to breathe correctly. He looked at what jobs the people of Barcelona might have. He mapped the things people might need most, like markets, schools and hospitals. He found that the narrower a city’s streets were, the more unhealthy they were.
Cerdà's studies became the foundation of “urbanization," the study of how and why cities grow. Cerdà did not just invent this field of study, he invented the very word. 
Cerdà had revolutionary ideas. He planned gardens in the center of each block. He pictured rich and poor people using the same services. He even planned for smooth-flowing traffic. Many of these ideas have become important parts of modern-day Barcelona. 
Yet, none of these ideas was appreciated in Barcelona at the time. Cerdà was not even the first choice for the job of planning how to expand Barcelona. The regional Catalonian council had chosen another architect for the job in 1859.
Cerdà only gained control of the project because of the national Spanish government. The government forced Catalonia to give the job to Cerdà.
Cerdà’s reputation in Barcelona never recovered from this. Not many people knew who Cerdà was in 1859, and Barcelona’s architects did not trust him. His rivals attacked his ideas for Eixample. 
However, not everyone turned their backs on Cerdà. The middle class of Barcelona trusted him. The middle class were the first people to buy homes in Eixample. Wealthy families experimented with the designs of their homes. These experiments turned many homes in Eixample into beautiful buildings.
Even with this success, Ildefons Cerdà is rarely mentioned in books about urbanism outside of Spain. He finally began attracting more praise in the 1980s and 1990s. This praise became “official” when Barcelona hosted the 1992 Olympic Games.
Barcelona is now seen as a successful city. Much of this praise is due to Cerdà’s work. Cerdà helped change Barcelona from a small, crowded city into a large and beautiful modern city. 
Editor's Note: In August 1945, a 16-kilotonne atomic bomb killed 140,000 people and reduced a thriving city to rubble. Hiroshima has been reborn as a place of peace and prosperity, but will memories of those dark days die with the last survivors? The people of Hiroshima have developed a verbal shorthand for describing their city’s layout. A particular street is “about 1.5 kilometres away”; a building “500 metres north”. No further explanation is required. The unspoken reference point is the hypocentre of the world’s first nuclear attack.
At first glance, visitors arriving by bullet train to Hiroshima’s main railway station might have little inkling of the city’s singularly tragic past. On a warm spring evening, groups of European tourists pause outside restaurants offering special deals on oysters – a local delicacy – and board pleasure boats to Miyajima, an island famous for its wild deer and “floating” Shinto shrine. But reminders of history’s antithesis to these quotidian pleasures are never far away.
South-west of the station, visitors to the city’s Peace Memorial Museum fall silent in front of steps retrieved from the ruins of Sumitomo Bank, the “shadow” of a human etched into the stone. Display cases show the shredded remains of a junior high-school uniform, the irradiated contents of a lunchbox and the frame of a tricycle – the small boy riding it was incinerated by the blast.
These harrowing exhibits are among the few physical reminders of the devastation that greeted survivors after the US B-29 bomber Enola Gay released Little Boy, a 16-kilotonne atomic bomb, over Hiroshima at 8.15am on 6 August 1945.
Less than a minute later, the bomb exploded 600 metres above Shima Hospital, creating a wave of heat that momentarily reached 3,000-4,000 degrees centigrade on the ground. Winds of up to 440 metres per second roared through the entire city. Within half an hour, almost every building within a two-kilometre radius of the hypocentre was in flames. About 90 percent of the city’s 76,000 buildings were partially or totally incinerated, or reduced to rubble. Of the 33m square metres of land considered usable before the attack, 40 percent was reduced to ashes. 
The bombed city was barely recognisable. What a day earlier had been a sprawling military city and transportation hub, wedged between mountain ranges to the north and the Seto inland sea to the south, was now a nuclear wasteland. Wooden homes had been burnt to the ground by firestorms; the city’s rivers were filled with the corpses of people desperately seeking water before they died. With the exception of a handful of concrete buildings, Hiroshima had ceased to exist.
A day after the attack, Keiko Ogura, then an eight-year-old schoolgirl, could barely believe her eyes as she looked down on her hometown from a hill. “The entire city had been burned to the ground,” says Ogura, one of many hibakusha – the Japanese name given to people exposed to radiation – who pass on their experience to visitors. “None of us could comprehend what had happened … we kept asking ourselves how an entire city could have been destroyed by a single bomb.”
Ogura, whose home narrowly escaped the firestorms, recalls seeing people shorn of their skin, almost indistinguishable from what remained of their clothes. While her father cremated hundreds of corpses in the open, Ogura gave water to the severely injured, only to watch them die in front of her.
“That was the beginning of a trauma that would stay with me for many years,” she says. “Talking about it now is a way of healing the psychological scars. It feels like I am doing something useful on behalf of the people who died.”
The blast instantly killed 80,000 of Hiroshima’s 420,000 residents; by the end of the year, the death toll would rise to 141,000 as survivors succumbed to injuries or illnesses connected to their exposure to radiation.
Yet even as they struggled to comprehend the horror visited on their homes, businesses, public buildings and fellow citizens, evidence emerged of remarkable acts of courage and resourcefulness. Incredible though it may seem, looking at the handful of black-and-white photos taken in the immediate aftermath of the attack, Hiroshima’s resurrection began just hours after it was effectively wiped from the map.
The lights came back on in the Ujina area on 7 August, and around Hiroshima railway station a day later. Power was restored to 30 percent of homes that had escaped fire damage, and to all households by the end of November 1945, according to records kept by the Hiroshima Peace Institute. 
Water pumps were repaired and started working again four days after the bombing, although damaged pipes created vast puddles among the ashes of wooden homes. The central telephone exchange bureau was destroyed and all of its employees killed, yet essential equipment was retrieved and repaired, and by the middle of August 14 experimental lines were back in operation.
A limited streetcar service resumed on 9 August, the same day Nagasaki was destroyed by a plutonium bomb, killing more than 70,000 people. With the need to move people and supplies into the city growing more urgent by the hour, the Ujina railway line started moving again on 7 August; a day later, trains on the Sanyo Line started running the short distance between Hiroshima and Yokogawa stations.
Historians say the quick resumption of services was a civic effort, helped by the arrival of large numbers of volunteers. “I do not think the restoration of basic services was simply due to coercion from the authorities,” says Yuki Tanaka, a historian and former professor at Hiroshima City University. “Hiroshima received a lot of help from people in neighbouring towns and cities such as Fuchu, Kure, and even Yamaguchi. In this sense, the response was similar to that seen after the 2011 Tohoku earthquake, when many people throughout Japan went to the devastated areas and helped the victims.”
It was inevitable, given the scale of destruction, that early attempts to re-establish a semblance of civic life on the scorched earth of ground zero were marked by chaos and confusion. The mayor, Senkichi Awaya, was among the dead, leaving the city without a leader; thousands of public servants, teachers and health professionals were also among the victims. On 6 August the municipal government office employed about 1,000 people; the following day just 80 reported for duty.
“They alone had to deal with emergency medical treatment, establish a food supply and retrieve and cremate corpses,” says Tanaka. “They were incredibly difficult times.” Attempts to care for the dying and seriously wounded verged on the futile: 14 of Hiroshima’s 16 major hospitals no longer existed; 270 of 298 hospital doctors were dead, along with 1,654 of 1,780 registered nurses. Demand for housing turned the area near the hypocentre into a shantytown of 10,000 homes that were little more than wooden shacks, with sanitary facilities shared among several households.
Although it was initially one of five Japanese cities under consideration by US President Harry Truman and his advisers, there are compelling reasons why the Americans targeted Hiroshima. Having begun as a castle town at the end of the 1500s under the rule of the feudal warlord Mori Terumoto, by the end of the 19th century it served as a regional garrison for the Imperial Japanese Army; as a major manufacturing centre, it helped fuel the Japanese empire’s military efforts in the Asia-Pacific.
The idea of transforming a large area of Hiroshima into a memorial to the A-bomb dead gained traction in 1946, when the local Chugoku Shimbun newspaper ran a competition soliciting readers’ visions for the city. First prize was awarded to Sankichi Toge, a poet, peace activist and A-bomb survivor – although some have speculated that his brother contributed many of the ideas in his essay. Toge, who died in 1953 aged 36, envisioned a peace plaza memorial, a library, museum and a place where visitors from around the world could come together to dedicate themselves to peace. About 40 percent of the city should be covered in greenery, he said.
The city government was sympathetic to Toge’s utopian vision, but lacked the money to act. Tax revenue had plummeted by 80 percent from pre-attack levels and parts of the city, including a military base near Hiroshima castle, still belonged to the state. The turning point came in 1949, when national politicians, recognising Hiroshima’s special status, passed the Peace Memorial City Construction Law, Article 1 of which states: “Hiroshima is to be a peace memorial city symbolising the human idea of the sincere pursuit of genuine and lasting peace.” 
Editor's Note: In August 1945, the United States dropped an atomic bomb over Hiroshima, Japan. More than 140,000 people were killed. Six days later, Japan surrendered and World War II ended. Hiroshima has since been reborn. Today it is a place of peace and prosperity. Today, Hiroshima is a big city again. People live there and enjoy their lives. People still think about the bomb. They even explain where things are in the city based on where the bomb fell. For them, "500 yards north" means 500 yards north of where the bomb fell.
The history of the bomb is hard to see. Today, visitors like to go to restaurants and ride boats to Miyajima Island. People who want to see the history of war can also do that. 
For them, the Peace Memorial Museum is the place to go. It has many things from the day the bomb fell. There is a school uniform, a child's school lunchbox and a tricycle frame. The bomb killed all of those people in a flash. 
"Burned To The Ground"
When the bomb exploded, it made the air as hot as the sun. Wind blew at 1,000 miles per hour. The wind and heat destroyed the city. 
Hiroshima is a city of rivers. After the bomb, the city’s rivers were filled with corpses. People had come to the river to drink the water. The bomb made them so weak that they died and fell into the water.  
Keiko Ogura remembers the day after the attack. She returned to the city on that day. She was an 8-year-old schoolgirl at the time. “The entire city had been burned to the ground,” says Ogura. “None of us could comprehend what had happened … we kept asking ourselves how an entire city could have been destroyed by a single bomb.”
What happened to Hiroshima was a horror. In the middle of the horror, people did brave things to help each other. Hiroshima’s rebirth began just hours after it was destroyed.
Some of the lights came back on the day after the bombing. Power was restored to 30 percent of homes that had escaped fire damage. Three months later, the whole city had power again.
Water pumps were repaired four days after the bombing. The central telephone exchange office was destroyed and all of its employees killed. By the middle of Aug. 14, experimental lines were back in operation. 
Streetcars and trains as well returned in days. They were needed to carry workers and supplies to rebuild Hiroshima. 
People rebuilding Hiroshima had a tough job to do. The mayor was dead, as were hundreds of city workers.
“They alone had to deal with emergency medical treatment, establish a food supply, and retrieve and cremate corpses,” historian Yuki Tanaka says. The hospitals had burned down. Most of the doctors and nurses were dead. People needed places to live, and so 10,000 families built homes made of scrap. 
The United States had thought about bombing other cities. There were some reasons Hiroshima was chosen. Hundreds of years ago, it was a castle town run by a warlord. Later, it was a major manufacturing center. It helped support the Japanese empire’s military efforts in the Asia-Pacific.
The idea of transforming a large area of Hiroshima into a memorial took hold in 1946. That was when a local newspaper ran a competition. Readers were invited to express their visions for the city. First prize was awarded to Sankichi Toge. He envisioned a peace plaza memorial, a library, museum and a place where visitors could come from around the world. Toge, who lived through the attack, died in 1953 at the age of 36. He wanted to make sure people remembered what happened in Hiroshima.
The city government liked Toge’s idea, but did not have enough money. Because the bomb killed so many people, the government had little money. There were not enough people to pay taxes to pay for new buildings. Good news came in 1949. National politicians, recognizing Hiroshima’s special place in history, passed the Peace Memorial City Construction Law. Part of it states: “Hiroshima is to be a peace memorial city symbolizing the human idea of the sincere pursuit of genuine and lasting peace.” 
Great Cities: How the U.S.-run Canal Zone divided Panama for a century
Editor's Note:The creation of the trans-oceanic canal came at a heavy price for Panama – with thousands of workers dying, and the US-controlled Canal Zone generating an “apartheid” atmosphere that sparked deep unrest. When Vasco Nuñez de Balboa crossed the Panama isthmus on foot in 1513, he had little intention of becoming the first European explorer to reach the Pacific Ocean. But his trek revealed Panama’s strategic location to be a treasure as great as any of the plunder brought home by other conquistadors for the Spanish crown.
After Balboa’s discovery, it didn’t take long for Spain’s royal court to imagine a canal crossing through Panama. Unfortunately, given the technology of the time, building it was all but impossible. In the 1500s, when Spain’s King Charles I ordered officials in Panama to study the construction of a new canal there, one replied, “There is not a prince in the world with the power to accomplish this.”
It was nevertheless an important overland route for centuries to come -– and when an American consortium finally succeeded in building a railroad through Panama’s dense jungle in 1855, the line proved immensely popular. Many locals, however, weren’t happy: a year after it opened, riots broke out between some Panamanians and the train’s passengers.
There were international tensions, too. Emboldened by the expansionist beliefs of president Theodore Roosevelt, US officials amplified the rift between Panama and Colombia -– so that when negotiations with Colombia broke down, the US government successfully backed insurgent Panamanians, allowing them to win their independence. In return, America was given the right to build a canal across the country. The centuries-long dream of a trans-oceanic link would finally be fulfilled.
It came at a heavy price for Panama, however. To facilitate construction of the new canal, the US required it to give up five miles of land along each side of the planned 48-mile canal route, where the US would exercise virtual sovereignty. This area would be known as the “Panama Canal Zone”.
The Canal Zone officially opened on 4 May 1904. After the American command took over, construction began on the canal itself, but also on homes, schools, hospitals, offices and recreational areas for the thousands of new American residents who would come to call themselves “Zonians”. It was an island on the isthmus, whose thorough separation from its host country instilled in its inhabitants a level of American nationalism surpassing that of their compatriots back home.
The Canal Zone was governed by a rigid social hierarchy. Social standing, as well as salaries, were managed through a combination of army hierarchy and the zone’s moralistic bylaws. While married couples were allowed to occupy homes, bachelors were relegated to shared housing.
These bylaws also enshrined overtly racist segregation. Residents were divided into “gold roll” and “silver roll” workers: gold roll workers were exclusively white; silver roll workers were mainly black, most of them migrants from Caribbean island nations. “Caste lines are as sharply drawn as they are in India,” said one Zonian quoted in Suzanne P Johnson’s Brief History of the Canal Zone. “Every rank and shade of a man has a different salary – and exactly in accordance with that salary is he housed, treated and furnished, down to the last item.”
Naturally, silver roll workers bore the brunt of the risks and hazards of constructing the new canal. As mountains of dirt were hauled from the great canal’s path, and mammoth lock gates that would allow ships to climb the country’s mountainous terrain were lowered into place, impoverished workers from the West Indies died in their thousands. Accidents, disease and miserable work conditions all contributed to the carnage; in the end, the canal’s official death toll came to 5,609 workers, only 350 of whom were white.
“I shall never forget the trainloads of dead men being carted away daily, as if they were just so much lumber,” recalls Alfred Dottin, a West Indian canal worker quoted in David McCullough’s extensive canal history The Path Between Two Seas. “It was a living hell.” 
For those Zonians not confined to the silver roll, life was good –- and once the canal finally opened in August 1914, ushering a steady flow of battleships and cargo freighters through the leafy Panamanian jungle, their lives only got better. Canal Zone residents boasted they never had to leave it for Panama City, since all the comforts of American life were available in the zone. Theatres screened the latest movies from American studios; convenience stores were stocked with the same goods Zonians were used to back home; restaurants served hamburgers and milkshakes.
Since the function of the Canal Zone was primarily to defend the canal, its population fluctuated depending on America’s military operations, peaking at around 100,000 during the Korean War. But the zone also maintained a sizeable civilian population -– and when it was eventually closed at the end of the 20th century, many former residents decried the decision.
As one former resident said immediately before the zone changed hands: “It’s sad, it’s bitter-sweet to see the flag coming down on this marvellous project.” To this day, former Zonians maintain a tight-knit community which meets yearly in Tampa, Florida.
For Panama, however, the effects of the canal and its surrounding US-controlled zone were far less positive. From the beginning, American construction efforts were designed specifically to offer as little economic benefit to native Panamanians as possible. A working paper by researchers Noel Maurer and Carlos Yu finds that American officials worked to “deliberately minimize the spillovers from the Canal”, by prohibiting Panamanians from working on it, and Panamanian businesses from providing services to the Canal Zone or to the ships passing through.
Though the footprint of the Canal Zone spared much of Panama City -– cutting westward to avoid its centre –- the existence of the zone was a sore spot for residents of the capital. Though technically allowed inside it, their presence was heavily discouraged by Canal Zone authorities. “Panamian residents couldn’t cross their own country at times without having to answer to a foreign police,” says Michael Donoghue, author of Borderland on the Isthmus: Race, Culture and the Struggle for the Canal Zone.
By the 1950s, tensions had reached a point where authorities agreed to build a wall along the border between Panama City and the Canal Zone. Though the wall did not fully limit access to the zone, it further stoked hostilities.
In 1964, they reached a tipping point. On 9 January, a group of angry students at Panama’s Instituto Nacional marched into the Canal Zone and insisted on raising Panama’s flag above Balboa High School. When students and staff rejected them, they became violent, destroying property in the zone. Authorities responded by tear-gassing the crowd.
In the violence that ensued, property was damaged on both sides of the zone, including parts of the wall. The incident left a death toll of 28 people, most of them Panamanians. A dramatic photo of the flag raising incident made the cover of Life magazine. To this day, 9 January is commemorated in Panama as “Martyr’s Day”.
The incident led to an international uproar, highlighting the stark divisions between Panama City and the Canal Zone. Jose Ponse, a 10th-grade Panamanian student at the time, recalled: “There was an apartheid that existed in the colonial atmosphere of the zone.”
After the incident, Colombia’s ambassador to the United States would visit the damaged wall and compare it to another brutal symbol of segregation. “In Panama there exists another Berlin Wall,” he said.
The incident also created a crisis within the US. Though newly elected president Lyndon Johnson reacted deftly, preserving US sovereignty over the Canal Zone for the time being, its days as an American territory were numbered. The expansionist mentality of the early 1900s had given way to the chess-board strategising of the Cold War.
American strategists accepted it would be best to abandon control of the zone as a tradeoff to discourage Latin American countries from turning to Soviet-style communism. In 1977, US President Jimmy Carter and Panamanian President Omar Torrijos signed two treaties that would phase out US control of the Canal Zone and the canal itself. Though many Panamanians were relieved by this deal, the hostilities were far from finished.
By 1989, Panama City had changed considerably from the sleepy tourist town it was before the canal was built. The city became known as a centre for international banking, propped up both by international trade and booming Colombian drug cartels looking for a place to launder their money.
During the elections that year, incumbent president Manuel Noriega appeared to have been beaten by his challenger, Guillermo Endara. Noriega, a former operative on the payroll of the CIA, had since drifted from his US-friendly position after a fallout with the Reagan administration. After the election, Noriega refused to step down, claiming the US had meddled with the election results.
On 15 December 1989, hostilities boiled over after four US soldiers were wounded, one fatally, by an angry mob in Panama City. Five days later, US troops invaded Panama in an attack the White House dubbed “Operation Just Cause”.
The main objective of the operation was the overthrow of Noriega. An attack on the headquarters of the Panama Defence Forces spread to the impoverished El Chorrillo neighbourhood, however, causing extensive damage to civilians and their property.
A few hours after the invasion began, Noriega was deposed as president and Endara was officially sworn in. But much of the city had been left in ruins. And while official Pentagon figures held that 516 Panamanians had been killed in the conflict, human rights groups in Panama placed the death toll as high as 3,500.
It was an ugly last gasp of what had been nearly a century of American rule in Panama. “I wouldn’t wish such destruction on my worst enemy,” said Rosa Turner, a resident of the neighbourhood, in an interview 25 years after the invasion. “We don’t even know where the remains of our deceased loved ones are, to leave them flowers at their tombs.” 
Panama City has changed greatly since then. Looking at the city from the viewpoint on Isla Perico, visitors can catch a glimpse of an immense cluster of high-rises in the city’s central San Francisco district to one side. The city’s banking boom has continued unabated in recent years -– and so too have its shady deals, as revealed in the “Panama Papers” leaks.
On the other side, a long line of massive cargo ships waits to pass through the canal. Those ships may soon be joined by even larger ones, as an expansion of the canal -– set to open next month -– will let in ships up to three times larger than the current limit.
One day, Panama’s emblematic canal may be threatened by a new waterway in Nicaragua -– though locals there seem as ambivalent about that project as Panamanians were about the Canal Zone, and construction has been delayed in recent months.
In Panama, meanwhile, many of the old Canal Zone’s structures remain. After the mass exodus of Americans following its closure, some of the lavish homes built there were snapped up by well-off Panamanians, while other structures have simply been abandoned.
Despite the inequalities of modern-day Panama City, and the upheavals that have shaken the city for much of its history, Panamanians remain proud of their identity -– which remains solidly attached to the canal. As one columnist recently wrote in La Estrella de Panama: “The canal is a natural resource that belongs to all of us, and thus it requires the genuine, responsible and patriotic involvement of all of us.” 
Great Cities: How the U.S.-run Canal Zone divided Panama for a century
Editor's Note: The creation of the canal that connects two oceans came at a big price for Panama. The Canal Zone was controlled by the US. Thousands of workers died, and there was a feeling that people of different races were not equal. This made many people in Panama upset. Panama is a small country between North and South America. The Panama Isthmus sits at Panama's narrowest point. This strip of land divides the Atlantic Ocean from the Pacific.
In the early 1900s, the United States built a canal through Panama. A canal is like a river. It allows ships to pass through land. Building the Panama Canal was not easy. Thousands of workers died, and many more were mistreated. The canal created lasting problems in Panama, leading to years of fighting.
Vasco Nuñez de Balboa crossed the Panama Isthmus on foot in 1513. He was the first European explorer to reach the Pacific Ocean. After his discovery, Spain wanted to build a canal through Panama. The canal would link the Atlantic and Pacific oceans. Ships would not have to make the long journey around South America. Unfortunately, no one had the tools or ability to build the canal back then.
Even so, Panama was an important land route for years to come. In 1855, a group of American businesses built a railroad through Panama's jungle. The railroad was very popular with Americans and Europeans. However, many Panamanians were unhappy. Fights broke out between some Panamanians and the train’s passengers.
In 1903, the U.S. helped Panama win freedom from Colombia. In return, America was given the right to build a canal across the country. The dream of a link between the oceans would finally come true.
The U.S. agreement called for Panama to give up 5 miles of land on each side of the canal route. The U.S. would have complete control in this area. It would be known as the Panama Canal Zone.
The Canal Zone opened on May 4, 1904. Building began on the canal. Homes, schools, hospitals, offices and play areas were also built for thousands of Americans who moved into Panama. The Americans called themselves Zonians.
The Canal Zone separated workers based on the color of their skin. "Gold roll" workers were all white. "Silver roll" workers were mainly black, most of them from Caribbean island nations. 
The silver roll workers faced the most dangerous working conditions. Thousands of poor workers from the West Indies died building the canal. Accidents, disease and terrible work conditions all contributed to the deaths. In the end, 5,609 workers died. Only 350 of them were white.
For those Zonians not on the silver roll, life was good. The zone offered all the comforts of American life, including the latest movies.
However, Panamanians were not treated well. They were not allowed to earn money by working on the canal. Panamanians traveling through the Canal Zone were often questioned by American police.
By the 1950s, American leaders agreed to build a wall between Panama City and the Canal Zone. This made the Panamanians even more angry.
On Jan. 9, 1964, the anger became too much. Students from Panama’s Instituto Nacional marched into the Canal Zone. They insisted on raising Panama’s flag above Balboa High School. When Balboa students and teachers rejected them, they started destroying property in the zone. Police sprayed tear gas at the crowd to make them stop. Twenty-eight people were killed, most of them Panamanians.
When U.S. Control Came To End, Struggles In Panama Did Not
The canal would not remain American property for much longer. In 1977, U.S. President Jimmy Carter and Panamanian President Omar Torrijos signed a deal. They agreed to scale back U.S. control of both the Canal Zone and the canal. Many Panamanians were relieved. However, the anger was far from finished.
In 1989, the U.S. government was in a struggle with Panamanian President Manuel Noriega. Panamaians voted for a new president. Noriega lost and accused the U.S. of interfering with the results. U.S. soldiers invaded Panama. They wanted to remove Noriega and make Guillermo Endara, who got more votes, the president. U.S. soldiers left much of Panama City in ruins. Many Panamanians were killed. 
Panama City is much different today. Tall buildings fill the skyline. The city is a center for global banking. Meanwhile, many of the old Canal Zone's buildings remain. When Americans returned to the U.S., they left behind fancy homes. Now rich Panamanians live there. Other buildings have been simply abandoned.
Trouble and fighting has shaken Panama City for much of its history. Still, Panamanians remain proud of the canal. It "belongs to all of us," one journalist wrote.
Editor's Note: The seemingly incoherent sprawl of modern Beijing is based on meticulous plans to bind citizens together under imperial rule. Conceived as a means of enforcing social order, the impact of planning remains strong in the city today. The seemingly incoherent sprawl of modern Beijing is based on meticulous plans to bind citizens together under imperial rule. Conceived as a means of enforcing social order, the impact of planning remains strong in the city today.
In the depths of Beijing’s Planning Exhibition Hall, a big grey hangar that squats in the corner of Tiananmen Square, stands a scale model of the city. It is an endless field of tiny wooden and perspex blocks, low-rise courtyards huddled cheek by jowl with a motley jumble of towers, expanding ever outwards in concentric rings.
To attempt to build a model of China’s 22-million strong capital is a Sisyphean endeavour. This carpet of miniature rooftops is hopelessly incapable of keeping up with the city’s relentless pace of change, the exhibition hall too small to ever contain a megalopolis so sprawling that it is currently building its seventh ring road, an orbital loop that will run for almost 1,000km in circumference.
But the model’s bird’s-eye view exposes something that is illegible from the ground: the rigid order that underlies the rambling sprawl. A rhythm of axes, grids and symmetrical walled compounds emerges from the chaos, pointing to the fact that this seemingly incoherent metropolis is in fact the carefully structured product of one of the earliest planning documents in history.
The first thing you notice is the monumental fissure that slices north-south through the city, as if the urban grain had been severed by a great tectonic rupture. It is an axis that runs for more than 20km, shooting out like a laser beam meridian line from the walls of the Forbidden City, the palatial compound that lies at the centre of it all.
The 180-acre imperial palace appears to send ripples through the surrounding urban grain like a rock thrown into a pond, forming the successive layers of ring-roads. Its rhythm of symmetrical walled courtyards seems to structure the layout of the entire city, from the scale of blocks, to streets, to individual homes. 
The effect is no accident: Beijing was conceived as a diagram of an organised, harmonious society, designed to bind the citizens together in bricks and mortar under the supreme rule of the emperor. It was to be an expression of absolute power like no other city in the world.
Founded more than 3,000 years ago as the city of Ji, Beijing’s present urban form was established in the early Ming dynasty (1368-1644), when the Yongle emperor moved the imperial capital here from Nanjing.
In establishing the fundamental layout of the new capital, the Ming reached for a suitably weighty touchstone, drawing on the teachings of the Kaogong Ji (roughly translated as “regulations of construction”), a text dating from the fifth century BC; part of the Rites of Zhou, an ancient Confucian manual of bureaucracy and organisational theory.
“It was a means of legitimising their rule,” says Toby Lincoln, a lecturer in Chinese Urban History at the University of Leicester. “By explicitly drawing on this ancient manual of rites, their new capital city used divine numerology and ritual to express the power of the ruling elite in physical space.”
As one of the oldest examples of urban planning guidance in the world, the Kaogong Ji covers everything from how to determine north-south orientation when planning a new city (stick a pole in the ground and watch its shadow), to dictating the specific dimensions for local, regional and national capitals.
It states that the national capital should be “a square with sides of nine li” (a traditional Chinese unit of measurement equivalent to around 500 metres), with “each side having three gateways”. Inscribed within this square, it stipulates that there must be “nine avenues running north-south and nine running east-west, each of the former being nine chariot tracks wide” – a principle that perhaps set the precedent for the scale of modern-day Beijing’s agoraphobia-inducing highways.
But the ancient Han Chinese were less concerned with the practicalities of easing chariot traffic flow than with casting the capital as an expression of divine power, organising the city as a direct representation of the cosmos – with the emperor (aka the Son of Heaven) at the very centre of this model universe. Accordingly, the ideal city would take the form of a perfect square (the shape that the earth was deemed to be), with its principal roads dividing it into nine equal sectors, representing the nine provinces of the empire. The three gates on each of the city walls, meanwhile, stood for the three elements of the universe – heaven, earth and man – the total adding up to the 12 months of the year. Residing at the heart of this city-sized cosmogram, the emperor was the very middle of the Middle Kingdom itself: he who held power over the city and state, by extension, held control over all creation.
And what a creation it was. When Marco Polo visited the city in the 13th century, before the Ming had taken control and begun their improvements, he described it as already being “so vast, so rich and so beautiful, that no man on earth could design anything superior to it”. By the time the Yongle emperor had finished building his 10-metre thick walls in the mid-15th century, Beijing was the largest city in the world (a distinction it held until the early 19th century) – a majestic capital of the oldest and richest civilisation on the planet, whose command of science and technology far exceeded that of Europe, which was just emerging from the dark ages.
This conception of the city as an expression of both regal power and social order, guided by cosmological principles and the pursuit of yin-yang equilibrium, was unlike anything in the western tradition. As architect and Chinese scholar Alfred Schinz, author of The Magic Square: Cities in Ancient China, puts it: it is “probably the most elaborate and complex system of thought developed by ‘archaic’ man about the world order and its reflection in a planned settlement structure”.
It was a form of symbolic planning that had a strong impact on the everyday life of the city, too, influencing the profane world beyond the realm of the emperor’s divine rituals. Each of the city gates was assigned a particular function, according to the kind of traffic that was permitted to enter through it. Chaoyangmen, to the east, was used for grain, prompting warehouses to grow up around it. Andingmen, to the north, saw the daily flow of night-soil, with three great pans outside where it was dried and sold to farmers, stimulating agricultural trade immediately outside the city walls. Qianmen, to the south, was positioned on a central trading route, which fostered a lively market culture that continues to this day – although the informal street markets were sadly swept away and replaced with a Disneyfied traditional shopping street for the 2008 Olympics.
The city plan also proved to be a powerful way of structuring and maintaining a sense of order down to the scale of the individual family, the walled compound form extending beyond the gates of the imperial palace and into the home. According to David Bray, author of Social Space and Governance in Urban China, not only did the walled city “embody a complex array of cosmologically determined symbolic spaces, designed to reinforce the might of the emperor and his government, but also, in its simple grid design it provided the template for the ordering of everyday social life.”
Just as the 180-acre imperial palace was structured as a rigid diagram of court hierarchy – its courtyards, halls and suites of 9,000 rooms organised according to the royal food chain – so too were Beijing’s surrounding houses planned as an expression of the Confucian family structure. The traditional courtyard homes, or siheyuan, that line the city’s hutong alleyways were arranged according to the “duties of obligation” between family members.
The northern-most wing was the place of the patriarch and his wife (or wives), the eastern wing was for to the second-ranking male and his family, the western wing was for the third-ranking male, while the southern wing closest to the street was for servants and the menial functions of cooking and storage. As anthropologist Francesca Bray puts it, the traditional courtyard house was “a kind of loom, weaving individual lives into a typically Chinese social pattern” – the city itself a regularised tapestry of obedient subjects laid out before the emperor. 
The repetition of the walled compound as a means of enforcing social order was a tool that didn’t go unnoticed centuries later by Chairman Mao. In his drive to erode the nuclear family structure, he began to reconfigure Beijing into a network of semi-autonomous enclaves, each under the control of the danwei – the work unit to which each citizen was assigned and the basic unit by which society was organised and controlled in the Communist era, both ideologically and physically.
Each compound was to be self-sufficient, offering its residents housing, employment, education and healthcare, along with communal canteens and bath houses, creating miniature walled cities within the city. Intended to foster a sense of belonging and being part of a collective endeavour, it instead turned Beijing into a place of introverted islands, separated by competition and mutual distrust. It had the effect of atomising the previously vibrant urban society into a world of isolated cells, each citizen’s loyalties tied to their danwei, which managed every aspect of their lives, from cradle to grave, issuing permits for marriage, divorce and even childbirth.
While the controlling power of the danwei has been progressively diluted, and the land holdings of state-owned enterprises increasingly sold off to private developers, the model of walled compounds continues in Beijing to this day. “Walls, walls, and yet again walls,” was the reaction of Swedish art historian Osvald Sirén, when he visited China’s capital in the 1920s. “They surround (the city), they divide it into lots and compounds, they mark more than any other structures the basic features of the Chinese communities.”
He was recounting his experience of walking the hutongs of old Beijing, within the limits of the city walls – which were demolished in the 1960s to build a subway line, above which the second ring road now rumbles – but he could have been describing driving past one of the many gated communities that have since sprung up across the city. These exclusive islands of themed villas and apartment blocks, surrounded by private schools and swimming pools, have a mirror image at the opposite end of the social spectrum, too.
“Enhance the idea of safety and reduce illegal crimes,” read a banner hanging over the main road to Shoubaozhuang, a village of 7,000 migrants to the south of Beijing – one of 16 such villages around the city that was subject to a programme of “sealed management” in 2010, their residents’ routines controlled by a strict curfew. The ancient cosmological symbolism may long have fallen away from the streets of Beijing, but the role of city planning as a means of enforcing social order is as strong as ever. 
Editor's Note: The confusing layout of modern Beijing is based on detailed plans to bring citizens together under the emperor's rule. The plan was thought of as a means of making people follow social rules and the effect of planning remains strong in the city today. Beijing is a complicated city. It was built according to a detailed plan centuries ago. The city plan was meant to keep things and people in order. 
A model of the city stands in Beijing’s Planning Exhibition Hall. The model is an endless field of tiny wooden blocks. 
Looking at the model from above shows the neatness beneath the crowded mass. The city is the result of early detailed planning.
A crack runs from north to south through the city model. It shoots out from the walls of the Forbidden City, which is the palace at the center of Beijing.
Circles of roads lead out from the palace. The walled courtyards seem to make up the layout of the entire city.
Beijing was planned as an organized, peaceful city. It was supposed to hold the citizens together under the rule of the emperor, who was in charge. The city would  show his great power.
Beijing was first built more than 3,000 years ago. The royal Ming family changed it several centuries later. They designed Beijing to be something like it is today. The third Ming emperor was called the Yongle emperor. He moved the royal center to Beijing from the southern city of Nanjing.
To build the city, the Ming followed the teachings in an ancient book. It was called the Kaogong Ji. It teaches about traditional patterns. 
The Kaogong Ji says the main city should be a square. At the time, people thought the Earth was shaped like a square. Each side should have three gateways. Inside this square should be nine streets running from north to south, and nine streets going from east to west. The ancient Chinese were not so worried about being practical. They wanted the city to be powerful. The city represented the world, with the emperor living in the center of the world.
The Yongle emperor finished building Beijing more than 500 years ago. Beijing was then the largest city in the world. It was the center of the oldest and richest society on the planet. Beijing's understanding of science and technology was much better than Europe's.
The city planning affected everyday life. Each of the city gates served a purpose. The eastern gate was used for grain. The northern gate was for fertilizer. The southern gate was for trading. Many markets sprung up around the southern gate. They were replaced with a tourist shopping street for the 2008 Olympic Games. 
Rooms in the palace were given out depending on how much power a family member had. Common family homes were organized the same way. The homes were built around a courtyard. The courtyards were next to narrow streets. 
The northern part of the home was for the man in the family with the most power and his wife. The eastern wing was for the second-most powerful man. The western wing was for the third. The southern wing was closest to the street. It was for servants and for cooking and storage.
Chairman Mao used the same ideas of order to control people. Chairman Mao was in charge of China from 1949 to 1976. He wanted China to break with its old ways. To weaken the power of the family, he remade Beijing into a network of groups called work units. The work units were organized by where people lived and what they did. The government owned and controlled these work units. 
Each unit took care of itself. They became small walled cities. They were intended to make people feel like they belonged to a group. Instead, they turned Beijing into a place of separated islands. Loyalties were tied to a person's work unit, which managed everything in their lives.
Work units are no longer strong. However, the model of walled groups of buildings continues in Beijing today. The old courtyard homes of Beijing were taken down in 1960. However, gated neighborhoods have since sprung up across the city. 
Editor's note: William Penn’s city was planned as a utopian ideal; a grid of broad streets to promote green urban living for settlers to this 17th-century colony. While Penn grew disillusioned, his design lives on in Philadelphia, and around the world. The surveyor Thomas Holme’s “Portraiture of the City of Philadelphia”, printed in London in the politically turbulent and deathly cold winter of 1683, is a picture of urban grandeur, civility and order. Designed to encourage shareholders and lure settlers with the prospect of a new and improved life in the Quaker William Penn’s fledgling Pennsylvania colony, Holme’s document is a 17th-century forerunner of more modern US billboards selling “the American dream”.
The antique advertisement depicts a rectilinear grid of long, broad, intersecting streets stretching for two miles between navigable rivers to east and west, and a mile from north to south. At the grid’s heart is a giant civic square, echoed in each quadrant by a spacious park adorned with symmetrical plantings of bushy trees. A rash of numbered property lots spreading from each side and up the main streets suggests development is well under way; the blanks represent room for opportunity.
Like the nationwide dream it foreshadowed, the grid’s promise was at once mythical and foundational: a utopian urban ideal that not only guided the construction of Philadelphia, but resonates in cities and towns across America – and arguably the world – shaping millions of lives, identities and minds. Such has been the persuasive power of the 1683 advertisement that, three-and-a-half centuries later, its influence lives on in the city’s latest development plan, Philadelphia 2035 – a vision for the future rooted in a vision of the past.
Penn – a well-connected Englishman who made it his mission to create a refuge in America for Quakers and other persecuted religious groups from Europe – was prone to celebrating his colony as a free gift from God. In fact, Philadelphia’s construction depended on a cunningly negotiated deal with the English king. 
In March 1681, a cash-strapped Charles II, unable to repay a debt owed to Penn’s late father Adm Sir William Penn, instead made the young heir sole owner of 45,000 square miles of land south-west of New Jersey and north of Baltimore – the king assuming, in a god-like fashion typical of British imperial monarchs, that the territory was his to give. As a feudal-style proprietor, Penn could in turn grant out land as he saw fit.
Within a month, he published the first in a series of promotional tracts with the aim of generating investor interest in his plan to “settle a free, just and industrious colony”. His promised land guaranteed freedoms, rights and liberties – for white Europeans at least. The first cargo of enslaved Africans sold fast to his settlers on its arrival in 1684.
The constitution and laws Penn devised owed much to Magna Carta, the first American printing of which would appear in Philadelphia in 1687. Yet the province nonetheless constituted his personal estate, and the planning process merged religious and political considerations with economic pressures.
“I cannot make money without special concessions,” Penn wrote after a few months of intense meetings with prospective buyers. “Though I desire to extend religious freedom, yet I want some recompense for my trouble.” The “holy experiment” he had envisaged was giving way to hard-headed real estate development.
To encourage investors, Penn commissioned a map of “Some of the South and East bounds of Pennsylvania in America, being Partly Inhabited”. Those who “partly inhabited” the territory included Swedes, Dutch and English as well as indigenous peoples, though the map’s depiction of “Sesquahana fort Demolished” seems calculated to give the impression that the land sold to new buyers would be, as Penn claimed, “free from any Indian encumbrance”.
More attractive than accurate, the map is decorated with trees – almost an alphabet from ash to walnut – which served not merely to justify the name of Pennsylvania (meaning Penn’s woods), but to suggest the land’s great fertility and commercial viability, including an abundance of timber fit for building. Trees, John Evelyn had stressed in his 1664 bestseller Sylva, were the prime source of England’s national and imperial strength.
In a vast forest clearing along the Delaware River, Penn planned a great port city connected to the country by 17th-century superhighways uniting commercial and landed interests. The first purchasers were enticed with a property lot in each of three zones: country, city, and its surrounding liberties.
Troubled by the memory of fire and plague in London during the 1660s, and their frequent devastation of colonial ports, Penn wished his capital would “never be burnt, and always be wholesome”. With that aim, the streets were to be “uniform down to the water”, and each house would ideally be placed in the middle of its plot, “so there may be ground on each side for gardens or orchards or fields”. Penn’s imagined city was not really a city at all. It was, in his own words, “a green country town”.
When he arrived in America in autumn 1682, Penn found Holme, his surveyor general, staking out the city’s first streets on a neck of land between the Delaware and Schuylkill rivers. The pair agreed the location could hardly be bettered for the health of business and bodies alike. By extending the grid to connect the riverbanks, they created a 480-hectare (1,200-acre) city with two waterfronts, maximising its commercial potential as well as access to drinking water. This is the design idea set out in Holme’s Portraiture, and which continues to define Center City, Philadelphia today.
The design echoes myriad earlier grids stretching back to the ancient world – for Thomas Jefferson, it revived “the old Babylon” – but perhaps the closest inspiration was Richard Newcourt’s bold design for rebuilding London in 1666, with its central square at the intersection of axial streets, surrounded by four satellite squares. But while London was still, in reality, re-emerging from its ruins along roughly the same crooked and winding lines as before, Philadelphia began to grow and evolve according to the grid.
The grid’s great virtue is its adaptability, says Daniel McCoubrey, president and principal of the Philadelphia-based architectural firm VSBA LLC. “The grid was easily laid out by surveyors, then divided to meet commercial and residential needs, and it is infinitely extendable.” As Holme commented, his plan could “when time permits, be augmented”. 
For a speculative venture such as Philadelphia, McCoubrey says gridded plots made it easier to sell property “sight unseen”. Hence the grid plan “became the primary means of dividing and selling land during westward expansion” across America, forming the basis of many subsequent cities and towns.
But what makes Philadelphia’s grid so distinctive, and enduring, is “the green idea” embedded in its initial concept. For Kate Wingert-Playdon, associate dean of architecture and environmental design at Temple University’s Tyler School of Art, this is the thread that links Penn’s vision to the present day, and has become Philadelphia’s “core asset and value”. While many American cities promote the idea of sustainability, she argues that Philadelphia’s strategy for green growth – including its bid to be the greenest city in the US – builds directly on its founding planning principles.
Even the smallest urban lots in Holme’s plan provided room for a garden and small orchard alongside a house – “to the great content and satisfaction of all here concerned” – and streets that initially commemorated prominent residents were renamed after “the things that spontaneously grow in the country”, such as Chestnut, Mulberry and Vine.
Most significantly, Penn’s dream of a green country town was preserved in the plan’s four park squares, intended “for the like uses, as the Moore-fields in London”. Lying just north of the English capital’s walls beyond present-day Moorgate, Moorfields was more than a much-praised recreational space in the 17th century, “a pleasurable place of sweet airs for citizens to walk in”. As a public space and buffer to development, it had strong communitarian associations.
It is testament to the power of Philadelphia’s garden squares as an idea that they were inscribed in maps for a century or more before they materialised (indeed, while their grounds were used as rubbish dumps and burial sites), and that they are now an indelible feature of the city’s urban identity and imagination.
“Initially, the four public squares and centre square had little impact, as most development was confined to the area between the Delaware River and Fifth Street up until the early 19th century,” explains John Andrew Gallery, a former executive director of the Preservation Alliance for Greater Philadelphia. “The western squares didn’t really exist at all since there was no development in that area until the 1850s. However, in the 19th and 20th centuries the four squares became focal points of their areas.”
Today, they form the centres of individual residential and cultural neighbourhoods – each one with a “unique character”, according to McCoubrey.
“The plan continues to have a strong and positive impact on the life of Center City, Philadelphia,” says Gallery, who worked with the leading post-war planner Edmund Bacon at the Philadelphia City Planning Commission in the 1960s, then as founding director of the city’s Office of Housing and Community Development in the 1970s. Not only has it proved flexible for the wide range of residential and commercial development from 1683 right through to 2035, he suggests, but it is easy for both residents and visitors to understand. For his part, McCoubrey sees Philadelphia as a great city for walking as well as living and working.
Gallery is less positive about the developments that occurred beyond Penn’s grid, where no guidance was given to settlers and roads radiated out from the hub like spokes on a wheel. The extension of the grid following the consolidation of county and city in 1854 created awkward intersections between the planned and unplanned, and older commercial areas declined as development followed the grid rather than the earlier streets. Yet as Gallery acknowledges, it is perhaps unfair to blame Penn for his failure to foresee a city covering 125 square miles.
In time, Penn became all too aware of the “troublesome work” of urban planning. When he returned to England in 1684, forced home by politics and financial setbacks, he wrote in some despair from the ship: “And thou, Philadelphia ... what travail has there been, to bring thee forth, and preserve thee from such as would abuse and defile thee!”
By 1700, he was so disillusioned that he tried, unsuccessfully, to sell back his proprietorship to the crown. But the Penn family’s hold on the province through to American independence – when now-prosperous Philadelphia provided the setting for the signing of both the Declaration and the Constitution – and the birth of institutions such as the American Philosophical Society and Pennsylvania Horticultural Society helped preserve his vision for posterity.
Writing in defence of his colony in November 1683, Penn wrote: “Whatever men may say, our wilderness flourishes as a garden, and our desert springs like a green field.” Were he able to download Philadelphia2035, he would surely take comfort from the lines that insist on his plan’s place “in the collective memory of the city and the region”, and especially its continued significance in promoting sustainable urban growth.
However much the physical imprint of Penn’s plan may morph and fade, the values inscribed in his grid and squares – egality, adaptability, community, greenness – promise to shape the city’s image for years to come.
Editor's note: William Penn’s city was planned as an ideal city; many organized, broad streets to help living for settlers to this 17th-century colony. While Penn no longer believed in this idea as he got older, his design lives on in Philadelphia, and around the world. Thomas Holme drew many maps during his life. In 1683 he drew a map of a city that was not built yet. This city was Philadelphia, in the new Colony of Pennsylvania. The map was called the “Portraiture of the City of Philadelphia." It was printed in London, England. The map was used as an ad to make people want to move to William Penn's new Colony. 
The map shows a grid of long, crisscrossing streets. The streets run east to west and north to south. The city is in between two rivers. One river hugs the east edge of town. The other river hugs the west edge. A large square where people can gather is in the middle of the grid. The rest of the grid is split into four parts. Each part is the same size and has a park with nice, big trees. 
Philadelphia was built on this simple design of squares. Many other cities all over the world have used a grid design like Penn's. People still use Penn's ideas. In fact, Philadelphia has a new plan for the city's future. It is called "Philadelphia2035" and it has many of Penn's ideas in it, more than 300 years later.
William Penn was an Englishman and a Quaker. Quakers were Christians devoted to peace. People in Europe did not like Quakers much because they believed in a different religion. Penn wanted to build a safe city in America for Quakers and other groups that were having problems in Europe. He made a deal with King Charles II of England. The deal let Penn build his city. 
King Charles II had borrowed some money from Penn's father, but could not pay it back. The king did not have much money in 1681. King Charles II gave Penn land instead of money. He gave Penn 45,000 square miles of land. It became the Pennsylvania Colony. 
Penn wanted Europeans to move to Philadelphia and buy land from him. Penn wrote a set of laws for his Colony. He promised freedoms and rights, but these mostly applied to white Europeans. Africans and other non-white people did not have those freedoms. Penn allowed people in Philadelphia to own other people as slaves. The first ship of people who were sold into slavery arrived in Philadelphia in 1684.
Penn showed a map of Philadelphia to people interested in moving there. The map was decorated with many trees. The name Pennsylvania means "Penn’s woods." Land with many trees was said to be very rich. Having lots of trees meant there would be a good supply of wood for building. 
Penn was born in 1644 in London. The streets of London were narrow. Everything was so close together that disease and fire could jump quickly from person to person and house to house. A disease called the bubonic plague wiped out thousands of people in London in 1665. A large fire left 100,000 without homes in 1666.
Penn did not want his city to have the same problems as London. He wanted each house to be in the middle with a garden or field around it. That way, fire and disease would not be able to spread as easily. Penn wanted Philadelphia to be “a green country town.”
Penn made sure that his green country town would have four parks. He remembered going to parks near London. Parks were nice places with fresh air for people to walk in. It still took about 100 years for Philadelphia's parks to be built as he wanted. These parks are now an important part of the city. 
“The green idea” in the design makes Philadelphia's grid special, says Kate Wingert-Playdon. Wingert-Playdon is a professor of architecture in Philadelphia. She says many American cities want to have more parks and trees. Philadelphia already has good parks and many trees thanks to Penn's green grid plan.
In time, William Penn became tired of the “troublesome work” of city planning. He returned to England in 1684. He did not have enough money to continue working in America. Penn tried to sell Philadelphia back to the king of England in 1700. The king did not buy it back. Instead, Penn's family kept the land. Philadelphia eventually became a rich and busy city. 
Modern city planners still recognize Penn's grid design as the heart of Philadelphia. The new "Philadelphia2035" plan recognizes Penn for his contributions. He wanted Philadelphia to be a place of equal rights, community, and green spaces. Penn's ideas will continue to shape the city for many years to come. 
Editor's Note: By the mid-1800s, the River Thames had been used as a dumping ground for human excrement for centuries. At last, fear of its ‘evil odour’ led to one of the greatest advancements in urban planning: Joseph Bazalgette’s sewage system. In the steaming hot summer of 1858, the hideous stench of human excrement rising from the River Thames and seeping through the hallowed halls of the Houses of Parliament finally got too much for Britain’s politicians – those who had not already fled in fear of their lives to the countryside.
Clutching hankies to their noses and ready to abandon their newly built House for fresher air upstream, the lawmakers agreed urgent action was needed to purify London of the “evil odour” that was commonly believed to be the cause of disease and death.
The outcome of the “Great Stink”, as that summer’s crisis was coined, was one of history’s most life-enhancing advancements in urban planning. It was a monumental construction project that, despite being driven by dodgy science and political self-interest, dramatically improved the public’s health and laid the foundation for modern London.
You’ll see no sign of it on most maps of the capital or from a tour of the streets, but hidden beneath the city’s surface stretches a wonder of the industrial world: the vast Victorian sewerage system that still flows (and overflows) today.
London is, of course, an ancient metropolis, but according to the city’s prolific biographer (and Londoner) Peter Ackroyd, the 19th century “was the true century of change”. And by the mid-1800s, reform of the capital’s sanitation, like much else in the nation’s political and social life, was long overdue.
For centuries, the “royal river” of pomp and pageantry, the city’s main thoroughfare, had doubled as a dumping ground for human, animal and industrial waste. As London’s population grew – and it more than doubled between 1800 and 1850, making it by far the largest in the world – the build-up of waste itself became a spectacle no one wanted to see, or smell. 
With a lack of planned housing and infrastructure to support the crowded citizenry, increasingly filthy streams, ditches and antiquated drainage pipes all bubbled into the Thames, where the detritus simply bobbed up and down with the tide. The apparent progress of flushing toilets (marketed to the masses at the Great Exhibition in 1851) only made things worse, overwhelming old cesspools and forcing ever more effluent into the river, which belched it back into the city at each high water.
The “silver Thames” eulogised by earlier poets had become, in the words of the Royal Institution scientist Michael Faraday in 1855, “an opaque pale brown fluid”. Dropping pieces of white paper into the river, Faraday found that they disappeared from view before sinking an inch below the surface. All too clear was the main contaminant: “Near the bridges the feculence rolled up in clouds so dense that they were visible at the surface, even in water of this kind,” he wrote.
Faraday’s report of the dire straits of “Father Thames” was echoed in numerous editorial columns and cartoons that scorned the once-majestic river’s demise into the most polluted metropolitan waterway in the world. The British empire was literally rotting at the core.
“Through the heart of the town a deadly sewer ebbed and flowed, in the place of a fine fresh river,” Charles Dickens wrote in Little Dorrit (1855-57). The fetid fumes alone, it was thought, could strike a man dead. What made the water lethal, however, was that a great many Londoners were drinking it piped directly from the Thames. Even water pumped from outside the city risked contamination with sewage when it reached the squalid streets, and the wells still in use lay dangerously close to leaking cesspools.
In 1834, the humorist cleric Sydney Smith vividly described the unpalatable truth: “He who drinks a tumbler of London water has literally in his stomach more animated beings than there are men, women and children on the face of the globe.”
The result was successive waves of waterborne diseases such as dysentery, typhoid and, most feared of all by mid-century, cholera. For this “Victorian plague”, as the historian Amanda J Thomas characterises it, there was no known cure – whatever quacks claimed – and the wealthy were not immune. The first major cholera epidemic in Britain, in 1831-32, killed more than 6,000 Londoners. The second, in 1848-49, took more than 14,000. Another outbreak in 1853-54 claimed a further 10,000 lives.
With the bodies piling up, the people and the press pushed for change. The working class basket-maker and poet Thomas Miller wrote in the Illustrated London News: “Let us then agitate for pure air and pure water, and break through the monopolies of water and sewer companies, as we would break down the door of a house to rescue some fellow-creature from the flames that raged within. It rests with ourselves to get rid of these evils.”
Investigating cholera’s spread in Soho in 1854, the physician Dr. John Snow deduced that the cause was contaminated water. His evidence included the 70 workers in the local brewery who only drank beer and all survived. Yet public health officials were slow to be convinced. The “miasma theory” that diseases were caused by noxious vapour in the air held stubborn sway, leading the well-meaning social reformer Edwin Chadwick – insisting that “all smell is disease” – to hasten the abandonment of stinking cesspools in favour of flushing the sewers into the Thames. The effect was more ill than good.
His arguments largely dismissed, Dr. Snow died in 1858 at the height of the Great Stink, a “miasmatic” event that helped prove his point by failing to unleash a new outbreak of disease – if miasma were deadly, the Great Stink surely would have been.
By overpowering the politicians in the Houses of Parliament, though, the stench still proved a catalyst for change. The miasmatists were at least right about one thing: the reeking river correlated with the city’s health and needed to be cleaned.
As MPs shrouded themselves behind curtains soaked with chloride of lime to counter the fumes, they couldn’t say they hadn’t been warned. Just a few years earlier, Faraday had urged officials that they could not ignore the state of the Thames “with impunity; nor ought we to be surprised if, ere many years are over, a hot season give us sad proof of the folly of our carelessness”. In the heatwave of 1858, the stagnating open sewer outside Westminster’s windows fermented and boiled under the scorching sun.
Benjamin Disraeli, the Tory leader in the Commons and Chancellor of the Exchequer, lamented how “that noble river” had become “a Stygian pool reeking with ineffable and unbearable horror”, and introduced legislation “for the purification of the Thames and the main drainage of the metropolis”.
Up to this point, London had lacked a unified authority with the money required to address such an extensive problem of sanitation on an effective scale. Now the recently formed Metropolitan Board of Works was empowered to raise £3m and instructed to start work without further delay. The board’s chief engineer, Joseph Bazalgette, who had already spent several exasperating years drawing up plans for an ambitious new sanitation system, only for each one to be swiftly shelved, at last, got the go-ahead to begin construction.
Stephen Halliday, author of The Great Stink of London, explains: “Bazalgette’s plan, which was modified in some details as construction progressed, proposed a network of main sewers, running parallel to the river, which would intercept both surface water and waste, conducting them to the outfalls at Barking on the northern side of the Thames and Crossness, near Plumstead, on the southern side.” These combined sewers thus diverted rainwater and effluent downstream, well beyond the built-up city to the east, from where it would flow more easily out to sea.
The network included 82 miles of new sewers, great subterranean boulevards that in places were larger than the underground train tunnels then under construction. With a minimum fall of two feet per mile, the main drainage sewers employed gravity to conduct their contents downstream, while smaller sewers were egg-shaped (narrower at the bottom than the top) to encourage the flow.
Pumping stations were built at Chelsea, Deptford, Abbey Mills and Crossness to raise up sewage from low-lying areas and discharge it onwards to the outfalls. The latter two especially were architecturally magnificent, evocative of cathedrals in their design, dimensions and ornament. Symbolic of the grandeur of the entire project, they proudly announced their role in forging a more wholesome and, perhaps, holy London.
The scheme also involved the huge challenge of embanking the Thames, creating the Victoria, Albert and Chelsea embankments. Informed by Bazalgette’s experience of land drainage and reclamation while working as a railway engineer, London’s embankments were designed not only to carry tunnels (including the underground railway), but also to help cleanse the river by narrowing and strengthening its flow through the city’s centre.
Halliday notes that while the embankments were Bazalgette’s “most conspicuous works” for which he received the greatest credit – it is on Victoria Embankment that a monument to the engineer, who was knighted in 1875, may be found – he himself regarded the main drainage as his greatest achievement: “It was certainly a very troublesome job,” Bazalgette reflected. “It was tremendously hard work.”
The hard work of thousands of labourers overseen by Bazalgette inspired the artist Ford Madox Brown as he painted Work, a large canvas completed in 1865, the same year that the main drainage works were opened at Crossness by the Prince of Wales (though the construction in fact continued for another decade). Brown’s image is bursting with activity and society – rich and poor, young and old, rural and urban – but all this revolves around and, we may infer, depends on the industrious workmen at the centre, building an enlightened tunnel below ground.
Framed by forearms and tools, a hod carrier descends into the depths with more bricks: a building material that Bazalgette’s project employed in such vast quantities – 318m – that prices escalated along with the wages of bricklayers, who down-tooled to secure a rise from 5 to 6 shillings a day.
According to the Observer newspaper, “every penny spent is sunk in a good cause” in the creation of this “most extensive and wonderful work of modern times”. And the work almost immediately proved its worth: in 1866, most of London was spared from a cholera outbreak which hit part of the East End, the only section not yet connected to the new system.
“What was extraordinary about Bazalgette’s scheme was both its simplicity and level of foresight,” writes Paul Dobraszczyk in London’s Sewers. A classic piece of Victorian over-engineering, the infrastructure was planned to accommodate a population growth of 50%, from 3 million to 4.5 million. Within 30 years of its completion, the city’s population had in fact doubled again, reaching 6 million. It is testament to the quality of design and construction that, with improvements and additions, the 19th-century system remains the backbone of London’s sewers in the 21st century. 
But the backbone is now severely strained. With a still-expanding population, dramatic downpours associated with climate change and the loss of green spaces to soak up the excess, the Thames is once again at risk.
Bazalgette provided for extreme weather with overflows into the river, to prevent the flooding of homes and streets. And those overflows are now being used more than ever – around 50 times a year – dumping raw sewage under the noses of present-day MPs in Westminster.
Martin Baggs, the outgoing chief executive of Thames Water, has been upfront about the challenges. “They say that history repeats itself: 150 years ago the River Thames was polluted; that’s where we are again today. Was it acceptable 150 years ago? No, it wasn’t. Is it acceptable today? No, it’s not. We’ve got to do something about it.”
Construction of the company’s solution, the Thames Tideway Tunnel – or “super sewer” – is due to begin this year, for completion in 2023. One of the largest civil engineering projects the country has ever seen, and not without controversy, the tunnel is a “visionary work of modern times”, in Ackroyd’s view, “in the spirit of Bazalgette”.
Hopefully Ackroyd is right. That great engineer shared some wise words based on his own experiences of re-planning London: “Private individuals are apt to look after their own interests first, and to forget the general effect upon the public. It is necessary that there should be somebody to watch the public interests.” 
Editor's Note: By the mid-1800s, the River Thames had been used as a dumping ground for human waste for centuries. At last, fear of its ‘evil odour’ led to one of the greatest advancements in city planning: Joseph Bazalgette’s sewage system. In the steaming hot summer of 1858, there was an awful sewer stink coming from the River Thames. It was everywhere in the Houses of Parliament. Finally, it was too much for Britain’s leaders. Many fled in fear of their lives to the countryside.
The lawmakers agreed that some action was needed right away. They needed to get rid of the “evil odor.” They believed it was the cause of disease and death.
This “Great Stink,” as it was called, led to one of history’s most life-improving plans. It improved the public’s health and helped create a more modern London.
You’ll see no sign of it on most maps of the capital.  It cannot be seen when you tour the streets of London. It is hidden underground. It is a wonder of the industrial world, a great sewage system that still flows (and overflows) today.
London is an old city. However, the 19th century saw a lot of change. By the mid-1800s, the capital created a modern water and sewer system.
For centuries, the River Thames was a dumping ground for human, animal and industrial waste. London’s population more than doubled between 1800 and 1850. It was the largest city in the world. The build-up of waste became a huge problem.  No one wanted to see or smell it.
There was no planning to improve the city for this huge population. Filthy streams, ditches and very old drainage pipes all bubbled into the River Thames. The litter just bobbed up and down with the tide. The use of new flushing toilets only made things worse. Old cesspools overflowed. More and more liquid waste ran into the river.
In 1855, scientist Michael Faraday said the “silver Thames” had become a pale, dark, brown liquid. Rotting slime was everywhere on the river's surface.
Newspapers complained the River Thames was the most polluted river in the world. London was rotting at the core.
The smells alone, it was thought, could kill people. Why was the river so deadly? The answer was that many Londoners were drinking the river water. It was piped directly into their homes from the Thames. Even water pumped from outside the city picked up some sewage. The wells still in use were too close to leaking open pools of waste. 
The water caused stomach diseases and deadly cholera. Cholera had no known cure. Both poor and wealthy died. Cholera attacks in Britain killed thousands from 1830 to 1870.
The people and newspapers pushed for change. The poet Thomas Miller called for protests demanding clean air and water. He wrote. "It rests with ourselves to get rid of these evils.”
In 1854, a doctor, Dr. John Snow,  discovered that cholera came from dirty water. His proof came from 70 workers in a beer factory. They only drank beer. They did not drink water. They never got cholera. Few people believed Dr. Snow. Most believed that cholera came from the smell.
In 1858 at the time of the Great Stink, cholera was not a big problem. If bad air was deadly, the Great Stink surely would have killed thousands.
The awful smell finally did change the minds of the men in the Houses of Parliament. They realized the stinking river did have something to do with the city’s health. The river needed to be cleaned.
Benjamin Disraeli was a great British leader. He said the River Thames was like a river in Hell. He pushed for a law that would clean the river and the city's water supply. In the past, London did not have the power or the money to clean up the problem. Now the city got permission to raise 3 million pounds. The work began. The chief engineer, Joseph Bazalgette, had already spent several frustrating years drawing up plans for a new water and sewer system.  Each plan was ignored.  At last, he got the go-ahead to begin construction.
Bazalgette 's plan included 82 miles of new sewers. They ran along both sides of the river. These sewers also moved rainwater and overflowing river water.  It then flowed down to the sea.
Pumping stations were built to raise up sewage from low-lying places. From there the sewage could flow down and away. Some of the pumping stations looked like large churches. Some said it made London look more holy.
High banks of dirt were also built along the River Thames. Bazalgette had built them strong enough to carry both sewer and underground railway tunnels. “It was certainly a very troublesome job,” Bazalgette said. “It was tremendously hard work.” Thousands worked on the project.
Today, on one of the river banks stands a monument.  It is there to honor and remember Bazalgette.
An artist, Ford Madox Brown, made a painting called "Work." It shows people building a tunnel below ground. Around the edges are strong arms, tools and bricks. Bazalgette’s project used millions of bricks to build the sewers. 
The hard work and money spent was worth it. In 1866, cholera again hit London. No one caught cholera in places that had the new sewers.
Bazalgette’s plan helped people right away. It also helped people in the future. It was planned to work for 3 million to 4.5 million people. In the next 30 years, it still worked well for the 6 million that lived in London. 
The sewers have been improved through the years. Today, in the 21st century, much of Bazalgette's plan is part of London’s sewer system.
Today almost 14 million people live in London. With climate change, the River Thames is once again in trouble.
Bazalgette tried to plan for extreme weather. He worried about flooding. Today sewage is again starting to leak out.
History is repeating itself. The River Thames is getting polluted again. It was fixed 150 years ago. It has to be fixed again.
Work on a “super sewer” will begin this year. It will be finished in 2023.  Editor's Note: With its mathematical layout and earthworks longer than the Great Wall of China, Benin City was one of the best planned cities in the world when London was a place of "thievery and murder." So why is nothing left? This is the story of a lost medieval city you’ve probably never heard about. Benin City, originally known as Edo, was once the capital of a pre-colonial African empire located in what is now southern Nigeria. The Benin empire was one of the oldest and most highly developed states in west Africa, dating back to the 11th century.
The Guinness Book of Records (1974 edition) described the walls of Benin City and its surrounding kingdom as the world’s largest earthworks carried out prior to the mechanical era. According to estimates by the New Scientist’s Fred Pearce, Benin City’s walls were at one point “four times longer than the Great Wall of China, and consumed a hundred times more material than the Great Pyramid of Cheops”.
Situated on a plain, Benin City was enclosed by massive walls in the south and deep ditches in the north. Beyond the city walls, numerous further walls were erected that separated the surroundings of the capital into around 500 distinct villages.
Pearce writes that these walls “extended for some 16,000 km in all, in a mosaic of more than 500 interconnected settlement boundaries. They covered 6,500 sq km and were all dug by the Edo people … They took an estimated 150 million hours of digging to construct, and are perhaps the largest single archaeological phenomenon on the planet”.
Barely any trace of these walls exist today.
Benin City was also one of the first cities to have a semblance of street lighting. Huge metal lamps, many feet high, were built and placed around the city, especially near the king’s palace. Fuelled by palm oil, their burning wicks were lit at night to provide illumination for traffic to and from the palace.
When the Portuguese first “discovered” the city in 1485, they were stunned to find this vast kingdom made of hundreds of interlocked cities and villages in the middle of the African jungle. They called it the “Great City of Benin”, at a time when there were hardly any other places in Africa the Europeans acknowledged as a city. Indeed, they classified Benin City as one of the most beautiful and best planned cities in the world.
In 1691, the Portuguese ship captain Lourenco Pinto observed: “Great Benin, where the king resides, is larger than Lisbon; all the streets run straight and as far as the eye can see. The houses are large, especially that of the king, which is richly decorated and has fine columns. The city is wealthy and industrious. It is so well governed that theft is unknown and the people live in such security that they have no doors to their houses.”
In contrast, London at the same time is described by Bruce Holsinger, professor of English at the University of Virginia, as being a city of “thievery, prostitution, murder, bribery and a thriving black market made the medieval city ripe for exploitation by those with a skill for the quick blade or picking a pocket”.
Benin City’s planning and design was done according to careful rules of symmetry, proportionality and repetition now known as fractal design. The mathematician Ron Eglash, author of African Fractals – which examines the patterns underpinning architecture, art and design in many parts of Africa – notes that the city and its surrounding villages were purposely laid out to form perfect fractals, with similar shapes repeated in the rooms of each house, and the house itself, and the clusters of houses in the village in mathematically predictable patterns.
As he puts it: “When Europeans first came to Africa, they considered the architecture very disorganised and thus primitive. It never occurred to them that the Africans might have been using a form of mathematics that they hadn’t even discovered yet.”
At the centre of the city stood the king’s court, from which extended 30 very straight, broad streets, each about 120-ft wide. These main streets, which ran at right angles to each other, had underground drainage made of a sunken impluvium with an outlet to carry away storm water. Many narrower side and intersecting streets extended off them. In the middle of the streets were turf on which animals fed.
“Houses are built alongside the streets in good order, the one close to the other,” writes the 17th-century Dutch visitor Olfert Dapper. “Adorned with gables and steps … they are usually broad with long galleries inside, especially so in the case of the houses of the nobility, and divided into many rooms which are separated by walls made of red clay, very well erected.”
Dapper adds that wealthy residents kept these walls “as shiny and smooth by washing and rubbing as any wall in Holland can be made with chalk, and they are like mirrors. The upper storeys are made of the same sort of clay. Moreover, every house is provided with a well for the supply of fresh water”.
Family houses were divided into three sections: the central part was the husband’s quarters, looking towards the road; to the left the wives’ quarters (oderie), and to the right the young men’s quarters (yekogbe).
Daily street life in Benin City might have consisted of large crowds going though even larger streets, with people colourfully dressed – some in white, others in yellow, blue or green – and the city captains acting as judges to resolve lawsuits, moderating debates in the numerous galleries, and arbitrating petty conflicts in the markets.
The early foreign explorers’ descriptions of Benin City portrayed it as a place free of crime and hunger, with large streets and houses kept clean; a city filled with courteous, honest people, and run by a centralised and highly sophisticated bureaucracy.
The city was split into 11 divisions, each a smaller replication of the king’s court, comprising a sprawling series of compounds containing accommodation, workshops and public buildings – interconnected by innumerable doors and passageways, all richly decorated with the art that made Benin famous. The city was literally covered in it.
The exterior walls of the courts and compounds were decorated with horizontal ridge designs (agben) and clay carvings portraying animals, warriors and other symbols of power – the carvings would create contrasting patterns in the strong sunlight. Natural objects (pebbles or pieces of mica) were also pressed into the wet clay, while in the palaces, pillars were covered with bronze plaques illustrating the victories and deeds of former kings and nobles.
At the height of its greatness in the 12th century – well before the start of the European Renaissance – the kings and nobles of Benin City patronised craftsmen and lavished them with gifts and wealth, in return for their depiction of the kings’ and dignitaries’ great exploits in intricate bronze sculptures.
“These works from Benin are equal to the very finest examples of European casting technique,” wrote Professor Felix von Luschan, formerly of the Berlin Ethnological Museum. “Benvenuto Celini could not have cast them better, nor could anyone else before or after him. Technically, these bronzes represent the very highest possible achievement.” 
What impressed the first visiting Europeans most was the wealth, artistic beauty and magnificence of the city. Immediately European nations saw the opportunity to develop trade with the wealthy kingdom, importing ivory, palm oil and pepper – and exporting guns. At the beginning of the 16th century, word quickly spread around Europe about the beautiful African city, and new visitors flocked in from all parts of Europe, with ever glowing testimonies, recorded in numerous voyage notes and illustrations.
Now, however, the great Benin City is lost to history. Its decline began in the 15th century, sparked by internal conflicts linked to the increasing European intrusion and slavery trade at the borders of the Benin empire.
Then in 1897, the city was destroyed by British soldiers – looted, blown up and burnt to the ground. My great grandparents were among the many who fled following the sacking of the city; they were members of the elite corps of the king’s doctors.
Nowadays, while a modern Benin City has risen on the same plain, the ruins of its former, grander namesake are not mentioned in any tourist guidebook to the area. They have not been preserved, nor has a miniature city or touristic replica been made to keep alive the memory of this great ancient city.
A house composed of a courtyard in Obasagbon, known as Chief Enogie Aikoriogie’s house – probably built in the second half of the 19th century – is considered the only vestige that survives from Benin City. The house possesses features that match the horizontally fluted walls, pillars, central impluvium and carved decorations observed in the architecture of ancient Benin.
Curious tourists visiting Edo state in Nigeria are often shown places that might once have been part of the ancient city – but its walls and moats are nowhere to be seen. Perhaps a section of the great city wall, one of the world’s largest man-made monuments, now lies bruised and battered, neglected and forgotten in the Nigerian bush.
A discontented Nigerian puts it this way: “Imagine if this monument was in England, USA, Germany, Canada or India? It would be the most visited place on earth, and a tourist mecca for millions of the world’s people. A money-spinner worth countless billions in annual tourist revenue.”
Instead, if you wish to get a glimpse into the glorious past of the ancient Benin kingdom – and a better understanding of this groundbreaking city – you are better off visiting the Benin Bronze Sculptures section of the British Museum in central London. Editor's Note: With walls longer than the Great Wall of China, Benin City was one of the greatest cities in the world. So why is nothing left? Benin City was once a large and beautiful city. It was built before the year 1100 and was at the center of a powerful African kingdom. However, not all cities last forever. Benin City was destroyed in 1897. Today, there is almost nothing left of it. 
Benin City was located near the western coast of Africa. The Benin kingdom included land that is now in the country of Nigeria. Benin City was famous for many things. One of the most famous parts of the city was its walls. 
The walls of Benin City were the largest walls ever built without machines. They were made of dirt and were built by a great many people. Fred Pearce is a writer who has studied these walls. He thinks they were probably about “four times longer than the Great Wall of China."
Very little of these walls still stand today. Just like Benin City itself, they were destroyed. 
The first people from Europe to visit Benin City arrived in the year 1485. These visitors came from Portugal and were very surprised by what they saw. They did not expect to find a large kingdom in the middle of Africa. These Portuguese visitors thought Benin City was very beautiful and very well built. They called it the “Great City of Benin.”  
Benin City was different from most cities in Europe. European cities at that time had many twisting roads. Their buildings were often different shapes and sizes. There was not very much order in the way these cities were built. 
Benin City had a great deal of order. The city was built using patterns called fractals.
Ron Eglash has studied fractal designs. He explains that fractals are like patterns that repeat one shape in many different sizes. Eglash says that Benin City was built using perfect fractals.
Every building in Benin City was the same shape as every other building. The sizes of these buildings changed, but the shape never did. All of these buildings made a pattern that covered the whole city. At the center of the city was the king's court. 
Benin City was covered in art. Artists used metal to make statues or sculptures. The sculptures showed the leaders' great deeds. They were so well made that they became very famous. 
Benin City became known as a city full of art and beauty. Visitors came from all parts of Europe to see the wonders of Benin City.
The great Benin City did not last forever. By the 1800s, many European countries had become very powerful. Some tried to take control over parts of Africa. England started to try to control the Benin kingdom.
In 1897, a Benin chief killed a small group of Englishmen. After that, England sent an army to Benin City. This army destroyed Benin City and burned it to the ground. Much of its art was taken back to England.
Eventually, a new Benin City was built near where the old city once stood. However, there are no ruins of the old city. The ruins were not saved. The old Benin City is now only a memory. 
Not all of Benin City is lost, however. The British Museum in London, England, has a collection of art that was taken when the city was destroyed. This art is now the best way to see what life was like in old Benin City. 
Editor's Note: The foundation of al-Mansur’s "Round City" in 762 was a glorious milestone in the history of urban design. It developed into the cultural centre of the world. If Baghdad today is a byword for inner-city decay and violence on an unspeakable scale, its foundation 1,250 years ago was a glorious milestone in the history of urban design. More than that, it was a landmark for civilisation, the birth of a city that would quickly become the cultural lodestar of the world.
Contrary to popular belief, Baghdad is old but not ancient. Founded in AD762 by the Abbasid caliph al-Mansur “The Victorious” as the new seat of his Islamic empire, in Mesopotamian terms it is more arriviste than grande dame – an upstart compared to Nineveh, Ur and Babylon (seventh, fourth and third millennium BC respectively).
Baghdad is a mere baby, too, when compared with Uruk, another ancient Mesopotamian urban settlement, which lays claim to being one of the world’s earliest cities and which was, sometime around 3,200BC, the largest urban centre on earth with a population estimated at up to 80,000. Some think the Arabic title for Babylonia, al-Iraq, is derived from its name.
We know a huge amount about the city’s meticulous and inspired planning thanks to detailed records of its construction. We are told, for instance, that when Mansur was hunting for his new capital, sailing up and down the Tigris to find a suitable site, he was initially advised of the favourable location and climate by a community of Nestorian monks who long predated Muslims in the area.
According to the ninth-century Arab geographer and historian Yaqubi, author of The Book of Countries, its trade-friendly position on the Tigris close to the Euphrates gave it the potential to be “the crossroads of the universe”. This was a retrospective endorsement. By the time Yaqubi was writing, Baghdad, City of Peace, had already become the centre of the world, capital of the pre-eminent Dar al-Islam, home to pioneering scientists, astronomers, poets, mathematicians, musicians, historians, legalists and philosophers.
Once Mansur had agreed the site, it was time to embark on the design. Again we are told that this was entirely the caliph’s work. Under strict supervision he had workers trace the plans of his round city on the ground in lines of cinders. The perfect circle was a tribute to the geometric teachings of Euclid, whom he had studied and admired. He then walked through this ground-level plan, indicated his approval and ordered cotton balls soaked in naphtha (liquid petroleum) to be placed along the outlines and set alight to mark the position of the massively fortified double outer walls.
On 30 July 762, after the royal astrologers had declared this the most auspicious date for building work to begin, Mansur offered up a prayer to Allah, laid the ceremonial first brick and ordered the assembled workers to get cracking.
The scale of this great urban project is one of the most distinctive aspects of the story of Baghdad. With a circumference of four miles, the massive brick walls rising up from the banks of the Tigris were the defining signature of Mansur’s Round City. According to 11th-century scholar Al Khatib al Baghdadi – whose History of Baghdad is a mine of information on the construction of the city – each course consisted of 162,000 bricks for the first third of the wall’s height, 150,000 for the second third and 140,000 for the final section, bonded together with bundles of reeds. The outer wall was 80ft high, crowned with battlements and flanked by bastions. A deep moat ringed the outer wall perimeter.
The workforce itself was of a stupendous size. Thousands of architects and engineers, legal experts, surveyors and carpenters, blacksmiths, diggers and ordinary labourers were recruited from across the Abbasid empire. First they surveyed, measured and excavated the foundations. Then, using the sun-baked and kiln-fired bricks that had always been the main building material on the river-flooded Mesopotamian plains in the absence of stone quarries, they raised the fortress-like city walls brick by brick. This was by far the greatest construction project in the Islamic world: Yaqubi reckoned there were 100,000 workers involved.
The circular design was breathtakingly innovative. “They say that no other round city is known in all the regions of the world,” Khatib noted approvingly. Four equidistant gates pierced the outer walls where straight roads led to the centre of the city. The Kufa Gate to the south-west and the Basra Gate to the south-east both opened on to the Sarat canal – a key part of the network of waterways that drained the waters of the Euphrates into the Tigris and made this site so attractive. The Sham (Syrian) Gate to the north-west led to the main road on to Anbar, and across the desert wastes to Syria. To the north-east the Khorasan Gate lay close to the Tigris, leading to the bridge of boats across it.
For the great majority of the city’s life, a fluctuating number of these bridges, consisting of skiffs roped together and fastened to each bank, were one of the most picturesque signatures of Baghdad; no more permanent structure would be seen until the British arrived in the 20th century and laid an iron bridge across the Tigris.
A gatehouse rose above each of the four outer gates. Those above the entrances in the higher main wall offered commanding views over the city and the many miles of lush palm groves and emerald fields that fringed the waters of the Tigris. The large audience chamber at the top of the gatehouse above the Khorasan Gate was a particular favourite of Mansur as an afternoon retreat from the stultifying heat.
The four straight roads that ran towards the centre of the city from the outer gates were lined with vaulted arcades containing merchants’ shops and bazaars. Smaller streets ran off these four main arteries, giving access to a series of squares and houses; the limited space between the main wall and the inner wall answered to Mansur’s desire to maintain the heart of the city as a royal preserve.
The centre of Baghdad consisted of an immense central enclosure – perhaps 6,500 feet in diameter – with the royal precinct at its heart. The outer margins were reserved for the palaces of the caliph’s children, homes for the royal staff and servants, the caliph’s kitchens, barracks for the horse guard and other state offices. The very centre was empty except for the two finest buildings in the city: the Great Mosque and the caliph’s Golden Gate Palace, a classically Islamic expression of the union between temporal and spiritual authority. No one except Mansur, not even a gout-ridden uncle of the caliph who requested the privilege on grounds of ill-health, was permitted to ride in this central precinct.
One sympathises with this elderly uncle of the caliph. Unmoved by his protestations of decrepit limbs, Mansur said he could be carried into the central precinct on a litter, a mode of transport generally reserved for women. “I will be embarrassed by the people,” his uncle Isa said. “Is there anyone left you could be embarrassed by?” the caliph replied caustically. 
Mansur’s palace was a remarkable building of 360,000 sq ft. Its most striking feature was the 130ft-high green dome above the main audience chamber, visible for miles around and surmounted by the figure of a horseman with a lance in his hand. Khatib claimed that the figure swivelled like a weathervane, thrusting his lance in the direction from which the caliph’s enemies would next appear. Mansur’s great mosque was Baghdad’s first. Encompassing a prodigious 90,000 sq ft, it paid dutiful respect to Allah while emphatically conveying the message that the Abbasids were his most powerful and illustrious servants on earth.
By 766 Mansur’s Round City was complete. The general verdict was that it was a triumph. The ninth-century essayist, polymath and polemicist al-Jahiz was unstinting in his praise. “I have seen the great cities, including those noted for their durable construction. I have seen such cities in the districts of Syria, in Byzantine territory, and in other provinces, but I have never seen a city of greater height, more perfect circularity, more endowed with superior merits or possessing more spacious gates or more perfect defences than Al Zawra, that is to say the city of Abu Jafar al-Mansur.” What he particularly admired was the roundness of the city: “It is as though it is poured into a mould and cast.”
The last traces of Mansur’s Round City were demolished in the early 1870s when Midhat Pasha, the reformist Ottoman governor, tore down the venerable city walls in a fit of modernising zeal. Baghdadis have since grown used to being excluded from the centre of their resilient capital.
Just as they had been barred from the inner sanctum of the city under Mansur, so were their 20th-century counterparts excluded from the heart of Baghdad on pain of death 12 centuries later under Saddam Hussein. The heavily guarded district of Karadat Maryam, slightly south of the original Round City on the west bank, became the regime headquarters, the engine room of a giant machine carefully calibrated to cow, control and kill using the multiple security organisations that enabled a country to devour itself. Under the American occupation of 2003 it became the even more intensely fortified Green Zone, a surreal dystopia of six square miles in which Iraqis were largely unwelcome in their own capital.
Today, after a 12-year interlude, the Green Zone is open to Baghdadis again. But as so often in their extraordinarily bloody history, Iraqis find they have very little to cheer about as the country tears itself apart. The great city of Baghdad survives, but its people are once again engulfed in terrible violence.  Editor's Note: About 1,250 years ago, a man named al-Mansur ruled the Abbasid Dynasty. He was known as the caliph. His dynasty followed the Muslim religion. The area he ruled included what is now Iran, Iraq and other parts of the Middle East. During this time, al-Mansur built the ancient city we now call Baghdad. It was called the "Round City." It became a central part of the world at the time. Al-Mansur developed his 'Round City' in 762 A.D. The city's design was an important step in the history of how cities are made.
Al-Mansur was known as "The Victorious." He built Baghdad to house the government of his Islamic empire. 
Detailed records were kept about how Baghdad was planned. Mansur's selection of its location is an example. Al-Mansur was sailing up and down the Tigris River hunting for his new capital. A group of Christian monks told him about the location. These monks lived in the area long before Muslims came.
## Round City, Radical Idea
Arab historian Yaqubi wrote about the city years later. He wrote that the location was close to the Tigris and Euphrates rivers. It was the perfect place for trading. Scientists, poets and mathematicians lived there. Musicians, historians and other educated people also made it their home.
We are told that al-Mansur designed the city by himself. He had workers trace the plans of the round city on the ground in lines of ashes. Al-Mansur studied the work of Greek math expert Euclid. He made his city round because he admired Euclid's teachings. Designing a round city was a radical new idea.
Royal astrologers said July 30, 762 A.D., was the best day to begin building. Al-Mansur prayed to Allah that day. He placed the first brick. Then he ordered the builders to get to work.
The Round City was four miles around. It had huge brick walls. Each section of the wall had more than 450,000 bricks. The bricks were baked in the sun and hardened in ovens called kilns. The bricks were held together with bundles of reeds. The outer wall was 80 feet high. A deep moat circled the outer wall.
A huge number of workers helped to build Baghdad. Yaqubi guessed there were 100,000 workers involved. There were architects, engineers, law experts, carpenters, blacksmiths and others. The Round City was the greatest construction project in the Islamic world. 
The outer walls had four gates. Roads led from the gates to the center of the city. 
A gatehouse rose above each of the four outer gates. People had amazing views from the highest gate houses. They could see the many miles of palm groves and green fields near the Tigris.
Shops lined the four roads that ran toward the center of the city. Smaller streets ran off these four main roads. They led to squares and houses.
The center of Baghdad was closed off. This area was about a 6,500-foot circle. The outer part of this royal area was reserved for the palaces of al-Mansur's children. Homes for the royal servants, kitchens, housing for the horsemen and offices were also located in this section. 
The very center was empty except for the two finest buildings in the city. These were the Great Mosque and the Golden Gate Palace. Putting the mosque, or religious gathering place, next to the palace was significant. It was the Islamic way of showing how the church and government were combined. 
Al-Mansur’s palace was a remarkable building of 360,000 square feet. It had a 13-foot-high green dome, or round roof. The dome could be seen for miles and was topped by the figure of a horseman with a spear in his hand. Khatib claimed that the horseman turned to point his spear toward the direction the caliph’s enemies would come from next. Al-Mansur’s great mosque was Baghdad’s first. It filled 90,000 square feet. The large mosque paid respect to Allah while showing the Abbasids' power.
By 766, al-Mansur’s Round City was complete. People said it was a triumph.
The Round City has since been destroyed. The last traces of al-Mansur’s Round City were demolished in the early 1870s. Ottoman governor Midhat Pasha wanted to modernize Baghdad. He tore down the city's walls. 
Great Cities: Rome wasn't planned in a day … in fact wasn't planned at all
Editor's Note: The grid system which the Roman republic exported all over Europe was never employed in the capital itself. The city has always lacked a coherent plan – save for the monumental temple that once towered over it. According to Tacitus, perhaps the greatest of all Roman historians, it was the great temple of Jupiter Optimus Maximus on the Capitoline Hill that held the key to the future of ancient Rome.
Writing about a fire at the temple in AD69, Tacitus assumed the conflagration would embolden the enemy Gauls into thinking they might finally conquer the city, such was the symbolism of the temple. “This fatal conflagration has given proof from heaven of the divine wrath,” he wrote, “and presages the passage of sovereignty of the world to the peoples beyond the Alps.”
But Tacitus’s fears were not realised. The Gallic revolt was crushed and the temple rebuilt – as it was again and again right up until its closure by the Christian emperor Theodosius I in AD392. Indeed, even after Roman power had shifted to the east, and the Vandal invasion of 455AD had stripped all gold from the doors of the temple, the prefect of Italy, Cassiodorus, was moved to write: “To stand on the lofty Capitol is to see all other works of human intellect surpassed.”
This focal point above the city was begun nearly 1,000 years earlier by Lucius Tarquinius Superbus, the last Roman king – but only completed and dedicated, according to legend, in the year of his overthrowing and the creation of the Roman republic in 509BC.
It was a massive structure for its time – the largest temple in the Italo-Etruscan world – standing on a stone plinth measuring 53 by 63 metres, and with a broad red roof supported on 24 columns. Also known as the temple of the Capitoline Triad, inside were statues of the three gods most venerated by the Latin people: Juno, Jupiter and Minerva. On the apex of the roof was a quadriga, a blatant symbol of martial triumph depicting four horses being driven by Jupiter himself.
“Here was where the Roman kings established the centre of its most important cult: the temple of the Capitoline Triad – Jupiter Optimus Maximus, Juno Regina and Minerva,” says Prof Filippo Coarelli from the University of Perugia. “They were hoping to draw the political centre of the Latin League [a confederation of about 30 towns mainly south of the Tiber] to Rome and displace the league’s traditional cult centre on Mons Albanus – present-day Monte Cavo.”
According to Dr Robert Coates-Stephens, a fellow at the British School at Rome, the temple inspired a sense of destiny and invulnerability: “The Romans considered the Capitol important because it was home to the state religion and because, according to optimistic tradition, since the hill failed to be taken by the Gauls in 390BC, it had always remained inviolable.”
The temple building was copied across the Roman empire as the focal point of new settlements or of old enemy cities that were embracing the Roman way of life. It is telling that when Constantine built his new eastern capital on seven hills along the Bosphorus in AD330, he removed the colossal statue of Hercules that stood in front of the Temple of the Triad to confer legitimacy on his new Capitolium.
Indeed it might be said that, had the Romans not succeeded in focusing the Latin League on this temple, Rome may not have achieved its domination of the league. And without that, we would not have had the Roman empire, one of the most influential forces in the development of urbanisation there has ever been. 
The selection of the site on which Rome was founded in the eighth century BC is the stuff of myths. Whether it was Romulus and Remus, Virgil’s Aeneas or one of the early Etruscan kings who founded the city hardly matters, as the reasons for choosing this hilly bend on the river Tiber were obvious.
“Rome is at the lowest point on the course of the Tiber where the river is naturally crossable, and, like many important ancient or medieval cities (think of London), Rome is close to the sea, but not close enough to be in serious danger from pirates,” explains Georgy Kantor, associate professor in ancient history at St John’s College, Oxford. “Also, this was the point where Via Salaria, the Salt Road, leading to important salt pans inland, joined the main coastal road.”
As well as creating a spiritual focal point devoted to victory on the Capitoline Hill, the kings also drained the malarial marshes between the seven defensible hills of Rome so that people could meet and trade. Additionally, during the reign of the penultimate king, Servius Tullius (who reigned 578-534BC), they completed a wall round the hills to keep this huge city safe.
“By the late sixth century BC, the city of Rome had united around a central space, surrounded by a defensive wall and in the shadow of a temple which was one of the largest in Italy, and by its simple monumentality an indication of Rome’s importance,” says Prof Christopher Smith, director of the British School at Rome.
Because of the policy of making trading allies of its defeated enemies, money flooded into Rome in the early days of the republic. The city that sprung up below the temple of the Triad was a hodgepodge of narrow streets and tall wooden buildings with forums and markets created by individual donors.
So was there any guiding principle behind the development of Rome? Certainly, there was no Dinocrates of Alexandria to lay out the city for the first kings and their republican successors. But according to the Roman historian Livy in his Ab Urbe Condita, the early Etruscan kings did try for rational urban planning of the kind found at Rhodes, Pella, and Philippi – but all that was swept away when the Gauls sacked Rome (390BC) and by the unbridled speculative building that followed.
In 63BC, the great orator Cicero lamented the discrepancy between the regular planning of Roman cities in Campania, with the hilly and swampy conditions in Rome itself.
The lack of any effective urban plan is shown in the way that a victorious general, after processing in triumph up to the temple on the Capitoline Hill, had the right to build a new temple wherever he chose – and in the way that wealthy politicians such as Julius Caesar would build a marketplace to curry favour with the people. Pompey built a theatre to honour himself, and Sulla a new state archive.
This level of individualism was both Rome’s strength and weakness. When most of Rome burned down under emperor Nero in AD64, Tacitus chronicled how a new plan for stone buildings at a standard height with wide streets was drawn up – but reported that the people lamented the lost, ad hoc nature of republican Rome.
“Still, there were those who held that the old form had been the more salubrious, as the narrow streets and high-built houses were not so easily penetrated by the rays of the sun,” he wrote, “while now the broad expanses, with no protecting shadows, glowed under a more oppressive heat.”
In 1563, England’s Queen Elizabeth I coined the Latin phrase “Romam uno die non fuisse conditam” (Rome wasn’t built in a day). She might have also added: “And it was hardly planned at all.” 
Today, the Rome of the republic lies buried beneath medieval and renaissance Rome. It further disappeared under the 19th-century expansion that followed Italian unification in 1871. Those famous seven hills have been levelled and built over to the point that their obscured contours have merged with the rising level of the valleys below.
Indeed, you could be forgiven for not realising that a marshy valley once ran between the Capitoline and Palatine hills. The only reason we can see this valley at all today is because in the 1930s, Mussolini demolished more than eight acres of buildings and removed rubble lying 20 feet deep to expose the forum.
Ancient Rome – the powerful, republican city that so rapidly conquered the known world – has, of course, given us so many ideas about urban planning. Today we talk about capital cities and forums, as well as structures such as amphitheatres, basilicas, metalled roads, pavements and multi-storey apartment blocks because of the idea of the city that Rome bequeathed us.
Yet it is ironic that the grid system (what the Romans called centuriation), a city planning concept they exported all over Europe from the third century BC onwards, was never employed in Rome itself. The Romans got their idea of laying out their cities on a square grid from the military encampments they constructed on campaign, but it was never possible to implement it properly in Rome because of the power of individual initiative – and, of course, those hills.
After the empire moved its capital to Constantinople in AD326, everyone who could afford to leave Rome followed suit. The city was repeatedly looted and only began to recover some of its lost significance during the Renaissance, and with the return of the popes. It took until the 20th century for it to regain its ancient proportions.
Nevertheless, the temple of the Triad lasted until AD1536 when its remains were demolished as part of a palace and piazza development conceived by Michelangelo for Pope Paul III. What is left of it is now under Michelangelo’s Palazzo dei Conservatori, one of the Capitoline Museums. These days, you can see some of its mighty plinth exposed if you walk up to the first floor.
Rome remains a hodgepodge, one of the worst examples of the very notion of the well-planned city, an idea that it bequeathed to us via – among others – Chester in Britain, Verona in Italy, Trier in Germany and Sinop in Turkey. But the impact of its Temple of the Triad can still be seen now if you stand down in Mussolini’s reconstructed forum and gaze up at the Capitoline museums.
As for the idea of the Capitoline Hill, that reached eventually as far as America where today there are nine Capitol hills across the United States, including the seat of the US congress in Washington. 
Great Cities: Rome wasn't planned in a day … in fact wasn't planned at all
Editor's Note: The grid system which the Roman republic brought all over Europe was never used in the capital. The city has never had a clear plan – except for the giant temple that once towered over it. Temples were important places in Ancient Rome. People went there to worship the Roman gods. One of the oldest ones was the Temple of Jupiter Optimus Maximus. It stood on the Capitoline Hill, high above the center of Rome.
Over time, the temple was damaged and it was always rebuilt. It was finally closed by the emperor Theodosius I in 392 A.D.
The last Roman king began building the temple almost 1,000 years earlier. It was not finished until 509 B.C., about 2,500 years ago.
The temple was also called the Capitoline Triad. It was the largest temple of its time. It stood on a stone platform about 58-by-69 yards wide. Its red roof was held up by 24 pillars. Inside the temple were statues of Juno, Jupiter and Minerva. These were the three gods most worshiped by the Roman people. On the roof was a statue of Jupiter driving four horses. The statue was a symbol of success in war.
The temple building was copied across the empire in new cities. The Roman Empire included all the lands controlled by Romans. In many ways, today's cities are designed like Roman cities.
The early kings picked a great spot to build Rome. It is at the lowest point on the Tiber where the river can be easily crossed. Like London and other ancient cities, Rome is close to the sea. It is also far enough away from the water to be safe from pirates.
Early kings drained the marshes between the hills of Rome. This allowed people to meet and trade. The second-to-last king also built a wall around the city to keep it safe. This wall was built more than 2,500 years ago.
The city was a crazy mix of narrow streets and tall wooden buildings. People built markets and city squares all over Rome. 
Early kings tried to plan the city. They wanted to build Rome like the cities of Rhodes, Pella and Philippi. This was not possible after enemies raided Rome in 390 B.C. The invasion was about 2,400 years ago.
Rome was not well organized. People could build without asking permission. A general who won a battle could build a temple wherever he wanted. Leaders like Julius Caesar built markets to be popular with the people. The leader Pompey even built a theater for himself.
Most of Rome burned down in 64 A.D. A new plan for the city was made, with lower stone buildings and wide streets. Now people complained that the shorter buildings gave no shade from the sun.
In 1563, Queen Elizabeth I first said the words "Rome wasn’t built in a day." She might have added that it was hardly planned at all. 
Today, Ancient Rome is buried, but you can still see some of it. In the 1930s, the Italian leader Mussolini knocked down many buildings. He removed rubble from the ground 20 feet deep. This turned up the remains of the forum. This was an area of ancient temples and meeting places.
Today's cities have pieces taken from Roman cities. They have metal covered roads, pavements and multi-story apartment blocks. 
Romans used grids to build cities all over Europe. They got the idea from war camps they planned on a square grid. This was not possible in Rome, though. In Rome, people built where they wanted and there were too many hills.
In 326 A.D., the Roman Empire moved its capital to Constantinople. Most people left, and Rome was looted and forgotten. It became important again with the Renaissance, which began in the 1300s, and the return of the popes.
The Temple of the Triad lasted until 1536 A.D. It was torn down to build a palace for Pope Paul III. The palace was designed by the great artist Michelangelo. What is left is under one of the Capitoline museums. You can see some of the temple's platform from the first floor.
Rome is a bad example of a well-planned city. Romans built some good examples, though. Some are Chester in Britain, Verona in Italy and Trier in Germany.
The idea of the Capitoline Hill has reached the United States. There are nine Capitol hills across the country. The most famous is in Washington, D.C., where Congress makes U.S. laws. 
Great Cities: How silver turned Potosí into "the first city of capitalism"
Editor's Note: The discovery of a mountain of silver (and a new way to extract it) transformed this remote Incan hamlet into the economic center of Spain’s empire – larger than London, Milan or Seville. But then the silver ran out. “For the powerful emperor, for the wise king, this lofty mountain of silver could conquer the world.” So read the engraving on an ornate shield sent by Spain’s King Felipe II in 1561 as a gift to the city of Potosí, in what is now southern Bolivia.
Felipe was all too aware of the vast riches hidden beneath this remote Andean settlement. The conquistadors may never have found El Dorado, but they did find a mound of silver so large it would turn an isolated Incan hamlet into the fourth-largest city in the Christian world in just 70 years, fund the creation of the most advanced industrial complex of its era, and define economic fortunes from China to western Europe.
At Potosí's peak in the early 17th century, 160,000 native Peruvians, slaves from Africa and Spanish settlers lived in Potosí to work the mines around the city: a population larger than London, Milan or Seville at the time. In the rush to exploit the silver, the first Spanish colonisers occupied the locals’ homes, forgoing the typical colonial urban grid and constructing makeshift accommodation that evolved into a chaotic mismatch of extravagant villas and modest huts, punctuated by gambling houses, theatres, workshops and churches.
High in the dusty red mountains, the city was surrounded by 22 dams powering 140 mills that ground the silver ore before it was moulded into bars and sent to the first Spanish colonial mint in the Americas. The wealth attracted artists, academics, priests, prostitutes and traders, enticed by the Altiplano’s icy mysticism. “I am rich Potosí, treasure of the world, king of all mountains and envy of kings” read the city’s coat of arms, and the pieces of eight that flowed from it helped make Spain the global superpower of the period.
Potosí was “the first city of capitalism, for it supplied the primary ingredient of capitalism – money”, notes the author Jack Weatherford. “Potosí made the money that irrevocably changed the economic complexion of the world.”
The production of silver in the city exploded in the early 1570s after the discovery of a mercury amalgamation process to extract it from the mined ore, coupled with the imposition of a forced labour system known as the "mita". Native Peruvians from hundreds of miles away were forced to travel to Potosí to labour in the mines, then given the back-breaking task of carrying the daily quota of 25 bags of silver ore, each weighing around 45kg, to the surface.
Temperature and humidity differences between the depths of the mine and the surface meant pneumonia and respiratory infections were rife, with one mining boss noting: “If 20 healthy Indians enter on Monday, half may emerge crippled on Saturday.”
The mita imposed by Viceroy Toledo in Alto Peru caused demographic collapse, earning the hill in Potosí a Quechua name meaning “the mountain that eats men”. Writing about a group of 7,000 native Peruvians – taken from their homes far away to work in the mines – one Spanish observer wrote: “Only some 2,000 people return: of the other 5,000, some die and others stay at Potosí or the nearby valleys because they have no cattle for the return journey.”
Alongside the mita, Toledo’s other reforms were the first serious attempts to organise this boom city. Marshland was drained to open up more space for construction, dividing Potosí into a Spanish and a local district, and creating an intricate system of dykes and drains to fill five artificial lagoons that fed the mills – an extraordinary feat of hydro-engineering that guaranteed a steady supply of silver.
The ore mined by the native workers and African slaves made many Spaniards exceedingly wealthy. Drunk on “the mere fumes of silver”, an author of the time noted that the city’s residents “nurtured such elevated thoughts” – exemplified by mining boss Domingo Beltran, who reportedly proclaimed himself to be among the world’s most important figures: “The Pope in Rome, the King in Spain, and Domingo Beltran in Potosí ...” The city did not just prove fatal to the thousands who died in the mines. Despite Potosí’s flamboyance, it was plagued by murderous disputes between warring Spanish miners, natural disasters and the perils of living at 4,000m, where very little grows. The first Spanish boy to survive birth in Potosí was born in 1584, nearly 40 years after the city’s foundation; in 1624, much of the city’s native Peruvian sector was washed away as the San Salvador dam broke, killing around 200 and causing extensive destruction.
Licences to travel to the Andean Altiplano were tightly controlled, but many Spaniards sought work aboard merchant vessels – then abandoned their posts at the earliest opportunity. A trader of the period commented: “In every port where (merchant vessels) put down anchor, they jump ship and leave behind their duties and occupations, absenting themselves in anticipation of the liberties and uncertain riches of Potosí and other mining centres.” One resident of the city noted: “It seemed the land was swelling with rootless people who came each year from below and Spain to this villa, the stopping point for all the poor.”
The new arrivals began to clash with the Basque ruling class who had come to dominate the city, causing vicious gang wars. Thousands died in the fighting, fuelled by gossip and rumours that travelled on the icy Andean wind. 
By the early 1620s, the El Dorado myth was beginning to fall apart – exacerbated by the decaying infrastructure, falling yields and social tensions. “The metals are not reborn, nor do they grow anew,” as one writer had it. “For about 70 years now, a great quantity of ore has been mined … It is no great surprise that the good ores have been exhausted, and that all have diminished.”
From its boom-town peak at 160,000, the city’s population had fallen to 60,000 by the end of the 17th century. “Everything is finished,” wrote another resident. “All is affliction and anguish, weeping and sighing. Without doubt this has been one of the greatest downfalls ever.”
The pieces of eight from Potosí that had poured into China’s Ming dynasty eventually proved inflationary, making the city’s mining operations less profitable and lowering the price of silver around the world.
But the city’s silver had changed the world forever, facilitating the exchange of slaves, fabrics, spices and other goods across the globe. Much discussed in The Wealth of Nations by Adam Smith, it had helped fund the Spanish empire’s wars with the British, Dutch and French – and helped them overcome the Ottomans. American silver prompted King Philip IV of Spain to proclaim: “In silver lies the security and strength of my monarchy.” But this assumption of unlimited wealth from the Americas proved ruinous, fuelling an unsustainable level of spending by the Spanish royals.
Potosí survived as a mining centre on a smaller scale until its liberation by Simón Bolívar in 1825, its former riches now existing only in legend and literature. “To be worth a Potosí” appears in Don Quijote de la Mancha, a phrase that is still used in Spanish to this day.
The city is also an important symbol in modern Latin American revolutionary movements, made famous by Eduardo Galeano’s book Open Veins of Latin America – which was a gift from Venezuela’s President Hugo Chávez to President Barack Obama in 2009.
Galeano’s furious account of Potosí’s past remains the most popular version of the city’s history, writing of 8 million dead native Peruvians in the abandoned and flooded mines around the city. “You could build a silver bridge from Potosí to Madrid from what was mined here – and one back with the bones of those that died taking it out,” say many residents, quoting from Galeano’s book, although there is little evidence of a genocide of such proportions.
There are no reliable mortality statistics about the mining and associated processes, according to Dr. Ignacio Gonzalez Casasnovas, an expert on the social history of Potosí, “but we would estimate the toll to be much less than the 8 million deaths of which Galeano spoke.”
Casasnovas is far more certain of the city’s impact on the world: “At a time when European powers were expanding, both economically and technologically, it facilitated the globalisation of the world’s economy. Potosí’s silver reached Seville, but also Rouen and Calais, Amsterdam and Macao.” 
Modern Potosí is a shell of its former self. The mountain still towers over the city but it is crumbling inside, made unstable by the hundreds of miles of mine shafts constructed over the 500 years it has been exploited. In 2011, the upper cone of the mountain collapsed.
It is now predominantly mined for zinc and tin, although children still look through the piles of ore for the silver that once made their city so wealthy. Many of the Bolivians who still work in the mines suffer from the same illnesses as those who died at the hands of the Spanish – their lungs turned black by the dust. “For many miners, their fathers also died of silicosis, and they entered the mine at an early age. There’s a culture of death here,” one miner told Al Jazeera in 2014.
The poverty and dilapidation of modern Potosí mask the story of a once-imperial city whose grand villas are now restaurants, hair salons and dental offices. But high in the Andes above the treeline, the rich mountain remains – its contents now in Armada shipwrecks, the jewellery of Arab rulers, and the remaining treasures of the Ming dynasty. Few places in the world were left untouched by its riches. 
Great Cities: How silver turned Potosí into "the first city of capitalism"
Editor's Note: The discovery of a mountain of silver transformed this small Incan village into the economic center of Spain’s empire. It was larger than London, Milan or Seville. But then the silver ran out. Spain's King Felipe II sent a gift to the New World city of Potosí in 1561. It was a shield with words engraved on it. It said that Potosi could help a king take over the world. The city is in modern-day Bolivia, a country in South America.
Felipe knew there were many riches in this small Incan village. The Inca were the people that lived on the west coast of South America. This Incan village became one of the largest cities in the Christian world in just 70 years. It defined economic fortunes around the world. 
Potosí was most powerful in the early 1600s. It was larger than some of the most important European cities at the time. There were 160,000 Peruvians, slaves from Africa and Spanish people living there. Slaves were taken from their homes in Africa and forced to work. 
The city was high in the mountains. Mills ground the silver before it was molded into bars. The riches attracted all kinds of people. They helped to make Spain the global superpower of the period.
Potosí was “the first city of capitalism," writer Jack Weatherford says. Capitalism is focused on people earning their own money. Before, people were mostly rich because of what family they came from or if they owned land. Potosí supplied huge amounts of money to Europe. More people could buy and trade.
The silver business grew steadily in the early 1570s. People discovered a new way to remove it from the ground. Many Peruvians were forced to travel hundreds of miles to Potosí to work in the mines. They had to carry 25 bags of silver a day to the surface. Each bag weighed about 99 pounds.
Lung infections were widespread. Workers could not breathe. One person said up to half of the workers would become very sick. 
The Inca called the hill in Potosí "the mountain that eats men.” One Spaniard wrote about the dangers. Only about 3 out of 10 Peruvians would return from working in the mines, the observer noted.
Many people died outside the mines as well. There were disagreements between the groups of Spanish settlers, and there were natural disasters. It was also dangerous to live 13,000 feet above sea level. Very little grows there. It took nearly 40 years for the first Spanish baby to live past birth in Potosí. In 1624, much of the city’s Peruvian area was washed away. This killed around 200 people and caused extensive damage.
By the late 1600s, Potosi was running out of silver. 
The city had only 60,000 people by the end of the 1600s. “Everything is finished,” one person wrote. “Without doubt this has been one of the greatest downfalls ever.”
The city’s silver had changed the world forever. It made possible the exchange of slaves, cloths, spices and other goods around the world. It also helped to pay for Spain's wars. When Spanish rule ended in 1825, the silver was nearly gone and many mines had closed. Yet there were other metals to be found such as zinc.
The city became an important symbol for people trying to end colonialism in Latin America. Eduardo Galeano wrote about it in a book called "Open Veins of Latin America."
Galeano wrote that 8 million Peruvians died in the mines around the city. He wrote that you could build a bridge of silver from Potosí to Spain. However, he also wrote that you could build a bridge back again with the bones of the people who had died working in Potosi. Still, there is little proof of such a high number of deaths. 
Modern Potosí is much less grand than it used to be. The mountain is crumbling inside. It is unstable from the hundreds of miles of mines constructed over 500 years. In 2011, the upper cone of the mountain collapsed.
It is now mostly mined for zinc and tin. However, children still look for the silver that once made their city so rich. Many Bolivians who still work in the mines suffer from illnesses. “There’s a culture of death here,” one person said in 2014. 
The poverty of modern Potosí hides the story of a once-powerful city. But the rich mountain remains. Its silver is now found in Spanish shipwrecks, the jewelry of Arab rulers and Chinese treasures. Few places in the world were left untouched by its riches. Newsela Editor's Note: This article originally appeared in the Feb. 11, 1893, issue of Scientific American. Some 2,000 miles from San Francisco in a southwesterly direction lies the group of the Hawaiian Islands, which have been the scene of the late revolution. The country is now in the hands of a provisional government who have deposed the queen, and the future disposal of the government is the question of the hour. Some advocate annexation to the United States. Great Britain would be hardly true to her nature did she not contemplate taking possession of the islands, so as to have one more stepping stone for the sun, which always shines on some part of her dominions. Germany's interest in the islands has not yet developed to any great extent. 
About the year 1527 one or two Spanish ships were wrecked upon the islands, and the few survivors intermarried with the natives. Their descendants are identified to the present day by their light skin, liability to freckle, and by their facial contour, which is Caucasian. They are termed Kekea. The true discovery of the islands was effected in 1542 by Juan Gaetano, a Spanish navigator, and in 1567 Alvaro de Mendana de Neira, another Spaniard, determined the true position of one of the islands, Kauai. In the beginning of 1778 Captain James Cook visited the islands, whence his countrymen assign to him the honor of discovery. He left them and returned toward the end of the year. He excited the hostility of the natives and on Feb. 14, 1779, was killed by them on the shores of Kealakekua Bay, on the island of Hawaii. He was endeavoring to recover a stolen boat when killed. The name Sandwich Islands is derived from Lord Sandwich of England, and was given by Cook. Fortunately the beautiful native name, Hawaii, is now in the ascendancy and will, it is to be hoped, remain so. 
A very elaborate system of feudal government originally obtained there, five or six independent monarchs holding sway. Wars were frequent. In one of them, in 1790, King Kamehameha was attacked by another king, and defeated the aggressor. He pursued his conquest and 20 years later was sole monarch of the islands. The dynasty thus founded lasted until Dec. 11, 1872. A chief, Lunalilo, was elected to succeed this house. On Feb. 12, 1874, Kalakaua was elected king. He died in 1891, while visiting this country. His sister, the recent queen, Liliuokalani, the widow of John O. Dominis, the latter of American origin, succeeded him. She is the deposed ruler. Undoubtedly no native dynasty will again hold sway. In the history of the country, which history is one tale of revolutions. some facts bearing on annexation may be noted. In 1810 Kamehameha I  wrote to George III of England, desiring formally to acknowledge the British king as his sovereign and to place the islands under his protection. The offer, it is said, was accepted. Again, in 1843, a provisional cession of the islands to Great Britain is recorded, which was abrogated a few months later. By special treaty of 1889, the control of foreign relations was given to the United States.
The islands are 12 in number, with an area of over 6,400 square miles, over three times that of the state of Delaware, or about four-fifths of that of the state of Massachusetts. One island, Hawaii, contains 4,000  square miles. Most of the rock formation is volcanic. On Hawaii are two active volcanoes — Kilauea and Mauna Loa. Between the effects of eruptions and accompanying earthquakes, a number of lives have been lost. The highest point in the islands is Mauna Kea, on Hawaii, which rises to an elevation of 13,805 feet above the sea.
With such an immense range of altitudes, a great variety of climate can be secured. It varies from cool frosty weather to very warm weather throughout the year. Sea breezes and northeast trade winds do much to temper excessive heat. In the winter heavy rainstorms occur, lasting sometimes for weeks.
The natives are supposed to be of the Malay race. At the time of Cook's arrival, it is thought that the population was about 300,000. War and disease, the concomitants of civilization, have reduced the population, until the census of 1890 showed a total of 89,990, of which but 34,436 were of the aboriginal race. It is believed that they were originally cannibals. Except for this feature, they seem to have had many excellent features. Cook's death is believed to have been precipitated by his own cruelty and hypocrisy. The American whalers used to recruit their crews with Kanakas, as the natives were called, and tribute to their amiable qualities is easily found. 
On April 4, 1820, seven American missionaries reached the island. Shortly before this time the natives had destroyed all their idols, and the missionaries found a nation without any religion. In 1825 the Ten Commandments were adopted as law by the government. The first missionaries reduced the language to a written form, with an alphabet of 12 letters: a, e, i, o, u, h, k, l, m, n, p, w. Whether the limited alphabet has anything to do with it may be a matter of surmise, but the population is said to be on the average less illiterate than that of New York City or Pennsylvania. It is claimed that they have a well settled American society, comparable to anything in the States. The general feeling on the island is said to be opposed to Great Britain. 
Last autumn, the San Francisco Examiner had a poll taken of the Hawaiian parliament on the subject of annexation. The sentiment then was strongly in favor of independence. The queen's leaning toward absolutism is largely responsible for the revolution and presumable change of views of the leading men on annexation. Probably the sugar question is one of the factors at the bottom of it. At one time the sugar plantations paid a return of some 50 percent on the investment. This state of things has been done away with by free West India sugar, so that a far smaller profit is made. The hopes of a bounty per ton of sugar is one element making the sugar planters anxious for annexation. 
Practically, Hawaii draws upon San Francisco for her supplies. In 1891 the tonnage of American ships entering the harbor of Honolulu was over three times that of English ships, or 173,891 tons. American imports aggregated $5.9 million, as against $1.2 million of British imports. The sugar production is now 300 million pounds per annum. The leper colony on the island of Molokai, the scene of the heroic exertions of Father Damien, casts a shadow over a picture where there is so much that is fair. But Canada and Louisiana both have had lepers for many years; so in leprosy we would have no new acquaintance. Thousands of miles to the south and east of Hawaii, Robert Louis Stevenson has established himself. But his lovely Samoa hardly yields to the charms of the more northerly group of Hawaii. The varied climate enables any form of vegetation to be raised that can be grown in a temperate or tropical climate. The establishment of a botanical garden, absolutely unique in the world's history, would be an interesting possibility. The islands are but six days from San Francisco, and by fast steamers could be brought much closer. Under proper conditions, they might attract and should attract many tourists. The fact that America is by far the nearest mainland seems to bring the islands within the operation of the Monroe Doctrine, and goes to forbid the establishment there of a European power. The purchase of Alaska, under the advice of William H. Seward, when he was United States secretary of state, has proved an excellent operation for this government. The annexation of Hawaii, it may be believed, would prove in its degree equally good for us, and, it is to be hoped, would be good for the inhabitants also. As a touching point for ships, its value cannot be overestimated. In war the importance it would acquire, as a strategic point, and as a depot for coal and supplies for warships, is obvious. We already possess, by treaty, rights in a species of harbor or coral lagoon, Pearl Harbor by name, which requires dredging before it will be available for ships of war. The bay of Honolulu, on the island of Oahu, is the principal harbor. It has 22 feet of water. Good harbors among the islands are very few. 
The islands now have a debt of $3 million. The necessary assumption of this debt is one of the principal reasons cited against annexation. It would virtually represent a price paid for the islands.  Newsela Editor's Note: This article originally appeared in the Feb. 11, 1893, issue of Scientific American. About 2,000 miles from San Francisco to the southwest are the Hawaiian Islands. They have had many wars over the years. Now their queen has lost her power. No one really knows how the new government will work. Some call for annexation, which means giving control to the United States. England would also like to get control of the islands.
Around 1527, one or two Spanish ships were wrecked at the islands. A few sailors survived. Some got married to Hawaiian women. Today, the families that came from these marriages have lighter skin and more freckles. They are called Kekea. Captain James Cook from England visited the islands three times in 1778. He named them the Sandwich Islands for Lord Sandwich. On Feb. 14, 1779, a fight over a small boat led to the death of a Hawaiian. Mobs attacked the sailors. Many, including Cook, were killed. 
Over many years, five or six kings have fought wars for control of the islands. By 1810, Kamehameha I was the only king of all the islands. In the same year King Kamehameha I wrote to King George III of England. He asked for protection from other countries. This agreement went well. The Hawaiian king died in 1819. Others from his family became kings after that. In early 1843, however, a land claim problem brought Captain George Paulet to Hawaii. He decided the islands belonged to England. The Hawaiian flag was taken down. The flag of England was put up. Six months later, British Admiral Richard Thomas sailed to Hawaii. He put King Kamehameha III back into power. Four other kings followed until 1891. Now Queen Liliuokalani may be the last queen or king to control the islands.
Hawaii is made up of 12 islands. They have an area of over 6,400 square miles. Hawaii is three times larger than the state of Delaware. There are two active volcanoes in Hawaii. They are are Kilauea and Mauna Loa. The highest point in the islands is Mauna Kea. It rises 13,805 feet above the sea.
The climate varies throughout the year, from cool and frosty to very warm. Sea breezes help control the heat. In the winter, heavy rainstorms can last for weeks. Around 1790, the population was about 300,000. War and disease reduced the number. By 1890 the population was 89,990. Only 34,436 were natives of Hawaii.
On April 4, 1820, seven American missionaries arrived. The missionaries saw Hawaii had no religion. They were very successful and by 1825 the Ten Commandments were part of Hawaiian law. The missionaries made a written Hawaiian language. The alphabet has 12 letters: a, e, i, o, u, h, k, l, m, n, p, w. On the average, more people in Hawaii can read than in New York City.
Last autumn many Hawaiian leaders wanted Hawaii to be free and on its own. But problems with the queen and the business of selling sugar started changing minds. At one time the sugar plantations or farms made Hawaiians very rich. But sugar from the West Indies made it harder to make a lot of money. The sugar planters have a lot of power.  They want to give some power to America. They now want annexation. Much of Hawaii's supplies come from San Francisco. They trade more with the U.S. than with any other country.
Islands Could Be Useful For U.S.
Hawaii's climate is perfect for growing crops all year round. A botanical garden, unlike any other in the world, could be built here. The islands are only a six-day trip by ship from San Francisco. In the future, many tourists could come to Hawaii. The annexation or control of Hawaii could be good for us and the Hawaiians. It has harbors for ships crossing the Pacific. We already use Pearl Harbor.
The islands owe $3 million to other countries. If the United States annexes Hawaii, we will have to pay this debt, or money to the other countries. Newsela Editor's Note: This article originally appeared in the March 1912 issue of Scientific American. It is much too early to give any critical account of Capt. Roald Amundsen's achievement. Many weeks must elapse before we are in complete possession of all his data. Yet even the laconic account, which he has cabled to the press, throws a flood of light on the mystery of Antarctic geography.
Amundsen seems to have collected enough evidence to substantiate the theory that the great chain of mountains which extends almost uninterruptedly from Alaska to Patagonia finds its continuation in a ridge connecting Victoria Land and King Edward VII Land, and which, in honor of his queen, he has named "Queen Maude's Range." The ice barrier, which had proved for a century and a half a formidable obstacle to Antarctic exploration, is found to terminate in a bay, lying between the southeast mountain range running from South Victoria Land and a range which is probably a continuation of King Edward VII Land and which extends in a southwesterly direction. Contrary to his original plan, Amundsen despatched one of his officers, Lieut. Prestud, to survey the Bay of Whales and the great ice barrier and to explore King Edward VII Land, of which practically nothing is known.
No doubt the spur of competition played its part in unfolding the secrets of the last unexplored frigid region of the Earth. No less than four other expeditions were in the Antarctic regions at the time when Amundsen was forcing his way south. Besides Amundsen's, there was the Japanese expedition under Lieut. Shirase, which had to retreat to Australia last spring in order to replenish its supply of dogs, and which Amundsen says landed on January 16th at the Bay of Whales, two weeks before he sailed for home; Dr. Mawson's Australian expedition, for which $215,000 had been raised up to November 1st last, and which was to land three parties between Cape Adare and Gaussberg; the German expedition under Lieut. Filchner in the "Deutschland," elaborately equipped with wireless, magnetic, and meteorological apparatus, full of the hope of establishing a base southwest of Coats Land in as high a latitude as possible; and lastly, Capt. Scott's English expedition in the "Terra Nova," which left New Zealand in November, 1910, badly damaged by stormy weather; so badly, indeed, that the necessary repairs and the cost of making good the stores that had been lost seriously depleted the resources of the party.
Amundsen seems to have been helped by exceptionally favorable weather conditions. To be sure, there were storms, but not those frightful hurricanes which thwarted Shackleton. It was cold, so cold that the dogs suffered visibly; yet the average temperature was no lower than that in many an inhabited part of Canada. Amundsen himself states that part of his journey was much like a pleasure trip -- "excellent ground, fine sledging, and an even temperature." The glaciers and crevasses make detours necessary, yet, despite them, progress was remarkably rapid. The party climbed up 2,000 to 5,000 feet in a day.
Throughout much of his journey Amundsen covered entirely new ground. Therefore he will bring back absolutely new information of Antarctic geography. He made up his mind that he would reach the plateau on which the Pole is situated by another route than that of Beardmore Glacier. Luck, instinct, experience, call it what you will, the new route proved easier than that which either Shackleton or Scott took on their expeditions. To that comparatively easy route, coupled with exceptionally favorable weather, may be attributed Amundsen's success. Newsela Editor's Note: This article originally appeared in the March 1912 issue of Scientific American. Captain Roald Amundsen is an explorer from Norway. He is the first man to reach the South Pole on Antarctica, one of seven continents on Earth.
It is too soon to judge Amundsen's trip. We will know more in several weeks. So far, he has only sent back some news. He is learning about the land. 
Amundsen has discovered one amazing thing. There is a great chain of mountains that runs from North America to South America. He has discovered that the mountains continue farther south. The chain of mountains can be found even in Antarctica. 
He has named the mountains Queen Maude's Range. They are named after Amundsen's queen, the queen of Norway.  
A giant piece of floating ice leads to Antarctica. It had made exploring the Antarctic difficult. Ships could not sail through it. The floating ice lies between two mountain ranges. It ends in a bay. Amundsen sent one of his officers to inspect the Bay of Whales and the great ice shelf. He found that it was solid enough to walk across. There he set up his base camp on the frozen ice. They wanted to find where the ice became ice-covered land. He explored King Edward VII Land. Before, almost nothing was known about it.
Amundsen is not the only man wanting to explore Antarctica. Four other explorers were in or near Antarctica at the same time. They all had teams of men and dogs. All were racing to be the first to reach the South Pole. 
Amundsen was lucky because he had good weather. Some storms were nearby but they were not terrible. Often it is freezing there. Amundsen said the air was no colder than it is in parts of Canada. It was still cold enough to bother the dogs who pulled their sleds. Some of the land was too hard to cross, so Amundsen's team had to change its route. The team went around a glacier with deep cracks in it. Instead, they climbed through mountains. They still moved remarkably fast. They were able to climb thousands of feet in a single day. 
During much of his journey Amundsen went where no man had gone before. 
Amundsen won the race because he had an easy route and good weather. He was lucky and showed good sense.  Newsela Editor's Note: Commander Robert Peary reached the North Pole in April 1908. This account of his historic and harrowing trek across the frozen north originally appeared in the September 1909 issue of Scientific American. The amazing coincidence of the report by two independent explorers of their location of the North Pole within a year of each other, after the hardship, privation, and expense of life and funds endured in vain in the effort to find it for over three hundred years, makes any comparison of the probability of the reports or the value of the results obtained difficult if not unprofitable with the limited particulars hitherto available.
We prefer, therefore, to await the verdict of the investigation, which will undoubtedly be made by the highest scientific authorities upon presentation of the complete evidence on either side; and expressing no opinion, briefly to summarize Mr. Peary's report of his achievement as we did that of Mr. Cook.
The origin and early history of polar exploration was sufficiently outlined in last week's Scientific American, which also compared the reported achievement of Cook with the earlier work of Peary. After the latter's expedition of 1906, when he reached 87 deg. 6 min. N. lat., then the "farthest north," he determined to make one more effort to reach the Pole, and the Roosevelt was accordingly equipped by the Peary Arctic Club with all the material and scientific instruments which have been proved to be most essential in polar exploration by Commander Peary's twenty-three years of experience.
The Roosevelt, with Peary and his party on board, left New York on July 6th, 1908, called at Sydney, near Cape Breton, Nova Scotia, leaving there July 17th, and proceeded east round Newfoundland and then straight north through Davis Strait and Baffin's Bay to Cape York, Greenland, at the southern end of Smith Sound. Leaving there August 1st, the ship proceeded via Etah, farther up the sound, navigating laboriously through floating ice, often densely packed, to Cape Sheridan in Grant Land, the northern end of Ellesmere Land, on the other side of the sound, arriving there September 1st, and there the expedition passed the winter. The farther progress of the explorers has been reported by Commander Peary exclusively to The New York Times, by whose courtesy we are permitted to give the following abstract.
Peary's full report describes greater difficulty in making the point selected for winter quarters than was at first suggested. An actual landing at Cape Sheridan was not made until several days after arrival there, strong northeasterly winds and the drift of the ice repeatedly forcing the ship back and twice driving her aground, and it was only on September 5th, after zigzagging through leads in the ice for several days, that the Roosevelt succeeded in rounding Cape Sheridan into open water, and lying up in an opening in the floe at the mouth of the Sheridan River.
Supplies and equipment were immediately transferred across the ice to a clapboard house and storeroom hastily built on shore, and on September 15th the work of trans­porting supplies was begun, several sledge expeditions depositing provisions at various points along the coast from Cape Sheridan to Cape Columbia, so that the sledge party on its spring dash for the Pole might travel as light as possible and pick them up en route. This work was carried on continuously until November 5th, and was mingled and followed by hunting expeditions, tidal and other observations by various parties, lasting until February.
The sledge expedition for the Pole left the Roosevelt in three divisions on February 15th, 21st, and 22nd under Capt. Bartlett, Prof. Marvin, and Com. Peary respectively, the total of all divisions being 7 whites and 59 Esquimaux, with 23 sledges drawn by 140 dogs.
All of the divisions appear to have assembled at Cape Columbia, such of the supplies as were required being brought up from the other depots on the route, the dogs rested, and the equipment thoroughly overhauled by February 27th. In the meantime, apparently, Bartlett's pioneer division had been hewing a way north through jagged ice to the "big lead," a stream of open water, which he crossed on the first of March and got away north over the ice, the remainder of the party following soon after, but being stopped on their second day's march by open water formed by a breach of the ice by strong wind after Bartlett's division had passed the spot. Two sledges were smashed beyond repair in the first march, the teams going back to Cape Columbia for reserve sledges. At the end of the fourth day the rest of the expedition caught up Bartlett, who had been stopped by open water, which delayed the entire party till March 11th.
On the 5th of March the sun appeared for a few minutes at noon for the first time after the long winter night. On March 11th the lead was sufficiently frozen over to be crossed, and another start was made. Borup and Marvin, who had gone back for alcohol and oil from Bartlett's third camp, had not yet come up with the expedition in spite of the delay, causing some anxiety, but a note was left for them, and three days later they caught up the main party at the end of its sixth march. The latter in the meantime had been traversing alternately floating solid ice and newly frozen leads, and had just crossed the 84th parallel. From that camp Dr. Goodsell turned back by pre-arrangement, and McMillan accompanied him reluctantly, owing to a badly frozen foot, which he had been concealing for three days, much to the regret of Peary, who had counted on his enthusiasm and physical powers.
The best dogs and sledges were selected for the northward journey, the party now consisting of 16 men, 12 sledges, and 100 dogs. At the end of the tenth march, at latitude 85 deg. 23 min., Borup turned back in charge of the second supporting party. The traveling rather improved, and Commander Peary and Marvin waited twenty hours after the start of the advance party, in order to overtake them as they broke camp after the next halt, thus using the same camp and keeping in touch with the advance party once in every twenty-four hours. After two more marches the sun began to get high enough for observations to be made, 85 deg. 48 min. being recorded, and, the going continuing to improve, 50 minutes was covered in the next three marches, including 20 miles on the third day, bringing the party to 86 deg-. 38 min.
At this point Marvin turned back with the third supporting party. The next day's march was good, but after that came the deepest snow encountered, accompanied by haze which made a short and exhausting journey. At the end of the succeeding day the ice parted exactly where the party was encamped, nearly causing the loss of dogs and sledges, but after an exciting period dashing from one moving floe to another, better going was reached. Then came Capt. Bartlett's last day, another long march with fair going, camp being made at 87 deg. 48 min., as shown by observation of the sun next day. The sturdy navigator of the Roosevelt, who had borne the brunt of the pioneering work, walked several miles north in the morning to be sure that he crossed the 88th parallel, and then turned reluctantly back with the two Esquimaux of the last supporting party, the provisions carried being insufficient to last more than 6 men and 40 dogs for the week or more estimated to be required to reach the Pole as well as for the return journey.
Peary then determined to try and reach the Pole in five forced marches, allowing less than a day for each, extending the last one; if necessary, to complete the distance lacking. His cabled narrative speaks of "five marches of fifteen miles each," but as he was then south of the 88th parallel, this is an obvious mistake for 25 miles, to which distance he refers as having accomplished his intention on his next, the twenty-first, march. After a few hours' sleep good going was found, and twenty miles were covered on the twenty-second march before an open lead delayed the journey. Another brief halt and even better weather and smoother ice enabled another twenty miles to be made on the next march, including a dash across 100 yards of ice newly formed over a lead, which buckled under the sledges and broke as the last one left it. Again a short sleep, and twenty-five miles were made. on the twenty-fourth march. Although the temperature was not so low as had been experienced, even the Esquimaux complained of the bitter cold. Much-needed sleep was taken for a little longer, and then the party dashed forward, dreading that each rise in the ice marked an open lead, but always finding continued going. The haze was thicker, but an observation was possible at noon showing 89 deg. 25 In. A rise in temperature to 15 deg. below zero encouraged the dogs, and forty miles was covered III twelve hours.
An observation at noon on April 6th, at the end of the twenty-sixth march, showed latitude 89 deg. 57 m. to have been reached, only three minutes or a little over three miles from the Pole, so the remaining distance was apparently covered before a rest was taken. The first thirty hours at the Pole was spent in making observations and taking photographs. Ten hours after arrival the weather cleared, and the afternoon of April 7th was cloudless. A crack in the ice five miles from the Pole was found, and a sounding was made, 1,500 fathoms of wire finding no bottom, and the wire being broken and lost in withdrawing it.
Speed was just as urgent on the return as on the upward journey, every day gained lessening the chance of a gale opening leads and destroying the track. Every march back lessened the chance of provisions running short before the base was reached, so the equipment could be lightened to facilitate speed. Peary therefore determined, in spite of the records for Arctic travel made on the advance, to try to double the daily journey on the return, covering two of the northward marches on each march south, and making use of the same "igloos"-the ice huts made in camping-and so saving time at each halt. This he very nearly accomplished, regularly covering five outward marches in each three of the return journey.
He was singularly fortunate in escaping open leads in the ice, which had delayed the return of the supporting parties, down to lat. 85 deg. 23 m., the camp at the end of the tenth outward march, where a lead five miles wide was encountered. By good luck Bartlett's trail was found again at the other side, and by continued rapid traveling Cape Columbia was reached on the 23rd of April after fifteen marches. The Roosevelt was reached in two more marches, and found unharmed. Nearly two months were spent in additional geodetic observations and in bringing back remaining supplies from the outlying caches until on July 18th the ice was sufficiently open for the ship to be removed from her berth. She fought her way south to Cape Sabine by August 8th, picked up Whitney and the stores at Etah, coaled from the Jeanie, and cleared from Cape York August 26th, and reached Indian Harbor September 5th to send the now historic telegram: "Stars and Stripes nailed to North Pole." Newsela Editor's Note: Commander Robert Peary reached the North Pole in April 1908. This account of his historic and harrowing trek across the frozen north originally appeared in the September 1909 issue of Scientific American. For 300 years people have been trying to reach the North Pole. No one ever made it. Amazingly two different explorers now say they have reached the Pole in the same year.
Who Got There First?
Mr. Frederick A. Cook was the first to say he had reached the Pole. Now Commander Robert E. Peary of the U.S. Navy also says he has been there.
The North Pole is located at the top of the world. It is so cold there that all the water near it is frozen. There is too much ice for ships to reach the Pole. For many years it was impossible to get there. 
Peary did not think it was impossible to reach the North Pole. He spent 23 years trying to get to there. In 1908 he tried again. 
Peary gathered his team together. His ship sailed north from New York on July 6, 1908. The ship reached Canada's Ellesmere Island Sept. 1. Ellesmere Island was the furthest north Peary could go. 
Peary's team spent all winter waiting for the water between Ellesmere Island and the North Pole to turn into ice. By Feb. 27 the ice was hard enough to walk on. Peary's team began its journey. When they left the island they were 420 miles from the Pole.
Danger! Broken Ice
Peary's team marched across the ice. They only one had major scare. One day the ice broke under their camp. The men had to run from one piece of ice to another. They did not want to fall into the freezing water below the ice. They were not safe until they reached solid ice again.
On April 6, 1909, Peary's team finally reached the North Pole. 
Reaching The Top Of The World!
Once at the Pole, Peary's team had much to do. They spent more than 30 hours there. They took many notes and many photos. Peary left an American flag at the North Pole. He wanted the Stars and Stripes to stay at the top of the world. 
It took Peary a long time to return to New York. His ship stopped in Canada on Sept. 5 so Peary could send a message to New York. 
Peary's message was very short. It said where they had been and what they had done. The message was, "Stars and Stripes nailed to North Pole."  Newsela Editor's Note: This article originally appeared in the December 1906 issue of Scientific American. The recent visit of the President to the Isthmus of Panama was both timely and stimulating. It occurred at a distinctly critical period in the affairs of the canal. Sweeping charges were being made, both in the methods of construction and the system of administration of the canal, the construction being about to pass into the hands of the contractors, and the administration being simplified, placed under one-man control and located definitely and permanently at the Isthmus.
To this new departure the visit of President Roosevelt lends special significance. Although Mr. Roosevelt spent but a few days on the Isthmus, the time was busily employed and, apart from the encouragement which was afforded to the employees by the presence of the Chief Executive in person, the President himself has undoubtedly acquired a firmer grasp upon the situation, and will find his personal observations of great value in arriving at future decisions on the many difficult points which must arise during the actual work of construction.
The present occasion marks the close of the second and the opening of the third chapter in the history of the Panama enterprise. The first chapter included the long and exhaustive examination of the physical conditions of the Isthmus, with a view to determining the best location for a canal, and resolved itself mainly into the determination of the relative merits of Nicaragua and Panama. That work in itself was of great magnitude, and involved the creation of various commissions — and boards, and the putting through of costly surveys by large engineering forces. The subsequent decision in favor of Panama was followed by negotiations for the purchase of the rights and properties of the French company, and the securing of the necessary concessions from the Colombian government.
Out of the negotiations and seemingly inevitable intrigues that followed, sprang the young republic of Panama, friendly to the United States and anxious to do everything that lay in its power to further, in the way of concessions and agreements, the prosecution of the work.
The second chapter contains the story of the vast work of preparation which was necessary before the actual work of excavation could be put into full swing. The strip of the canal zone, ten miles in width, stretching from ocean to ocean, was found to be a veritable breeding place of disease; unsanitary, ill provided with pure drinking water, and, because of the prevalence of yellow fever and malaria, fatal to the health of the many thousands of laborers who would have to be crowded upon the work, if it were to be finished on time. During this second period an efficient sanitary corps was formed, and under its systematic methods the canal zone has been cleaned up, yellow fever practically eradicated, and malaria so far brought under control that the zone is now pronounced by engineers of high standing, who have been engaged for a year or more upon the work, to be no more threatening to health than many of our Southern States. Concurrently with the sanitation of the Isthmus, the great problem of housing and feeding the canal employees has been successfully solved and comfortable quarters and good board are now obtainable at reasonable rates.
Another question, equally vital to the success of the enterprise, is that of administration. There is no denying that, here, many mistakes have been made, and that the earlier operations were hampered by a system that was altogether too cumbersome and slow to suit the very special conditions that are to be found at the Isthmus. The resignation of the then-chief engineer, Mr. Wallace, served to emphasize the fact that, if the best results were to be secured, and the whole of the complicated organization were to work together harmoniously, the control, of it must be placed in the hands of one man, who should be permanently, located at the Isthmus and have absolute authority, in all matters pertaining to the construction of the canal.
One of the most happy results of the President's visit has been the signing of an executive order concentrating the authority in the canal construction in one man, and giving him supreme jurisdiction over the heads of the seven departments of the administration. Both the chairman and the department heads will have their residence at the Isthmus, and will be in a position to push the work through without, as before, having to make continual references to higher authority located at Washington, many thousand miles away. The Isthmian Canal Commission, which we understand is also to be reorganized, will make quarterly trips to the Isthmus for the purpose of receiving reports and advising with the chairman and the heads of department.
The third and longest chapter in the history of the canal opens with the wise decision of the government to undertake the huge task of active construction by contract, and not by day labor supervised by the government engineers. The SCIENTIFIC AMERICAN has always urged that this was the only practical way in which this work could be done. Some time may be consumed before the government and the contractors can decide upon that final form of contract and those questions of price and time which are mutually agreeable. But once this has been determined, we believe that the canal will be put through steadily to a final completion. Enough has been learned, however; from the preliminary work, to make it certain that Congress must be prepared for the exercise of great liberality and patience; for the work will undoubtedly cost much more, and take longer by several years to complete, than was originally estimated. Newsela Editor's Note: This article originally appeared in the December 1906 issue of Scientific American. President Theodore Roosevelt recently visited Panama. He came at an important time. The third stage of the Panama Canal is about to begin. The Panama Canal is a man-made canal. It will connect the Atlantic Ocean to the Pacific Ocean. When finished, it will be 48 miles long. The canal will be a short-cut for ships sailing from the American East Coast to the West Coast. Right now, ships have to travel around the southern tip of South America.
Big charges are underway.
President Roosevelt only visited the canal for a few days. He spent his time wisely. He visited the construction area and spoke with workers. The President gathered information. He got a good understanding about what is going on. Many difficult matters will come up while the canal is being built. His visit will help him make good decisions.
The canal is being built in three stages. The President's visit came at the end of the second stage. During the first stage, the U.S. had to decide where to dig the canal. The choice was between Nicaragua or Panama. Both countries are in Central America. Panama was the final choice. At the time, Colombia controlled the land.
After the project began, Panama became a country. It was friendly to the U.S. Its officials did their best to help the U.S. build the canal.
During the second stage, the U.S. had to solve many problems. There was not enough drinking water. Mosquitoes carried deadly diseases. These diseases killed many workers. There were other problems as well. There was not enough food or places for canal workers to stay. Since then, these problems have been solved. Workers can live and eat for not much money. There is enough drinking water. Also, workers are no longer dying from diseases.
While the President was in Panama, he put one man in charge of the project. Before, there were too many canal officials. Also, they had to check with officials in Washington, D.C. They could not make decisions quickly.
The third and longest stage is just starting. Workmen will begin digging the canal.
U.S. lawmakers must get ready to spend a lot of money on the project. They will also have to be patient. The work will be very expensive. It will also take longer to finish than anyone thought.

Mrs. Eleanora Alvarez Rimsky, thirty-two, geologist and selenologist, hydroponicist.
The crew had a well-rounded group of skills, although in some cases their secondary skills had been acquired by intensive coaching during the last weeks before blast-off. More important, they were mutually compatible in their temperaments.
Too compatible, perhaps.
The Envoy departed on schedule with no mishaps. During the early part of the voyage her daily reports were picked up with ease by private listeners. As she drew away and signals became fainter, they were picked up and rebroadcast by Earth's radio satellites. The crew seemed to be both healthy and happy. An epidemic of ringworm was the worst that Dr. Smith had to cope with-the crew adapted to free fall quickly and no antinausea drugs were used after the first week. If Captain Brant had any disciplinary problems, he did not choose to report them to Earth.
The Envoy achieved a parking orbit just inside the orbit of Phobos and spent two weeks in photographic survey. Then Captain Brant radioed:
We will attempt a landing at 1200 tomorrow GST just south of Lacus Soli. No further message was ever received.
IT WAS A QUARTER of an Earth century before Mars was again visited by humans. Six years after the Envoy was silent, the drone probe Zombie, sponsored jointly by the Geographic Society and La Societe Astronautique Internationale, bridged the void and took up an orbit for the waiting period, then returned. The photographs taken by the robot vehicle showed a land unattractive by human standards; her recording instruments confirmed the thinness and unsuitability of the Arean atmosphere to human life.
But the Zombie's pictures showed clearly that the canals were engineering works of some sort and there were other details which could only be interpreted as ruins of cities. A manned expedition on a major scale and without delay surely would have been mounted had not World War III intervened.
But the war and the delay resulted eventually in a much stronger, safer expedition than that of the lost En my. The Federation Ship Champion, manned by an all-male crew of eighteen experienced spacemen and carrying more than that number of male pioneers, made the crossing
under Lyle Drive in only nineteen days. The Champion landed just south of Lacus Soli, as Captain van Tromp intended to search for the Envoy. The second expedition reported to Earth by radio daily, but three despatches were of more than scientific interest. The first was:
Rocket Ship Envoy located. No survivors.
The second worldshaker was: Mars is inhabited.
The third was: Correction to despatch 23-105: One survivor of Envoy located.
CAPTAIN WILLEM VAN TROMP was a man of humanity and good sense. He radioed ahead: My passenger must not, repeat, must not be subjected to the strain of a public reception. Provide low-gee shuttle, stretcher and ambulance service, and anned guard.
He sent his ship's surgeon Dr. Nelson along to make sure that Valentine Michael Smith was installed in a suite in Bethesda Medical Center, transferred gently into a hydraulic bed, and protected from outside contact by marine guards. Van Tromp himself went to an extraordinary session of the Federation High Council.
At the moment when Valentine Michael Smith was being lifted into bed, the High Minister for Science was saying testily, Granted, Captain, that your authority as military commander of what was nevertheless primarily a scientific expedition gives you the right to order unusual medical service to protect a person temporarily in your charge, I do not see why you now presume to interfere with the proper functions of my department. Why, Smith is a veritable treasure trove of scientific information!
Yes. I suppose he is, sir.
Then why- The science minister broke off and turned to the High Minister for Peace and Military Security. David? This matter is obviously now in my jurisdiction. Will you issue the necessary instructions to your people? After all, one can't keep persons of the caliber of Professor Kennedy and Doctor Okajima, to mention just two, cooling their heels indefinitely. They won't stand for it.
The peace minister did not answer but glanced inquiringly at Captain van Tromp. The captain shook his head. No, sir.
Why not? demanded the science minister. You have admitted that he isn't sick.
Give the captain a chance to explain, Pierre, the peace minister advised. Well, Captain?
Smith isn't sick, sir, Captain van Tromp said to the peace minister, but he isn't well, either. He has never before been in a one-gravity field. He now weighs more than two and one half times what he is used to and his muscles aren't up to it. He's not used to Earth-normal air pressure. He's not used to anything and the strain is likely to be too much for him. Hell's bells, gentlemen,
I'm dog tired myself just from being at one-gee again-and I was born on this planet.
The science minister looked contemptuous. If acceleration fatigue is all that is worrying you, let me assure you, my dear Captain, that we had anticipated that. His respiration and heart action will be watched carefully. We are not entirely without imagination and forethought. After all, I've been out myself. I know how it feels. This man Smith must-
Captain van Tromp decided that it was time to throw a tantrum. He could excuse it by his own fatigue-very real fatigue, he felt as if he had just landed on Jupiter-and he was smugly aware
that even a high councilor could not afford to take too stiff a line with the commander of the first successful Martian expedition.
So he interrupted with a snort of disgust, link! 'This man Smith-' This 'man!' Can't you see that that is just what he is not?
Eh?
Smith ... is, not, a, man.
Huh? Explain yourself, Captain.
Smith is not a man. He is an intelligent creature with the genes and ancestry of a man, but he is not a man. He's more a Martian than a man. Until we came along he had never laid eyes on a human being. He thinks like a Martian, he feels like a Martian. He's been brought up by a race which has nothing in common with us. Why, they don't even have sex. Smith has never laid eyes on a woman-still hasn't if my orders have been carried out. He's a man by ancestry, a Martian by environment. Now, if you want to drive him crazy and waste that 'treasure trove of scientific information,' call in your fat-headed professors and let them badger him. Don't give him a chance to get well and strong and used to this madhouse planet. Just go ahead and squeeze him like an orange. It's no skin off me; I've done my job!
The ensuing silence was broken smoothly by Secretary General Douglas himself. And a good job, too, Captain. Your advice will be weighed, and be assured that we will not do anything hastily. If this man, or manMartian, Smith, needs a few days to get adjusted, I'm sure that science can wait-so take it easy, Pete. Let's table this part of the discussion, gentlemen, and get on to other matters. Captain van Tromp is tired.
One thing won't wait, said the Minister for Public Information.
Eh, Jock?
If we don't show the Man from Mars in the stereo tanks pretty shortly, you'll have riots on your hands, Mr. Secretary.
Hmm- You exaggerate, Jock. Mars stuff in the news, of course. Me decorating the captain and his brave crew-tomorrow, that had better be. Captain van Tromp telling of his experiences-after a night's rest of course, Captain.
The minister shook his head.
No good, Jock?
The public expected the expedition to bring back at least one real live Martian for them to gawk at. Since they didn't, we need Smith and need him badly.
'Live Martians?' Secretary General Douglas turned to Captain van Tromp. You have movies of Martians, haven't you?
Thousands of feet.
There's your answer, Jock. When the live stuff gets thin, trot on the movies of Martians. The people will love it. Now, Captain, about this possibility of extraterritoriality: you say the Martians were not opposed to it?
Well, no, sir-but they were not for it, either.
I don't follow you?
Captain van Tromp chewed his lip. Sir, I don't know just how to explain it. Talking with a Martian is something like talking with an echo. You don't get any argument but you don't get results either.
Semantic difficulty? Perhaps you should have brought what's-hisname, your semantician, with you today. Or is he waiting outside?
Mahmoud, sir. No, Doctor Mahmoud is not well. A-a slight nervous breakdown, sir. Van Tromp reflected that being dead drunk was the moral equivalent thereof.
Space happy?
A little, perhaps. These damned groundhogs!
Well, fetch him around when he's feeling himself, young man Smith should be of help as an interpreter.
Perhaps, van Tromp said doubtfully.
This young man Smith was busy at that moment just staying alive. His body, unbearably compressed and weakened by the strange shape of space in this unbelievable place, was at last somewhat relieved by the softness of the nest in which these others had placed him. He dropped the effort of sustaining it, and turned his third level to his respiration and heart beat.
He saw at once that he was about to consume himself. His lungs were beating almost as hard as they did at home, his heart was racing to distribute the influx, ail in an attempt to cope with the squeezing of space-and this in a situation in which he was smothered by a poisonously rich and dangerously hot atmosphere. He took immediate steps.
When his heart rate was down to twenty per minute and his respiration almost imperceptible, he set them at that and watched himself long enough to assure himself that he would not inadvertently discorporate while his attention was elsewhere. When he was satisfied that they were running properly, he set a tiny portion of his second level on guard and withdrew the rest of himself. It was necessary to review the configurations of these many new events in order to fit them to himself, then cherish and praise them-lest they swallow him up.
Where should he start? When he had left home, enfolding these others who were now his own nestlings? Or simply at his arrival in this crushed space? He was suddenly assaulted by the lights and sounds of that arrival, feeling it again with mind-shaking pain. No, he was not yet ready to cherish and embrace that configuration-back! back! back beyond his first sight of these others who were now his own. Back even before the healing which had followed his first grokking of the fact that he was not as his nestling brothers, back to the nest itself.
None of his thinkings had been in Earth symbols. Simple English he had freshly learned to speak, but much less easily than a Hindu uses it to trade with a Turk. Smith used English as one might use a code book, with tedious and imperfect translation for each symbol. Now his thoughts, pure Martian abstractions from half a million years of wildly alien culture, traveled so far from any human experience as to be utterly untranslatable.
In the adjoining room an interne. Dr. Tad Thaddeus, was playing cribbage with Tom Meechum, Smith's special nurse. Thaddeus had one eye on his dials and meters and both eyes on his cards; nevertheless he noted every heart beat of his patient. When a flickering light changed from ninety-two pulsations per minute to less than twenty, he pushed the cards aside, jumped to his feet, and hurried into Smith's room with Meechum at his heels.
The patient floated in the flexible skin of the hydraulic bed. He appeared to be dead. Thaddeus swore briefly and snapped, Get Doctor Nelson!
Meechum said, Yessir! and added, How about the shock gear. Doe? He's far gone.
Gel Doctor Nelson!
The nurse rushed out. The interne examined the patient as closely as possible but refrained from touching him. He was still doing so when an older doctor came in, walking with the labored awkwardness of a man long in space and not yet adjusted to high gravity. Well, Doctor?
Patient's respiration, temperature, and pulse dropped suddenly, uh, about two minutes ago,
sir.
What have you done for him, or to him?
Nothing, sir. Your instructions-
Good. Nelson looked Smith over briefly, then studied the instruments back of the bed, twins of those in the watch room. Let me know if there is any change. He started to leave.
Thaddeus looked startled. But, Doctor- He broke off.
Nelson said grimly, Go ahead, Doctor. What is your diagnosis?
Uh, I don't wish to sound off about your patient, sir.
Never mind. I asked for your diagnosis.
Very well, sir. Shock-atypical, perhaps, he hedged, but shock, leading to termination.
Nelson nodded. Reasonable enough. But this isn't a reasonable case. Relax, son. I've seen this patient in this condition half a dozen times during the trip back. It doesn't mean a thing.
Watch. Nelson lifted the patient's right arm, let it go. It stayed where he had left it.
Catalepsy? asked Thaddeus.
Call it that if you like. Calling a tail a leg doesn't make it one. Don't worry about it. Doctor. There is nothing typical about this case. Just keep him from being bothered and call me if there is any change. He replaced Smith's arm.
When Nelson had left, Thaddeus took one more look at the patient, shook his head and joined Meechum in the watch room. Meechum picked up his cards and said, Crib?
No.
Meechuin waited, then added, Doc, if you ask me, that one in there is a case for the basket before morning.
No one asked you.
My mistake.
Go out and have a cigarette with the guards. I want to think.
Meechum shrugged and left. Thaddeus opened a bottom drawer, took out a bottle and poured himself a dose intended to help his thinking. Meechum joined the guards in the corridor; they straightened up, then saw who it was and relaxed. The taller marine said, Howdy, pal. What was the excitement just now?
Nothing much. The patient just had quintuplets and we were arguing about what to name them. Which one of you monkeys has got a butt? And a light?
The other marine dug a pack of cigarettes out of a pocket. How're you fixed for Suction? he asked bleakly.
Just middlin'. Thanks. Meechum stuck the cigarette in his face and talked around it. Honest to God, gentlemen, I don't know anything about this patient. I wish I did.
What's the idea of these orders about 'Absolutely No Women'? Is he some kind of a sex maniac?
Not that I know of. All that I know is that they brought him in from the Champion and said that he was to have absolute quiet.
'The Champion!' the first marine said. Of course! That accounts for it.
Accounts for what?
It stands to reason. He ain't had any, he ain't seen any, he ain't touched any-for months.
And he's sick, see? If he was to lay hands on any, they're afraid he'd kill hisself. He blinked and blew out a deep breath. I'll bet I would, under similar circumstances. No wonder they don't want no bims around him.
Smith had been aware of the visit by the doctors but he had grokked at once that their intentions were benign; it was not necessary for the major part of him to be jerked back from where he was.
At the hour in the morning when human nurses slap patient's faces with cold, wet cloths under the pretense of washing them. Smith returned from his journey. He speeded up his heart, increased his respiration, and again took note of his surroundings, viewing them with serenity. He looked the room over, noting without discrimination and with praise all its details, both important and unimportant. He was, in fact, seeing it for the first time, as he had been incapable of enfolding it when he had been brought there the day before. This commonplace room was not commonplace to him; there was nothing remotely like it on all Mars, nor did it resemble the wedge-shaPed- metal-walled compartments of the Champion. But, having relived the events linking his nest to this place, he was now prepared to accept it, commend it, and in some degree to cherish it.
He became aware that there was another living creature in the room with him. A granddaddy longlegs was making a futile journey down from the ceiling, spinning as it went. Smith watched it with delight and wondered if it were a nestling form of man.
Doctor Archer Frame, the interne who had relieved Thaddeus, walked in at that moment. Good morning, he said. How do you feel?
Smith turned the question over in his mind. The first phrase he recognized as a formal sound, requiring no answer but which could be repeated-or might not be. The second phrase was listed in his mind with several possible translations. If Doctor Nelson used it, it meant one thing; if Captain van Tromp used it, it was a formal sound, needing no reply.
He felt that dismay which so often overtook him in trying to communicate with these creatures-a frightening sensation unknown to him before he met men. But he forced his body to remain calm and risked an answer. Feel good.
Good! the creature echoed. Doctor Nelson will be along in a minute. Feel like some breakfast?
All four symbols in the query were in Smith's vocabulary but he had trouble believing that he had heard them rightly. He knew that he was food, but he did not feel like food. Nor had he had any warning that he might be selected for such an honor. He had not known that the food supply was such that it was necessary to reduce the corporate group. He was filled with mild regret, since there was still so much to grok of these new events, but no reluctance.
But he was excused from the effort of translating an answer by the entrance of Dr. Nelson. The ship's doctor had had little rest and less sleep; he wasted no time on speech but inspected Smith and the array of dials in silence.
Then he turned to Smith. Bowels move? he asked.
Smith understood this; Nelson always asked about it. No, not yet.
We'll take care of that. But first you eat. Orderly, fetch in that tray.
Nelson fed him two or three bites, then required him to hold the spoon and feed himself. It was tiring but gave him a feeling of gay triumph, for it was the first unassisted action he had taken since reaching this oddly distorted space. He cleaned out the bowl and remembered to ask, Who is this? so that he could praise his benefactor.
What is this, you mean, Nelson answered. It's a synthetic food jelly, based on amino acids-and now you know as much as you did before. Finished? All right, climb out of that bed.
Beg pardon? It was an attention symbol which he had learned was useful when communication failed.
I said get out of there. Sit up. Stand up. Walk around. You can do it. Sure, you're weak as a kitten but you'll never put on muscle floating in that bed. Nelson opened a valve at the head of the bed; water drained out. Smith restrained a feeling of insecurity, knowing that Nelson cherished him. Shortly he lay on the floor of the bed with the watertight cover wrinkled around him. Nelson added, Doctor Frame, take his other elbow. We'll have to help him and steady him.
With Dr. Nelson to encourage him and both of them to help him. Smith stood up and stumbled over the rim of the bed. Steady. Now stand up on your own, Nelson directed. Don't be afraid. We'll catch you if necessary.
He made the effort and stood alone-a slender young man with underdeveloped muscles and overdeveloped chest. His hair had been cut in the Champion and his whiskers removed and inhibited. His most marked feature was his bland, expressionless, almost babyish face-set with eyes which would have seemed more at home in a man of ninety.
He stood alone for a moment, trembling slightly, then tried to walk. He managed three shuffling steps and broke into a sunny, childlike smile. Good boy! Nelson applauded.
He tried another step, began to tremble violently and suddenly collapsed. They barely managed to break his fall. Damn! Nelson fumed. He's gone into another one. Here, help me lift him into the bed. No-fill it first.
Frame did so, cutting off the flow when the cover skin floated six inches from the top. They lugged him into it, awkwardly because he had frozen into the foetal position. Get a collar pillow under his neck, instructed Nelson, and call me when he comes out of it. No-let me sleep, I need it. Unless something worries you. We'll walk him again this afternoon and tomorrow we'll start systematic exercise. In three months I'll have him swinging through the trees like a monkey. There's nothing really wrong with him.
Yes, Doctor, Frame answered doubtfully.
Oh, yes, when he comes out of it, teach him how to use the bathroom. Have the nurse help you; I don't Want him to fall.
Yes, sir. Uh, any particular method-I mean, how-
Eh? Show him, of course! Demonstrate. He probably won't understand much that you say to him, but he's bright as a whip. He'll be bathing himself by the end of the week.
Smith ate lunch without help. Presently a male orderly came in to remove his tray. The man glanced around, then came to the bed and leaned over him. Listen, he said in a low voice, I've got a fat proposition for you.
Beg pardon?
A deal, a bargain, a way for you to make a lot of money fast and easy.
'Money?' What is 'money'?
Never mind the philosophy; everybody needs money. Now listen I'll have to talk fast because I can't stay in here long-and it's taken a lot of fixing to get me in here at all. I represent Peerless Features. We'll pay you sixty thousand for your exclusive story and it won't be a bit of trouble to
you-we've got the best ghost writers in the business. You just talk and answer questions; they put it together. He whipped out a piece of paper. Just read this and sign it. I've got the down payment with me.
Smith accepted the paper, stared thoughtfully at it, holding it upside down. The man looked at him and muffled an exclamation. Lordyl Don't you read English?
Smith understood this well enough to answer. No.
Well- Here, I'll read it to you, then you just put your thumb print in the square and I'll witness it. 'I, the undersigned, Valentine Michael Smith, sometimes known as the Man from Mars, do grant and assign to Peerless Features, Limited, all and exclusive rights in my true-fact story to be titled I Was a Prisoner on Mars in exchange for-
Orderly!
Dr. Frame was standing in the door of the watch room; the paper disappeared into the man's clothes. Coming, sir. I was just getting this tray.
What were you reading?
Nothing.
I saw you. Never mind, come out of there quickly. This patient is not to be disturbed. The man obeyed; Dr. Frame closed the door behind them. Smith lay motionless for the next half hour, but try as he might he could not grok it at all.
GILLIAN BOARDMAN WAS CONSIDERED professionally competent as a nurse; she was judged competent in wider fields by the bachelor internes and she was judged harshly by some other women. There was no harm in her and her hobby was men. When the grapevine carried the word that there was a patient in special suite K-12 who had never laid eyes on a woman in his life, she did not believe it. When detailed explanation convinced her, she resolved to remedy it. She went on duty that day as floor supervisor in the wing where Smith was housed. As soon as possible she went to pay a call on the strange patient.
She knew of the No Female Visitors rule and, while she did not Consider herself to be a visitor of any sort, she sailed on past the marine guards without attempting to use the door they guarded-marines, she had found, had a stuffy habit of construing their orders literally. Instead she went into the adjacent watch room. Dr. Tad Thaddeus was on duty there alone.
He looked up. Well, if it ain't 'Dimples!' Hi, honey, what brings you here?
She sat on the comer of his desk and reached for his cigarettes. 'Miss Dimples,' to you, chum; I'm on duty. This call is part of my rounds. What about your patient?
Don't worry your fuzzy head about him, honey chile; he's not your responsibility. See your order book.
I read it. I want to have a look at him.
In one word-no.
Oh, Tad, don't go regulation on me. I know you.
He gazed thoughtfully at his nails. Ever worked for Doctor Nelson?
No. Why?
If I let you put your little foot inside that door, I'd find myself in Antarctica early tomorrow, prescribing for penguins' chilblains. So switch your fanny out of here and go bother your own patients. I wouldn't want him even to catch you in this watch room.
She stood up. Is Doctor Nelson likely to come popping in?
Not likely, unless I send for him. He's still sleeping off low-gee fa. tigue.
So? Then what's the idea of being so duty struck?
That's all, Nurse.
Very well, Doctor! She added, Stinker.
Jill!
And a stuffed shirt, too.
He sighed. Still okay for Saturday night?
She shrugged. I suppose so. A girl can't be fussy these days. She went back to her duty station, found that her services were not in immediate demand, picked up the pass key. She was balked but not beaten, as she recalled that suite K- 12 had a door joining it to the room beyond it, a room sometimes used as a sitting room when the suite was occupied by a Very Important Person. The room was not then in use, either as part of the suite or separately. She let herself into it. The guards at the door beyond paid no attention, unaware that they had been flanked.
She hesitated at the inner door between the two rooms, feeling some of the sharp excitement she used to feel when sneaking out of student nurses' quarters. But, she told herself, Dr. Nelson was asleep and Tad wouldn't tell on her even if he caught her. She didn't blame him for keeping his finger on his number-but he wouldn't report her. She unlocked the door and looked in.
The patient was in bed, he looked at her as the door opened. Her first impression was that here was a patient too far gone to care. His lack of expression seemed to show the complete apathy of the desperately ill. Then she saw that his eyes were alive with interest; she wondered if his face were paralysed? No, she decided; the typical sags were lacking.
She assumed her professional manner. Well, how are we today? Feeling better?
Smith translated and examined the questions. The inclusion of herself in the first query was confusing, but he decided that it might symbolize a wish to cherish and grow close. The second part matched Nelson's speech forms. Yes, he answered.
Good! Aside from his odd lack of expression she saw nothing strange about him-and if women were unknown to him, he was certainly managing to conceal it. Is there anything I can do for you? She glanced around, noted that there was no glass on the bedside shelf. May I get you water?
Smith had spotted at once that this creature was different from the others who had come to see him. Almost as quickly he compared what he was seeing with pictures Nelson had shown him on the trip from home to this place-pictures intended to explain a particularly difficult and puzzling configuration of this people group. This, then, was a woman.
He felt both oddly excited and disappointed. He suppressed both in order that he might grok deeply, with such success that Dr. Thaddeus noticed no change in the dial readings in the next room.
But when he translated the last query he felt such a surge of emotion that he almost let his heartbeat increase. He caught it in time and chided himself for an undisciplined nestling. Then he checked his translation.
No, he was not mistaken. This woman creature had offered him the water ritual. It wished to grow closer.
With great effort, scrambling for adequate meanings in his pitifully poor list of human words, he attempted to answer with due ceremoniousness. I thank you for water. May you always drink deep.
Nurse Boardman looked startled. Why, how sweetl She found a glass, filled it, and handed it to him.
He said, You drink.
Wonder if he thinks I'm trying to poison him? she asked herself-but there was a compelling quality to his request. She took a sip, whereupon he took the glass from her and took one also, after which he seemed content to sink back into the bed, as if he had accomplished something important.
Jill told herself that, as an adventure, this was a fizzle. She said, Well, if you don't need anything else, I must get on with my work.
She started for the door. He called out, Not
She stopped. Eh? What do you want'-
Don't go away.
Well II have to go, pretty quickly. But she came back to the bedside, Is there anything you want?
He looked her up and down. You are ... 'woman'?
The question startled Jill Boardxnafl. Her sex had not been in doubt to the most casual observer for many years. Her first impulse was to answer flippantly.
But Smith's grave face and oddly disturbing eyes checked her. She became aware emotionallY that the impossible fact about this patient was true: he did not know what a woman was. She answered carefully, Yes, I am a woman,
Smith continued to stare at her without expression. Jill began to be embarrassed by it. To be looked at appreciativelY by a male she expected and sometimes enjoyed, but this was more like being examined under a microscope. She stirred restively. Well? I look like a woman, don't I?
I do not know, Smith answered slowly. How does woman look? What makes you woman?
Well, for pity's sake! Jill realized confusedly that this conversation was further out of hand than any she had had with a male since about her twelfth birthday. You don't expect me to take off my clothes and show you',,
Smith took time to examine these verbal symbols and try to translate them. The first group he could not grok at all. It might be one of those formal sound groups these people so often used,
. yet it had been spoken with surprising force, as if it might be a last communication before withdrawaL Perhaps he had so deeply mistaken right conduct in dealing with a woman creature that the creature might be ready to discorporate at once.
He knew vaguely that he did not want the nurse to die at that moment, even though it was certainly its right and possibly its obligation to do so. The abrupt change from the rapport of the Water ritual to a situation in which a newly won water brother might possibly be considering withdrawal or discorporatiOn would have thrown him into panic had he not been consciOuSlY suppressing such disturbance. But he decided that if
Jill died now he must die at once also-he could not grok it in any other wise, not after the giving of water.
The second half of the communication contained only symbols that he had encountered before. He grokked imperfectly the intention but there seemed to be an implied way Out for him to avoid this crisis-by acceding to the suggested wish. Perhaps if the woman took its clothes off neither of them need discorporate. He smiled happily. Please.
Jill opened her mouth, closed it hastily. She opened it again. Huh? Well, I'll be darned!
Smith could grok emotional violence and knew that somehow he had offered the wrong reply. He began to compose his mind for discorporation, savoring and cherishing all that he had been and seen, with especial attention to this woman creature. Then he became aware that the woman was bending over him and he knew somehow that it was not about to die. It looked into his face. Correct me if I am wrong, it said, but were you asking me to take my clothes off?
The inversions and abstractions required careful translation but Smith managed it. Yes, he answered, while hoping that it would not stir up a new crsis.
That's what I thought you said. Brother, you aren't ill.
The word brother he considered first-the woman was reminding him that they had been joined in the water ritual. He asked the help of his nestlings that he might measure up to whatever this new brotheT wanted. I am not ill, he agreed.
Though I'm darned if I know how to cope with whatever is wrong with you. But I won't peel down. And I've got to get out of here. It straightened up and turned again toward the side door-then stopped and looked back with a quizzical smile. You might ask me again, real prettily, under other circumstances. I'm curious to see what I might do.
The woman was gone. Smith relaxed into the water bed and let the room fade away from him. He felt sober triumph that he had somehow comforted himself so that it was not necessary for them to die, but there was much new to grok. The woman's last speech had contained many symbols new to him and those which were not new had been arranged in fashions not easily understood. Out he was happy that the emotional flavor of them had been suitable for communication between water brothers-although touched with something else both disturbing and terrifyingly pleasant. He thought about his new brother, the woman creature, and felt odd tingles run through him. The feeling reminded him of the first time he had been allowed to be present at a discorporatiOn and he felt happy without knowing why.
He wished that his brother Doctor Mahmoud were here. There was so much to grok, so little to grok from.
Jill Boardman spent the rest of her watch in a mild daze. She managed to avoid any mistakes in medication and she answered from reflex the usual verbal overtures made to her. But the face of the Man from Mars stayed in her mind and she mulled over the crazy things he had said. No, not crazy, she corrected-she had done her Stint ~fl psychiatric wards and she felt certain that his remarks had not been psychotic.
She decided that innocent was the proper term-then she decided that the word was not adequate. His expression was innocent, but his eyes were not. What sort of creature had a face like that?
She had once worked in a Catholic hospital; she suddenly saw the face of the Man from Mars surrounded by the head dress of a nursing Sister, a nun. The idea disturbed her, for there was nothing female about Smith's face.
She was changing into Street clothes when another nurse stuck her head into the locker room. Phone, Jill. For you. Jill accepted the call, sound without vision, while she continued to dress.
Is this Florence Nightingale? a baritone voice asked.
Speaking. That you, Ben?
The stalwart upholder of the freedom of the press in person. Little one, are you busy?
What do you have in mind?
I have in mind taking you out, buying you a bloody steak, plying you with liquor, and asking you a question.
The answer is still 'No.'
Not that question. Another one.
Oh, do you know another one? If so, tell me.
Later. I want you softened up by food and liquor first.
Real steak? Not syntho?
Guaranteed. When you stick a fork into it, it will turn imploring eyes on you.
You must be on an expense account, Ben.
That's irrelevant and ignoble. How about it?
You've talked me into it.
The roof of the medical center. Ten minutes.
She put the street suit she had changed into back into her locker and put on a dinner dress kept there for emergencies. It was a demure little number, barely translucent and with bustle and bust pads so subdued that they merely re-created the effect she would have produced had she been wearing nothing. The dress had cost her a month's pay and did not look it, its subtle power being concealed like knock-out drops in a drink. Jill looked at herself with satisfaction and took the bounce tube up to the roof.
There she pulled her cape around her against the wind and was looking for Ben Caxton when the roof orderly touched her arm. There is a car over there paging you, Miss Boardman-that Talbot saloon.
Thanks, Jack. She saw the taxi spotted for take-off, with its door open. She went to it, climbed in, and was about to hand Ben a backhanded compliment on gallantry when she saw that he was not inside. The taxi was on automatic; its door closed and it took to the air, swung Out of the circle, and sliced across the Potomac. Jill sat back and waited.
The taxi stopped on a public landing flat over Alexandria and Ben Caxton got in; it took off again. Jill looked him over grimly. My, aren't we getting important! Since when has your time become so valuable that you send a robot to pick up your women?
He reached over, patted her knee, and said gently, Reasons, little one, reasons-I can't afford to be seen picking you up-
-Velll
-and you can't afford to be seen being picked up by me. So simmer down. I apologize. I bow in the dust. I kiss your little foot. But it was necessary.
Hmm ... which one of us has leprosy?
Both of us, in different ways. Jill, I'm a newspaperman.
I was begimiing to think you were something else.
And you are a nurse at the hospital where they are holding the Man from Mars. He spread his hands and shrugged.
Keep talking. Does that make me unfit to meet your mother?
Do you need a map, Jill? There are more than a thousand reporters in this area, not counting press agents, ax grinders, winchells, lippmanns, and the stampede that headed this way when the Champion landed. Every one of them has been trying to interview the Man from Mars, including me. So far as I know, none has succeeded. Do you think it would be Smart for us to be seen leaving the hospital together?
Umm, maybe not. But I don't really see that it matters. I'm not the Man from Mars.
He looked her over. You certainly aren't. But maybe you are going to help me see him- which is why I didn't want to be seen picking you
Huh? Ben, you've been out in the sun without your hat. They've got a marine guard around him. She thought about the fact that she herself had not found the guard too hard to circumvent, decided not to mention it.
So they have. So we talk it over.
I don't see what there is to talk about.
Later. I didn't intend to let the subject come up until I had softened you with animal proteins and ethanol. Let's eat first.
Now you sound rational. Where? Would your expense account run to the New Mayflower? You are on an expense account, aren't you?
Caxton frowned. Jill, if we eat in a restaurant, I wouldn't want to risk one closer than Louisville. It would take this hack more than two hours to get us that far. How about dinner in my apartment?
'-Said the Spider to the Fly.' Ben, I remember the last time. I'm too tired to wrestle.
Nobody asked you to. Strictly business. King's X, cross my heart and hope to die.
I don't know as I like that much better. If I'm safe alone with you, I must be slipping. Well, all right, King's X.
Caxton leaned forward and punched buttons; the taxi, which had been circling under a hold instruction, woke up, looked around, and headed for the apartment hotel where Ben lived.
He then dialed a phone number and said to Jill, How much time do you want to get liquored up, sugar foot? I'll tell the kitchen when to have the steaks ready.
Jill considered it. Ben, your mousetrap has a private kitchen.
Of sorts. I can grill a steak, if that is what you mean.
I'll grill the steak. Hand me the phone. She gave orders, stopping to make sure that Ben liked endive.
The taxi dropped them on the roof and they went down to his flat. It was unstylish and old- fashioned; its one luxury was a live grass lawn in the living room. Jill stopped in the entrance hail, slipped off her shoes, then stepped bare-footed into the living room and wiggled her toes among the cool green blades. She sighed. My, that feels good. My feet have hurt ever since I entered training.
Sit down.
No, I want my feet to remember this tomorrow, when I'm on duty.
Suit yourself. He went into his pantry and mixed drinks.
Presently she pattered after him and became domestic. The steak was waiting in the package lift; with it were pre-baked potatoes ready to be popped into short-wave. She tossed the salad, handed it to the refrigerator, then set up a combination on the stove to grill the steak and have the potatoes hot simultaneously, but did not start the cycle. Ben, doesn't this stove have a remote control?
Of course.
Well, I can't find it.
He studied the setup on the control panel, then flipped an unmarked switch. Jill, what would you do if you had to cook over an open fire?
I'd do dam well. I was a Girl Scout and a good one. How about you, smarty?
He ignored it, picked up a tray and went back to the living room; she followed and sat down at his feet, spreading her skirt to avoid grass stains. They applied themselves seriously to martinis. Opposite his chair was a stereovision tank disguised as an aquarium; he switched it on from his chair, guppies and tetras faded out and gave way to the face of a commentator, the well-known winchell Augustus Greaves.
-it can be stated authoritatively, the stereo image was saying, that the Man from Mars is being kept constantly under hypnotic drugs to keep him from disclosing these facts. The administration would find it extremely embarrassing if-
Canon flipped it off. Gus old boy, he said pleasantly, you don't know a durn thing more about it than I do. He frowned. Though you might be right about the government keeping him under drugs.
No, they aren't, Jill said suddenly.
Eh? How's that, little one?
The Man from Mars isn't being kept under hypnotics. Having blurted more than she had meant to, she added carefully, He's got a nurse and a doctor all to himself on continuous watch, but there aren't any orders for sedation.
Are you sure? You aren't one of his nurses-or are you?
No. They're male nurses. Uh ... matter of fact, there's an order to keep women away from him entirely and a couple of tough marines to make sure of it.
Caxton nodded. I heard about that. Fact is, you don't know whether they are drugging him or not. Do you?
Jill stared into her empty glass. She felt annoyed to have her word doubted but realized she would have to tell on herself to back up what she had said. Ben? You wouldn't give me away? Would you?
Give you away? How?
Any way at all.
Hmm ... that covers a lot of ground, but I'll go along.
All right. Pour me another one first. He did so, Jill went on. I know they don't have the Man from Mars hopped up-because I talked with him.
Caxton gave a slow whistle. I knew it. When I got up this morning I said to myself, 'Go see Jill. She's the ace up my sleeve.' Honey lamb, have another drink. Have six. Here, take the pitcher.
Not so fast, thanks.
Whatever you like. May I rub your poor tired feet? Lady, you are about to be interviewed. Your public waits with quivering impatience. Now let's begin at the beginning. How-
No, Ben! You promised-remember? You quote me just one little quote and I'll lose my
job.
Mmm ... probably. How about 'from a usually reliable source'?
I'd be scared.
Well? Are you going to tell Uncle Ben? Or are you going to let him die of frustration and then eat that steak by yourself?
Oh, I'll talk-now that I've talked this much. But you can't use it. Ben kept quiet and did not press his luck; Jill described how she had outflanked the guards.
He interrupted. Say! Could you do that again?
Huh? I suppose so, but I won't. It's risky.
Well, could you slip me in that way? Of course you could! Look, I'll dress up like an electrician-greasy coveralls, union badge, tool kit. You just slip me the pass key and-
No!
Huh? Look, baby girl, be reasonable. I'll bet you four to one that half the hospital staffers around him are ringers, stuck in there by one news service or another. This is the greatest human- interest story since Colombo conned Isabella into hocking her jewels. The only thing that worries me is that I may find another phony electrician-
The only thing that worries me is me, Jill interrupted. To you it's just a story; to me it's my career. They'd take away my cap, my pin, and ride me out of town on a rail. I'd be finished as a nurse.
Mmm ... there's that.
There sure is that.
Lady, you are about to be offered a bribe.
How big a bribe? It'll take quite a chunk to keep me in style the rest of my life in Rio.
Well ... the story is worth money, of course, but you can't expect me to outbid Associated Press, or Reuters. How about a hundred?
What do you think I am?
We settled that, we're dickering over the price. A hundred and fifty?
Pour me another drink and look up the phone number of Associated Press for me, that's a
lamb.
It's Capitol 10-9000. Jill, will you marry me? That's as high as I can
She looked up at him, startled. What did you say?
Will you marry me? Then, when they ride you out of town on a rail, I'll be waiting at the city line and take you away from your sordid existence. You'll come back here and cool your toes in my grass-our grass- and forget your ignominy. But you've durn well got to sneak me into that hospital room first.
Ben, you almost sound serious. If I phone for a Fair Witness, will you repeat the offer?
Caxton sighed. Jill, you're a hard woman. Send for a Witness.
She stood up. Ben, she said softly, I won't hold you to it. She rumpled his hair and kissed him. But don't ever joke about marriage to a spinster.
I wasn't joking.
I wonder. Wipe off the lipstick and I'll tell you everything I know, then we'll consider how you can use it without getting me ridden on that rail. Fair enough?
Fair enough.
She gave him a detailed account. I'm sure he wasn't drugged. I'm equally sure that he was rational-although why I'm sure I don't know, for he talked in the oddest fashion and asked the darnedest questions. But I'm sure. He isn't psychotic.
It would be odder still if he hadn't talked in an odd fashion.
Huh?
Use your head, Jill. We don't know much about Mars but we do know that Mars is very unlike Earth and that Martians, whatever they are, certainly are not human. Suppose you were suddenly popped into a tribe so far back in the jungle that they had never laid eyes on a white woman. Would you know all the sophisticated small talk that comes from a lifetime in a culture? Or would your conversation sound odd? That's a very mild analogy; the truth in this case is at least forty million miles stranger.
Jill nodded. I figured that out ... and that is why I discounted his odd remarks. I'm not
dumb.
No, you're real bright, for a female.
Would you like this martini poured in your thinning hair?
I apologize. Women are lots smarter than men; that is proved by our whole cultural setup. Gimme, I'll fill it.
She accepted the peace offerings and went on, Ben, that order about not letting him see women, it's silly. He's no sex fiend.
No doubt they don't want to hand him too many shocks at once.
He wasn't shocked. He was just ... interested. It wasn't like having a man look at me at all.
If you had humored him on that request for a private viewing, you might have had your hands full. He probably has all the instincts and no inhibitions.
Huh? I don't think so. I suppose they've told him about male and female; he just wanted to see how women are different.
'Vive la difference!' Caxton answered enthusiastically.
Don't be more vulgar than you have to be.
Me? I wasn't being vulgar, I was being reverent. I was giving thanks to all the gods that I was born human and not Martian.
Be serious,
I was never more serious.
Then be quiet. He wouldn't have given me any trouble. He would probably have thanked me gravely. You didn't see his face-I did.
What about his face?
Jill looked puzzled. I don't know how to express it. Yes, I do! -Ben, have you ever seen an
angel?
You, cherub. Otherwise not.
Well, neither have I-but that is what he looked like. He had old, wise eyes in a completely placid face, a face of unearthly innocence. She shivered.
'Unearthly' is surely the right word, Ben answered slowly. I'd like to see him.
I wish you had. Ben, why are they making such a thing out of keeping him shut up? He wouldn't hurt a fly. I'm sure of it.
Caxton fitted his fingertips together. Well, in the first place they want to protect him. He grew up in Mars gravity; he's probably weak as a cat.
Yes, of course. You could see it, just looking at him. But muscular weakness isn't dangerous; myasthenia gravis is much worse and we manage all right with such cases.
They would want to keep him from catching things, too. He's like those experimental animals at Notre Dame; he's never been exposed.
Sure, sure-no antibodies. But from what I hear around the mess hail, Doctor Nelson-the surgeon in the Champion, I mean-Doctor Nelson took care of that on the trip back. Repeated mutual transfusion until he had replaced about half of his blood tissue.
Really? Can I use that, Jill? That's news.
All right, just don't quote me. They gave him shots for everything but housemaid's knee, too. But, Ben, even if they want to protect him from infection, that doesn't take armed guards outside his door.
Mmmm ... Jill, I've picked up a few tidbits you may not know. I haven't been able to use them because I've got to protect my sources, just as with you. But I'll tell you; you've earned it-just don't talk.
Oh, I won't,
It's a long story. Want a refill?
No, let's start the steak. Where's the button?
Right here.
Well, push it.
Me? You offered to cook dinner. Where's that Girl Scout spirit you were boasting about?
Ben Caxton, I will lie right here in the grass and starve before I will get up to push a button that is six inches from your right forefinger.
As you wish. He pressed the button to tell the stove to carry out its pre.set orders. But don't forget who cooked dinner. Now about Valentine Michael Smith. In the first place there is grave doubt as to his right to the name 'Smith.'
Repeat, please?
Honey, your pal appears to be the first interplanetary bastard of record. I mean 'love
child.'
The hell you say!
Please be more ladylike in your speech. Do you remember anything about the crew of the Envoy? Never mind, I'll hit the high points. Eight people, four married couples. Two couples were Captain and Mrs. Brant, Doctor and Mrs. Smith. Your friend with the face of an angel appears to be the son of Mrs. Smith by Captain Brant.
How do they know? And, anyhow, who cares? Jill sat up and said indignantly, It's a pretty snivelin' thing to dig up a scandal after all this time. They're all dead-let 'em alone, I say!
As to how they know, you can figure that out. Blood typing, Rh factor, hair and eye color, all those genetic things-you probably know more about them than I do. Anyhow it is a mathematical certainty that Mary Jane Lyle Smith was his mother and Captain Michael Brant was his father. All the factors are matters of record for the entire crew of the Envoy; there probably never were eight people more thoroughly measured and typed. Also it gives Valentine Michael Smith a wonderfully fine heredity; his father had an I.Q. of 163, his mother 170, and both were tops in their fields.
As to who cares, Ben went on, a lot of people care very much- and a lot more will care, once this picture shapes up. Ever heard of the Lyle Drive?
Of course. That's what the Champion used.
And every other space ship, these days. Who invented it?
I don't-Wait a minute! You mean she-
Hand the little lady a cigar! Dr. Mary Jane Lyle Smith. She knew she had something important, even though development work remained to be done on it. So before she left on the expedition, she applied for a dozenodd basic patents and placed it all in a corporate trust-not a non- profit corporation, mind you-then assigned control and interim income to the Science Foundation. So eventually the government got control of it-but your friend with the face of an angel owns it. No possible doubt. It's worth millions, maybe hundreds of millions; I couldn't guess.
They brought in dinner. Caston used ceiling tables to protect his lawn; he lowered one down in front of his chair and another to Japanese height so that Jill could sit on the grass. Tender? he asked.
Ongerful! she answered with her mouth full.
Thanks. Remember, I cooked it.
Ben, she said after swallowing, how about Smith being a-I mean, being illegitimate? Can he inherit?
He's not illegitimate. Doctor Mary Jane was at Berkeley, and California laws deny the concept of bastardy. Same for Captain Brant, as New Zealand also has civilized laws on the subject. While under the laws of the home State of Doctor Ward Smith, Mary Jane's husband, a child bom in wedlock is legitimate, come hell or high water. We have here. Jill, a man who is the Simon-pure legitimate child of three different parents.
Huh? Now wait a minute, Ben; he can't be it both ways. One or the other but not both. I'm not a lawyer but-
You sure ain't. Such legal fictions bother a lawyer not at all. Smith is legitimate different ways in different jurisdictions, all kosher and all breaking his way-even though he is probably a bastard in his physical ancestry. So he inherits. Besides that, while his mother was wealthy, both his fathers were at least well to do. Brant was a bachelor until just before the expedition; he had ploughed most of his scandalous salary as a pilot on the Moon run back into Lunar Enterprises,
Limited. You know how that stuff has boomed-they just declared another three-way stock dividend. Brant had one vice, gambling-but the bloke won regularly and invested that, too. Ward Smith had family money; he was a medical man and scientist by choice. Smith is heir to both of them.
Whew!
That ain't half, honey. Smith is heir to the entire crew.
Huh?
All eight signed a 'Gentlemen Adventurers' contract, making them all mutually heirs to each other-all of them and their issue. They did it with great care, using as models similar contracts in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries that had stood up against every effort to break them. Now these were all high-powered people; among them they had quite a lot. Happened to include considerable Lunar Enterprises stock, too, besides what Brant held. Smith might turn out to own a controlling interest, or at least a key bloc in a proxy fight.
Jill thought about the childlike creature who had made such a touching ceremony out of just a drink of water and felt sorry for him. But Caxton went on: I wish I could sneak a look at the Envoy's log. I know they recovered it-but I doubt if they'll ever release it.
Why not, Ben?
Because it's a nasty story. I got Just enough to be sure before my informant sobered up and clammed up. Dr. Ward Smith delivered his wife of child by Caesarian section-and she died on the table. He seems to have worn his horns complacently until then. But what he did next shows that he knew the score; with the same scalpel he cut Captain Brant's throat- then cut his own. Sorry, hon.
Jill shivered. I'm a nurse. I'm immune to such things.
You're a liar and I love you for it. I was on police beat for three years, Jill; I never got hardened to it.
What happened to the others?
I wish I knew. If we don't break the bureaucrats and high brass loose from that log, we'll never know-and I am enough of a starry-eyed newsboy to think we should know. Secrecy begets tyranny.
Ben, he might be better off if they gypped him out of his inheritance. He's very, uh, unworldly.
The exact word, I'm sure. Nor does he need all that money; the Man from Mars will never miss a meal. Any of the governments and any of a thousand-odd universities and scientific institutions would be delighted to have him as a permanent, privileged guest.
He'd better sign it over and forget it.
It's not that easy. Jill, you know about the famous case of General Atomics versus Larkin,
et al?
Uh, not really. You mean the Larkin Decision. I had to study it in school, same as everybody. But what's it got to do with Smith?
Think back. The Russians sent the first rocket to the Moon, it crashed. The United States and Canada combine to send another one; it gets back but leaves nobody on the Moon. So when the United States and the Commonwealth are getting set to send a colonizing one jointly under the nominal sponsorship of the Federation and Russia is mounting the same deal on their own, General Atomics steals a march by sending one of their own from an island leased from Ecuador-and their men are still there, sitting pretty and looking smug when the Federation vessel shows up, followed by the Russian one.
You know what happened. General Atomics, a Swiss corporation American controlled, claimed the Moon. The Federation couldn't just brush them off; that would have been too raw and
anyhow the Russians wouldn't have held still. So the High Court ruled that a corporate person, a mere legal fiction, could not own a planet; therefore the real owners were the flesh-and-blood men who had maintained the occupation-Larkin and associates. So they recognized them as a sovereign nation and took them into the Federation-with some melon slicing for those on the inside and fat concessions to General Atomics and its daughter corporation, Lunar Enterprises. This did not entirely suit anybody and the Federation High Court was not all powerful in those days-but it was a compromise everybody could swallow. It resulted in some tight rules for colonizing planets, all based on the Larkin Decision and intended to avoid bloodshed. Worked, too-it's a matter of history that World War Three did not result from conflict over space travel and such. So now the Larkin Decision is solidly a part of our planetary law and applies to Smith.
Jill shook her head. I don't see the connection. Martinis-
Think, Jill. By our laws, Smith is a sovereign nation in himself- and sole owner of the planet Mars.
JILL LOOKED ROUND-EYED. I've certainly had too many martinis Ben. I would swear that you said that that patient owns the planet Mars.
He does. He maintained occupation of it, unassisted, for the required length of time. Smith is the planet Mars-King, President, sole civic body, what you will. If the skipper of the Champion had not left colonists behind, Smith's tenure might have failed. But he did, and that continues occupation even though Smith came to Earth. But Smith doesn't have to split with them; they are mere immigrants until he grants them Martian citizenship.
Fantastic!
It surely is. Also it's legal. Honey, do you now see why so many people are interested in who Smith is and where he came from? And why
the administration is so damned anxious to keep him under a rug? What they are doing isn't even vaguely legal. Smith is also a citizen of the United States and of the Federation, by derivation-dual citizenship with no conflict. It's illegal to hold a citizen, even a convicted criminal, incommunicado anywhere in the Federation; that's one of the things we settled in World War Three. But I doubt if Smith knows his rights. Also, it has been considered an unfriendly act all through history to lock up a visiting friendly monarch-which is what he is-and not to let him see people, especially the press, meaning me. You still won't sneak me in as a thumbfingered electrician?
Huh? You've got me worse scared than ever. Ben, if they had caught me this morning, what do you think they would have done to me?
Mmm ... nothing rough. Just locked you in a padded cell, with a certificate signed by three doctors, and allowed you mail on alternate leap years. They aren't mad at you. I'm wondering what they are going to do to him.
What can they do?
Well, he might just happen to die-from gee-fatigue, say. That would be a fine out for the administration.
You mean murder him?
Tut, tut! Don't use nasty words. I don't think they will. In the first place he is a mine of information; even the public has some dim notion of that. He might be worth more than Newton
and Edison and Einstein and six more like them all rolled into one. Or he may not be. I don't think they would dare touch him until they were sure. In the second place, at the very least, he is a bridge, an ambassador, a unique interpreter, between the human race and the only other civilized race we have as yet encountered. That is certainly important but there is no way to guess just how important. How are you on the classics? Ever read H. G. Wells' The War of the Worlds?
A long time ago, in school.
Consider the idea that the Martians might decide to make war on us-and win. They might, you know, and we have no way of guessing how big a club they can swing. Our boy Smith might be the go-between, the peacemaker, who could make the First Interplanetary War unnecessary.
Even if this possibility is remote, the administration can't afford to ignore it until they know. The discovery of intelligent life on Mars is something that, politically, they haven't figured out yet.
Then you think he is safe?
Probably, for the time being. The Secretary General has to guess and guess right. As you know, his administration is shaky.
I don't pay any attention to politics.
You should. It's only barely less important than your own heartbeat.
I don't pay any attention to that, either.
Don't talk when I'm orating. The majority headed by the United States could slip apart overnight-Pakistan would bolt at a nervous cough. In which case there would be a vote of no conlidence, a general election, and Mr. Secretary General Douglas would be out and back to being a cheap lawyer again. The Man from Mars can make or break him. Are you going to sneak me in?
I am not. I'm going to enter a nunnery. Is there more coffee?
I'll see.
They both stood up. Jill stretched and said, Oh, my ancient bones! And, Lordy, look at the time! Never mind the coffee, Ben; I've got a hard day tomorrow, being polite to nasty patients and standing clear of internes. Run me home, will you? Or send me home, I guess that's safer. Call a cab, that's a lamb.
Okay, though the evening is young. He went into his bedroom, caine out carrying an object about the size and shape of a small cigarette lighter. Sure you won't sneak me in?
Gee, Ben, I want to, but-
Never mind. I wouldn't let you. It really is dangerous-and not just to your career. I was just softening you up for this. He showed her the little object. Will you put a bug on him?
Huh? What is it?
The greatest boon to divorce lawyers and spies since the Mickey Finn. A microminiaturized wire recorder. The wire is spring driven so that it can't be spotted by a snooper circuit. The insides are transistors and resistors and capacitors and stuff, all packed in plastic-you could drop it Out of a cab and not hurt it. The power is about as much radioactivity as you would find in a watch dial, but shielded, The wire is good for twentyfour hours. Then you slide out a spool and stick in another one-the spring is part of the spool, already wound.
Will it explode? she asked nervously.
You could bake it in a cake.
But, Ben, you've got me scared to go back into his room now.
Unnecessary. You can go into the room next door, can't you?
I suppose so.
This thing has donkey's ears. Fasten the concave side flat against a wall-surgical tape will do nicely-and it picks up every word spoken in the room beyond. Is there a closet or something?
She thought about it. I'm bound to be noticed if I duck in and out of that adjoining room too much; it's really part of the suite he's in. Or they may start using it. Look, Ben, his room has a third wall in common with a room on another corridor. Will that do?
Perfect. Then you'll do it?
Umm ... give it to me. I'll think it over and see how the land lies.
Caxton stopped to polish it with his handkerchief. Put on your gloves.
Why?
Possession of it is slightly illegal, good for a short vacation behind bars. Always use gloves on it and the spare spools-and don't get caught with it.
You think of the nicest thingsl
Want to back out?
Jill let out a long breath. No. I've always wanted a life of crime. Will you teach me gangster lingo? I want to be a credit to you.
Good girl! A light blinked over the door, he glanced up. That must be your cab. I rang for it when I went to get this.
Oh. Find my shoes, will you? No, don't come up to the roof. The less I'm seen with you from here on the better.
As you wish.
As he straightened up from putting her shoes on, she took his head in both hands and kissed him. Dear Ben! No good can come of this and I hadn't realized you were a criminal type-but you're a good cook, as long as I set up the combination, and I just might marry you if I can trap you into proposing again.
The offer remains open.
Do gangsters marry their molls? Or is it 'frails'? We'll see She left hurriedly.
Jill Boardman placed the bug without difficulty. The patient in the adjacent room in the next corridor was bedfast; Jill often Stopped to gossip. She stuck it against the wall over a closet shelf while chattering about how the maids just never dusted high in the closets.
Removing the spool the next day and inserting a fresh one was just as easy; the patient was asleep. She woke while Jill was still perched on a chair and seemed surprised; Jill diverted her with a spicy and imaginary ward rumor.
Jill sent the exposed wire by mail, using the hospital's post office as the impersonal blindness of the postal System seemed safer than a cloak & dagger ruse. But her attempt to insert a third fresh spool she muffed. She had waited for a time when the patient was asleep but had just mounted the chair when the patient woke up. Oh! Hello, Miss Boardman.
Jill froze with one hand on the wire recorder. Hello, Mrs. Fritschlie, she managed to answer. Have a nice nap?
Fair, the woman answered peevishly. My back aches.
I'll rub it.
Doesn't help much. Why are you always fiddling around in my closet? Is something wrong?
Jill tried to reswallow her stomach. The woman wasn't really suspicious, she told herself. Mice, she said vaguely.
'Mice?' Oh, I can't abide mice! I'll have to have another room, right away!
Jill tore the little instrument off the closet wall and stuffed it into her pocket, jumped down from the chair and spoke to the patient. Now, now, Mrs. Fritschlie-I was just looking to see if there were any mouse holes in that closet. There aren't.
You're sure?
Quite sure. Now let's rub the back, shall we? Easy over.
Jill decided she could not plant the bug in that room again and concluded that she would risk attempting to place it in the empty room which was part of K-12, the Suite of the Man from Mars. But it was almost time for her relief before she was free again. She got the pass key.
Only to find that she did not need it; the door was unlocked and held two more marines; the guard had been doubled. One of them glanced up as she opened the door. Looking for someone?
No. Don't sit on the bed, boys, she said crisply. If you need more chairs, we'll send for them. She kept her eye on the guard while he got reluctantly up; then she left, trying to conceal her trembling.
The bug was still burning a hole in her pocket when she went off duty; she decided to return it to Caxton at once. She changed clothes, shifted it to her bag, and went to the roof. Once in the air and headed toward Ben's apartment she began to breathe easier. She phoned him in flight.
Caxton speaking.
Jill, Ben. I want to see you. Are you alone?
He answered slowly, I don't think it's smart, kid. Not now.
Ben, I've got to see you. I'm on my way over.
Well, okay, if that's how it's got to be.
Such enthusiasm!
Now look, hon, it isn't that I-
'Bye! She switched off calmed down and decided not to take it out on poor Ben-fact was they both were playing out of their league. At least she was-she should have stuck to nursing and left politics alone.
She felt better when she saw Ben and better yet when she kissed him and snuggled into his arms. Ben was such a dear-maybe she really should marry him. But when she tried to speak he put a hand over her mouth, then whispered close against her ear, Don't talk. No names and nothing but trivialities. I may be wired by now.
She nodded and he led her into the living room. Without speaking she got out the wire recorder and handed it to him. His eyebrows went up when he saw that she was returning not just a spool but the whole works but he made no comment. Instead he handed her a copy of the afternoon Post.
Seen the paper? he said in a natural voice. You might like to glance at it while I wash
up.
Thanks. As she took it he pointed to a column; he then left, taking with him the recorder. Jill saw that the column was Ben's own syndicated outlet.
THE CROW'S NEST by Ben Caxton
Everyone knows that jails and hospitals have one thing in common: they both can be very hard to get out of. In some ways a prisoner is less cut off than a patient; a prisoner can send for his lawyer,
can demand a Fair Witness, he can invoke habeas corpus and require the jailor to show cause in Open court.
But it takes only a simple NO VISITORS sign, ordered by one of the medicine men of our peculiar tribe, to consign a hospital patient to oblivion more thoroughly than ever was the Man in the Iron Mask.
To be sure, the patient's next of kin cannot be kept out by this device
-but the Man from Mars seems to have no next of kin. The crew of the ill-fated Envoy had few ties on Earth; if the Man in the Iron Mask- pardon me I mean the Man from Mars -has any relative who is guarding his interests, a few thousand inquisitive reporters  have been unable to verify it.
Who speaks for the Man from Mars? Who ordered an armed guard placed around him? What is his dread disease that no one may catch a glimpse of him, nor ask him a question? I address you, Mr. Secretary General; the explanation about physical weakness and gee-fatigue won't wash; if that were the answer, a ninety-pound nurse would do as well as an armed guard.
Could this disease be financial in nature? Or  is it political?
There was more, all in the same vein; Jill could see that Ben was deliberately baiting the administration, trying to force them to bring Smith out into the open. What that would accomplish she did not know, her own horizon not encompassing high politics and high finance. She felt, rather than knew, that Caxton was taking serious risk in challenging the established authorities, but she had no notion of the size of the danger, nor of what form it might take.
She thumbed through the rest of the paper. It was well loaded with follow-up stories on the return of the Champion, with pictures of Secretary General Douglas pinning medals on the crew, interviews with Captain van Tromp and other members of his brave company, pictures of Martians and Martian cities. There was very little about Smith, merely a medical bulletin that he was improving slowly but satisfactorily from the effects of his trip.
Ben came out and dropped some sheets of onion skin in her lap. Here's another newspaper you might like to see, he remarked and left agan.
Jill soon saw that the other newspaper was a transcription of what her first wire had picked up. As typed out, it was marked First Voice, Second Voice, and so on, but Ben had gone back and written in names wherever he had been able to make attributions later. He had written across the top: All voices, identified or not, are masculine.
Most of the items were of no interest. They simply showed that Smith had been fed, or washed, or massaged, and that each morning and afternoon he had been required to get up and exercise under the supervision of a voice identified as Doctor Nelson and a second voice marked second doctor. Jill decided that this must be Dr. Thaddeus.
But one longish passage had nothing to do with the physical care of the patient. Jill read it and reread it:
Doctor Nelson: How are you feeling, boy? Are you strong enough to talk for a while?
Smith: Yes.
Doctor Nelson: A man wants to talk to you.
Smith:  Who? (Caxton had written in: All of Smith's speeches are preceded by long pauses, some longer than others.)
Nelson: This man is our great (untranscribable guttural word-Martian?). He is our oldest Old One. Will you talk with him?
Smith:  I am great happy. The Old One will talk and I will listen and grow.
Nelson: No, no! He wants to ask you questions.
Smith: I cannot teach an Old One.
Nelson: The Old One wishes it. Will you let him ask you questions?
Smith: Yes.
(Background noises, short delay.)
Nelson: This way, sir. Uh, I have Doctor Mahmoud standing by, ready to translate for you.
Jill read New Voice. Caxton had scratched this out and had written in: Secretary General Douglasilt
Secretary General: I won't need him. You say Smith understands English.
Nelson: Well, yes and no, Your Excellency. He knows quite a number of words, but, as Mahmoud says, he doesn't have any cultural context to hang the words on. It can be rather confusing.
Secretary General: Oh, we'll get along all right, I'm sure. When I was a youngster I hitchhiked all through Brazil, without knowing a word of Portuguese when I started. Now, if you will just introduce us-then leave us alone.
Nelson: Sir? I think I had better stay with my patient.
Secretary General: Really, Doctor? I'm afraid I must insist. Sorry.
Nelson: And I am afraid that I must insist. Sorry, sir. Medical ethics- Secretary General:
 As a lawyer, I know a little something of medical jurisprudence-so don't give me that medical ethics mumbo-jumbo, really. Did this patient select you?
Nelson: Not exactly, but- Secretary General: Just as I thought. Has he had any opportunity to
make a choice of physicians? I doubt it. His present status is that of ward of the state. I am acting as his next of kin, defacto-and, you will find, de jure as well. I wish to interview him alone.
Nelson: (long pause, then very stiffly) If you put it that way, Your Excellency, I withdraw from the case.
Secretary General: Don't take it that way, Doctor; I didn't mean to get your back hair up. I'm not questioning your treatment. But you wouldn't try to keep a mother from seeing her son alone, now would you? Are you afraid that I might hurt him?
Nelson: No, but- Secretary General: Then what is your objection? Come now, introduce us and let's get on with it. This fussing may be upsetting your patient.
Nelson: Your Excellency, I will introduce you. Then you must select another doctor for your, ward.
Secretary General: I'm sorry, Doctor, I really am. I can't take that as final- we'll discuss it later. Now, if you please?
Nelson: Step over here, sir. Son, this is the man who wants to see you. Our great Old One.
Smith:
Secretary General: What did he say?
Nelson: Sort of a respectful greeting. Mahmoud says it translates: I am only an egg.
More or less that, anyway. He used to use it on me. It's friendly. Son, talk man-talk.
Smith: Yes.
Nelson: And you had better use simple one-syllable words, if I may offer a last
advice.
Secretary General: Oh, I will.
Nelson: Good-by, Your Excellency. Good-by, son.
Secretary General: Thanks, Doctor. See you later.
Secretary General:  How do you feel?
Smith: Feel fine.
Secretary General: Good. Anything you want, just ask for it. We want you to be happy.
Now I have something I want you to do for me. Can you write?
Smith: 'Write?' What is 'write?'
Secretary General: Well, your thumb print will do. I want to read a paper to you. This paper has a lot of lawyer talk, but stated simply it says that you agree that in leaving Mars you have abandoned-I mean, given up-any claims that you may have there. Understand me? You assign them in trust to the government.
Smith:
Secretary General: Well, let's put it this way. You don't own Mars, do you?
Smith:  I do not understand.
Secretary General: Mmm, let's try it this way. You want to stay here, don't you?
Smith: I do not know. I was sent by the Old Ones. (Long untranscribable speech, sounds like a bullfrog fighting a cat.)
Secretary General: Damn it, they should have taught him more English by now. See here, son, you don't have to worry about these things. Just let me have your thumb print here at the bottom of this page. Let me have your right hand. No, don't twist around that way. Hold still! I'm not going to hurt you, Doctor! Doctor Nelson!
Second Doctor: Yes, sir?
Secretary General: Get Doctor Nelson.
Second Doctor: Doctor Nelson? But he has left, sir. He said you took him off the case.
Secretary General: Nelson said that? Damn him! Well, do something. Give him artificial respiration. Give him a shot. Don't just stand there- can't you see the man is dying?
Second Doctor: I don't believe there is anything to be done, sir. Just let him alone until he comes out of it. That's what Doctor Nelson always did.
Secretary General: Blast Doctor Nelson!
The Secretary General's voice did not appear again, nor that of Doctor Nelson. Jill could guess, from gossip she had picked up around the hospital, that Smith had gone into one of his cataleptic withdrawals. There were only two more entries, neither of them attributed. One read: No need to whisper. He Can't hear you. The other read: Take that tray away. We'll feed him when he comes out of it.
Jill was giving the transcription a third reading when Ben reappeared. He was carrying more onionskin sheets but he did not offer them to her; instead he said, Hungry?
She glanced inquiringly at the papers in his hand but answered, Starved.
Let's get out of here and shoot a cow.
He said nothing more while they went to the roof and took a taxi, and he still kept quiet during a flight to the Alexandria platform, where they switched to another cab. Ben selected one with a Baltimore serial number. Once in the air he set it for Hagerstown, Maryland, then settled back and relaxed. Now we can talk.
Ben, why all the mystery?
Sorry, pretty foots. Probably just nerves and my bad conscience. I don't know that there is a bug in my apartment-but if I can do it to them, they can do it to me, and I've been showing an unhealthy interest in things the administration wants kept doggo. Likewise, while it isn't likely that a cab signaled from my flat would have a recorder hidden in the cushions, still it might have; the
Special Service squads are thorough. But this cab- He patted its seat cushions. They can't gimmick thousands of cabs. One picked at random should be safe.
Jill shivered. Ben, you don't really think they would... She let it trail off.
Don't I, now! You saw my column. I filed that copy nine hours ago. Do you think the administration will let me kick it in the stomach without doing something about it?
But you have always opposed this administration.
That's okay. The duty of His Majesty's Loyal Opposition is to oppose. They expect that. But this is different; I have practically accused them of holding a political prisoner, one the public is very much interested in. Jill, a government is a living organism. Like every living thing its prime characteristic is a blind, unreasoned instinct to survive. You hit it, it will fight back. This time I've really hit it. He gave her a sidelong look. I shouldn't have involved you in this.
Me? I'm not afraid. At least not since I turned that gadget back over to you.
You're associated with me. If things get rough, that could be enough.
Jill shut up. She had never in her life experienced the giant ruthlessness of giant power. Outside of her knowledge of nursing and of the joyous guerilla warfare between the sexes, Jill was almost as innocent as the Man from Mars. The notion that she, Jill Ooardman, who had never experienced anything worse than a spanking as a child and an occasional harsh word as an adult, could be in physical danger was almost impossible for her to believe. As a nurse, she had seen the consequences of ruthlessness, violence, brutality-but it could not happen to her.
Their cab was circling for a landing in Hagerstown before she broke the moody silence. Ben? Suppose this patient does die. What happens?
Huh? He frowned. That's a good question, a very good question. I'm glad you asked it; it shows you are taking an interest in the work. Now if there are no other questions, the class is dismissed.
Don't try to be funny.
Hmm ... Jill, I've been awake nights when I should have been dreaming about you, trying to answer that one. It's a two-part question, political and financial-and here are the best answers I have now: If Smith dies, his odd legal claim to the planet Mars vanishes. Probably the pioneer group the Champion left behind on Mars starts a new claim-and almost certainly the administration worked out a deal with them before they left Earth. The Champion is a Federation ship but it is more than possible that the deal, if there was one, leaves all the strings in the hands of that redoubtable defender of human rights, Mr. Secretary General Douglas. Such a deal could keep him in power for a long time. On the other hand, it might mean nothing at all.
Huh? Why?
The Larkin Decision might not apply. Luna was uninhabited, but Mars is inhabited-by Martians. At the moment, Martians are a legal zero. But the High Court might take a look at the political situation, stare at its collective navel, and decide that human occupancy meant nothing on a planet already inhabited by non-human natives. Then rights on Mars, if any, would have to be secured from the Martians themselves.
But, Ben, that would logically be the case anyhow. This notion of a single man owning a planet ...if s fantastic!
Don't use that word to a lawyer; he won't understand you. Straining at gnats and swallowing camels is a required course in all law schools. Besides, there is a case in point. In the fifteenth century the Pope deeded the entire western hemisphere to Spain and Portugal and nobody paid the slightest attention to the fact that the real estate was already occupied by several million Indians with their own laws, customs, and notions of property rights. His grant deed was pretty
effective, too. Take a look at a western hemisphere map sometime and notice where Spanish is spoken and where Portuguese is spoken-and see how much land the Indians have left.
Yes, but- Ben, this isn't the fifteenth century.
It is to a lawyer. They still cite Blackwell, Code Napoleon, or even the laws of Justinian. Mark it down, Jill; if the High Court rules that the Larkin Decision applies, Smith is in a position to grant or withhold concessions on Mars which may be worth millions, or more likely billions. If he assigns his claim to the present administration, then Secretary Douglas is the man who will hand out the plums. Which is just what Douglas is trying to rig. You saw that bug transcript.
